\ P(\fti^ ^^^^ ^ 

l.,*.** t **" ***~ 



WORKERS OF ALL COUNTRIES, UNITE! 



V. I. LENIN 



REPORT ON PEACE 

Delivered at the Second All-Russian Congress 

of Soviets of Workers and Soldiers Deputies 

October 26 (November 8), 1917 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY 
OF THE REPUBLIC 

Report of the All-Russian Central Executive 

Committee and the Council of People s 

Commissars to the Ninth All-Russian 

Congress of Soviets 

December 23, 1921 



FOREIGN LANGUAGES PUBLISHING HOUSE 
Moscow 



PUBLISHER S NOTE 

The present collection includes works by 
V. I. Lenin dealing with the home and for 
eign policy of the young Soviet Republic 
and questions of peaceful coexistence of 
the two systems. 

The translation has been made from the 
fourth Russian edition of Lenin s Collected 
Works (unless otherwise indicated). The ap 
propriate volume and pages of the Works 
are given on the right at the end of each 
item. 



DK 



3- V? G 




907876 



CONTENTS 

Page 

REPORT ON PEACE DELIVERED AT THE SECOND ALL- 
RUSSIAN CONGRESS OF SOVIETS OF WORKERS AND 
SOLDIERS DEPUTIES. October 26 (November 8), 1917 . 5 

CONCLUDING SPEECH ON THE REPORT ON PEACE October 
26 (November 8) n 

STRANGE AND MONSTROUS 15 

SPEECH IN THE MOSCOW SOVIET OF WORKERS PEAS 
ANTS AND RED ARMY DEPUTIES. March 12, 1918. 
Verbatim Report 25 

RESOLUTION OF THE FOURTH EXTRAORDINARY ALL- 
RUSSIAN CONGRESS OF SOVIETS (March 14-16 1918) 
RATIFICATION OF THE BREST TREATY 31 

REPORT ON FOREIGN POLICY DELIVERED AT A JOINT 
MEETING OF THE ALL-RUSSIAN CENTRAL EXECUTIVE 
COMMITTEE AND THE MOSCOW SOVIET. May 14, 1918 34 

SPEECH ON THE INTERNATIONAL SITUATION DELIVERED 
AT THE SIXTH EXTRAORDINARY ALL-RUSSIAN CON 
GRESS OF SOVIETS OF WORKERS , PEASANTS , COS 
SACKS AND RED ARMY DEPUTIES. November 8, 1918 . 53 

TO THE AMERICAN WORKERS 69 

ANSWERS TO QUESTIONS PUT BY A CHICAGO DAILY 

NEWS CORRESPONDENT . 71 

DRAFT RESOLUTION PRESENTED TO THE EIGHTH ALL- 
RUSSIAN CONFERENCE OF THE R.C.P.(B ) ON THE 
QUESTION OF FOREIGN POLICY 73 

REPORT OF THE ALL-RUSSIAN CENTRAL EXECUTIVE 
COMMITTEE AND THE COUNCIL OF PEOPLE S COMMIS 
SARS DELIVERED AT THE SEVENTH ALL-RUSSIAN 
CONGRESS OF SOVIETS. December 5, 1919 . 75 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF THE ALL-RUSSIAN CENTRAL 
EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE AND THE COUNCIL OF PEO 
PLE S COMMISSARS DELIVERED AT THE FIRST SESSION 
OF THE ALL-RUSSIAN CENTRAL EXECUTIVE COMMIT 
TEE OF THE SEVENTH CONVOCATION. February 2, 1920 105 

IN REPLY TO QUESTIONS PUT BY A CORRESPONDENT OF 

THE NEW YORK EVENING JOURNAL 130 

IN REPLY TO QUESTIONS PUT BY A CORRESPONDENT OF 

THE DAILY EXPRESS 134 

SPEECH DELIVERED AT THE JOINT MEETING OF THE ALL- 
RUSSIAN CENTRAL EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE, THE MOS 
COW SOVIET OF WORKERS , PEASANTS AND RED 
ARMY DEPUTIES, AND TRADE UNIONS AND FACTORY 
COMMITTEES. May 5, 1920 136 

SPEECH DELIVERED AT A CONFERENCE OF CHAIRMEN 
OF UYEZD, VOLOST AND VILLAGE EXECUTIVE COM 
MITTEES OF MOSCOW GUBERNIA. October 15, 1920 . 143 

OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION AND THE TASKS 
OF THE PARTY. Speech Delivered to the Moscow Gubernia 
Conference of the R.C.P.(B.). November 21, 1920 . . . . 162 

SPEECH AT A PLENARY MEETING OF THE MOSCOW 
SOVIET OF WORKERS AND PEASANTS DEPUTIES. 
February 28, 1921 184 

REPORT ON THE POLITICAL WORK OF THE CENTRAL 
COMMITTEE TO THE TENTH CONGRESS OF THE 
R.C.P.(B.). March 8, 1921 199 

THE HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC. 
Report of the All-Russian Central Executive Committee and 
the Council of People s Commissars to the Ninth All-Russian 
Congress of Soviets. December 23, 1921 225 

DRAFT DECISION OF THE ALL-RUSSIAN CENTRAL EXEC 
UTIVE COMMITTEE ON THE REPORT OF THE DELEGA 
TION TO THE GENOA CONFERENCE 266 

INTERVIEW GIVEN TO MICHAEL FARBMAN, OBSERVER 

AND MANCHESTER GUARDIAN CORRESPONDENT . . 269 

Notes 277 



REPORT ON PEACE 

DELIVERED AT THE SECOND ALL-RUSSIAN 
CONGRESS OF SOVIETS OF WORKERS AND 

SOLDIERS DEPUTIES^ 
OCTOBER 26 (NOVEMBER 8), 1917 

The question of peace is a burning question, the painful 
question of the day. Much has been said and written on 
the subject, and all of you, no doubt, have discussed it quite 
a lot. Permit me, therefore, to proceed to read a declaration 
which the government you elect should publish. 

DECREE ON PEACE 

The workers and peasants government, created by the 
revolution of October 24-25 and basing itself on the Soviets 
of Workers , Soldiers and Peasants Deputies, proposes to 
all the belligerent peoples and their governments to start 
immediate negotiations for a just, democratic peace. 

By a just or democratic peace, for which the overwhelm 
ing majority of the working class and other working people 
of all the belligerent countries, exhausted, tormented and 
racked by the war, are craving a peace that has been most 
definitely and insistently demanded by the Russian workers 
and peasants ever since the overthrow of the tsarist mon 
archy by such a peace the government means an imme 
diate peace without annexations (i.e., without the seizure of 



V. I. LENIN 



foreign lands, without the forcible incorporation of foreign 
nations) and without reparations. 

The government of Russia proposes this kind of peace 
be immediately concluded by all the belligerent nations, 
and expresses its readiness to take all the resolute measures 
now, without the least delay, pending the final ratification 
of all the terms of such a peace by authoritative assem 
blies of the people s representatives of all countries and 
all nations. 

In accordance with the sense of justice of democrats in 
general, and of the working people in particular, the 
government conceives the annexation or seizure of foreign 
lands to mean every incorporation of a small or weak 
nation into a large or powerful state without the precisely, 
clearly and voluntarily expressed consent and wish of that 
nation, irrespective of the time when such forcible incor 
poration took place, irrespective also of the degree of de 
velopment or backwardness of the nation forcibly annexed 
to the given state, or forcibly retained within its borders, 
and irrespective, finally, of whether this nation is in Europe 
or in distant, overseas countries. 

If any nation whatsoever is forcibly retained within the 
borders of a given state, if, in spite of its expressed desire 
no matter whether expressed in the press, at public meet 
ings, in the decisions of parties, or in protests and uprisings 
against national oppression it is not accorded the right 
to decide the forms of its state existence by a free vote, 
taken after the complete evacuation of the troops of the 
incorporating or, generally, of the stronger nation and 
without the least pressure being brought to bear, such 
incorporation is annexation, i.e., seizure and violence. 

The government considers it the greatest of crimes 
against humanity to continue this war over the issue of 
how to divide among the strong and rich nations the weak 
nationalities they have conquered, and solemnly announces 
its determination immediately to sign peace to stop this 



REPORT ON PEACE 



war on the terms indicated, which are equally just for all 
nationalities without exception. 

At the same time the government declares that it does 
not regard the above-mentioned peace terms as an ultima 
tum; in other words, it is prepared to consider any other 
peace terms, and insists only that they be advanced by any 
of the belligerent countries as speedily as possible, and that 
in the peace proposals there should be absolute clarity and 
the complete absence of all ambiguity and secrecy. 

The government abolishes secret diplomacy, and, for 
its part, announces its firm intention to conduct all negotia 
tions quite openly in full view of the whole people. It will 
proceed immediately with the full publication of the secret 
treaties endorsed or concluded by the government of land 
lords and capitalists from February to October 25, 1917. 2 
The government proclaims the unconditional and immediate 
annulment of everything contained in these secret treaties 
in so far as it is aimed, as is mostly the case, at securing 
advantages and privileges for the Russian landlords and 
capitalists and at the retention, or extension, of the annexa 
tions made by the Great Russians. 

Proposing to the governments and peoples of all coun 
tries immediately to begin open negotiations for peace, the 
government, for its part, expresses its readiness to conduct 
these negotiations in writing, by telegraph and by negotia 
tions between representatives of the various countries, or 
at a conference of such representatives. In order to facil 
itate such negotiations, the government is appointing its 
plenipotentiary representative to neutral countries. 

The government proposes an immediate armistice to the 
governments and peoples of all the belligerent countries, 
and, for its part, considers it desirable that this armistice 
should be concluded for a period of not less than three 
months, i.e., a period long enough to permit the completion 
of negotiations for peace with the participation of the rep 
resentatives of all peoples or nations, without exception, 



8 V. I. LENIN 



involved in or compelled to take part in the war, and the 
summoning of authoritative assemblies of the representa 
tives of the peoples of all countries for the final ratification 
of the peace terms. 

While addressing this proposal for peace to the govern 
ments and peoples of all the belligerent countries, the Pro 
visional Workers and Peasants Government of Russia 
appeals in particular also to the class-conscious workers of 
the three most advanced nations of mankind and the largest 
states participating in the present war, namely, Great 
Britain, France and Germany. The workers of these coun 
tries have made the greatest contributions to the cause of 
progress and socialism; they have furnished the great 
examples of the Chartist movement 3 in England, a number 
of revolutions of historic importance effected by the French 
proletariat, and, finally, the heroic struggle against the 
Anti-Socialist Law in Germany 4 and the prolonged, persist 
ent and disciplined work of creating mass proletarian 
organisations in Germany, a work which serves as a model 
to the workers of the whole world. All these examples of 
proletarian heroism and historical creative work are a 
pledge that the workers of the countries mentioned will 
understand the duty that now faces them of saving mankind 
from the horrors of war and its consequences, that these 
workers, by comprehensive, determined and supremely 
vigorous action, will help us to conclude peace successfully, 
and at the same time emancipate the labouring and ex 
ploited masses of the population from all forms of slavery 
and all forms of exploitation. 



The workers and peasants government, created by the 
revolution of October 24-25 and basing itself on the Soviets 
of Workers , Soldiers and Peasants Deputies, must start 
immediate negotiations for peace. Our appeal must be 
addressed both to the governments and to the peoples. We 



REPORT ON PEACE 



cannot ignore the governments, for that would delay the 
possibility of concluding peace, and the people s govern 
ment dare not do that; but we have no right not to appeal 
to the peoples at the same time. Everywhere there are dif 
ferences between the governments and the peoples, and we 
must therefore help the peoples to intervene in questions 
of war and peace. We will, of course, in every possible way 
insist upon the whole of our programme for a peace without 
annexations and reparations. We shall not retreat from it; 
but we must not give our enemies an opportunity to say 
that their terms are different from ours and that therefore 
it is useless to start negotiations with us. No, we must 
deprive them of that advantageous position and not present 
our terms in the form of an ultimatum. Therefore the point 
is included that we are willing to consider any peace terms 
and all proposals. We shall consider them, but that does not 
necessarily mean that we shall accept them. We shall 
submit them for consideration to the Constituent Assembly 
which will have the power to decide what concessions can 
and what cannot be made. We are combating the deception 
practised by governments which pay lip service to peace 
and justice, but in fact wage annexationist and predatory 
wars. No government will say all it thinks. We, however, 
are opposed to secret diplomacy and will act openly in full 
view of the whole people. We do not close our eyes to diffi 
culties and never have done. War cannot be ended by 
refusal, it cannot be ended unilaterally. We are proposing 
an armistice for three months, but shall not reject a shorter 
period, so that the exhausted army may breathe freely, 
even if only for a little while; moreover, in all the civilised 
countries national assemblies must be summoned for the 
discussion of the terms. 

In proposing an immediate armistice, we appeal to the 
class-conscious workers of the countries that have done so 
much for the development of the proletarian movement. 
We appeal to the workers of England, where there was the 



10 V. I. LENIN 



Chartist movement, to the workers of France, who have 
in repeated uprisings displayed the strength of their class 
consciousness, and to the workers of Germany, who waged 
the fight against the Anti-Socialist Law and have created 
powerful organisations. 

In the Manifesto of March 14, 5 we called for the over 
throw of the bankers, but, far from overthrowing our own 
bankers, we entered into an alliance with them. Now we 
have overthrown the government of the bankers. 

The governments and the bourgeoisie will make every 
effort to unite their forces and drown the workers and 
peasants revolution in blood. But the three years of war 
have been a good lesson to the masses the Soviet move 
ment in other countries and the mutiny in the German 
navy, 6 which was crushed by the junkers of Wilhelm the 
hangman. Finally, we must remember that we are not living 
in the depths of Africa, but in Europe, where news can 
spread quickly. 

The workers movement will triumph and will pave the 
way to peace and socialism. (Prolonged applause.) 

Izvestia TsIK No. 208, Vol. 26, pp. 217-21 

October 27, 1917, 
and Pravda No. 171, 
November 10 (October 28), 1917 



CONCLUDING SPEECH ON THE REPORT ON PEACE 
OCTOBER 26 (NOVEMBER 8) 

I shall not touch on the general character of the dec 
laration. The government which your Congress sets up may 
amend unessential points. 

I shall vigorously oppose lending our demand for peace 
the form of an ultimatum. An ultimatum may prove fatal 
to our whole cause. We cannot demand that because of 
some insignificant departure from our demands the imper 
ialist governments should have the opportunity of saying 
that it was impossible to enter into negotiations for peace 
owing to our irreconcilability. 

We shall send out our appeal everywhere, it will be made 
known to everybody. It will be impossible to conceal the 
terms proposed by our workers and peasants government. 

It will be impossible to hush up our workers and peas 
ants revolution, which has overthrown the government of 
bankers and landlords. 

The governments may not reply to an ultimatum; they 
will have to reply to the text we have proposed. Let every 
one know what their governments have in mind. We do not 
want any secrets. We want a government to be always 
under the supervision of the public opinion of its country. 

What will the peasant of some remote province say if, 
owing to our insistence on ultimatums, he will not know 
what another government wants? He will say: comrades, 



12 V. I. LENIN 



why did you preclude the possibility of any peace terms 
being proposed? I would have discussed them, I would have 
examined them, and would then have instructed my repre 
sentatives in the Constituent Assembly how to act. I am 
prepared to fight by revolutionary methods for just terms 
if the governments do not agree, but there might be such 
terms for some countries that I would be prepared to re 
commend their governments to go on fighting by themselves. 
The full realisation of our ideas depends solely on the 
overthrow of the entire capitalist system. This is what the 
peasant might say to us, and he would accuse us of being 
excessively uncompromising over trifles, when for us the 
main thing is to expose all the vileness, all the baseness of 
the bourgeoisie and of its crowned and uncrowned hang 
men placed at the head of the governments. 

We should not and must not give the governments an 
opportunity to take refuge behind our uncompromising 
attitude and to conceal from the peoples why they are being 
sent to the shambles. This is a tiny drop, but we should not 
and must not reject this drop, which will wear away the 
stone of bourgeois conquest. An ultimatum would make the 
position of our opponents easier. We shall make all the 
terms known to the people. We shall confront all the 
governments with our terms, and let them give answer to 
their people. We shall submit all peace proposals to the 
Constituent Assembly for decision. 

There is still another point, comrades, to which you must 
pay the most careful attention. The secret treaties must be 
published. The clauses regarding annexations and repara 
tions must be annulled. There are various clauses, comrades 
the predatory governments, you know, not only made 
agreements between themselves on plunder, but among 
them they also included economic agreements and various 
other clauses regarding good-neighbourly relations. 

We shall not bind ourselves by treaties. We shall not 
allow ourselves to be entangled by treaties. We reject all 



CONCLUDING SPEECH ON THE REPORT ON PEACE 13 

clauses on plunder and violence, but we shall welcome all 
clauses containing provisions for good-neighbourly rela 
tions and economic agreements; these we cannot reject. We 
propose an armistice for three months; we choose a lengthy 
period because the peoples are exhausted, the peoples yearn 
for a respite from this bloody shambles that has lasted over 
three years. We must realise that the peoples have to be 
given an opportunity to discuss the terms of peace and to 
express their will with parliament participating, and this 
requires time. We demand a lengthy armistice, so that the 
army in the trenches may enjoy a respite from this night 
mare of constant slaughter; but we shall not reject propos 
als for a shorter armistice; we shall examine them, and it 
is incumbent upon us to accept them, even if we are offered 
an armistice of a month or a month and a half. Nor must 
our proposal for an armistice have the form of an ultima 
tum, for we will not give our enemies an opportunity to 
conceal the whole truth from the peoples, using our 
irreconcilability as a pretext. It must not be in the form of 
an ultimatum, for a government is criminal that does not 
desire an armistice. If we do not put our proposal for an 
armistice in the form of an ultimatum, we shall thereby 
show the peoples that the governments are criminal, and 
the peoples will not stand on ceremony with such criminals. 
The objection is raised that by not resorting to an ultimatum 
we are displaying weakness, but it is time to cast aside all 
bourgeois cant when speaking of the strength of the people. 
According to the bourgeois conception, there is strength 
when the people go blindly to the slaughter in obedience to 
the imperialist governments. The bourgeoisie admit a state 
to be strong only when it can, by the power of the govern 
ment apparatus, hurl the people wherever the bourgeois 
rulers want them hurled. Our idea of strength is a different 
one. Our idea is that a state is strong when the people are 
politically conscious. It is strong when the people know 
everything, can form an opinion of everything and do 



14 V. I. LENIN 



everything consciously. We need not fear to tell the truth 
about fatigue, for what state today is not tired, what nation 
does not talk about it openly? Take Italy, where, owing to 
this tiredness, there was a prolonged revolutionary move 
ment demanding the termination of the slaughter. Are there 
not mass demonstrations of workers in Germany that put 
forward a demand for the termination of the war? Was it 
not fatigue that provoked the mutiny in the German navy 
that was so ruthlessly suppressed by that hangman, 
Wilhelm, and his hirelings? If such things are possible in 
so disciplined a country as Germany, where they are begin 
ning to talk about fatigue and about putting an end to the 
war, we need not fear to say the same openly, because it is 
the truth, equally true both of our country and of all the 
belligerent and even non-belligerent countries. 

Pravda No. 171, Vol. 26, pp. 222-24 

November 10 (October 28), 1917 



STRANGE AND MONSTROUS 

The Moscow Regional Bureau 7 of our Party, in a resolu 
tion adopted on February 24, 1918, expressed lack of confi 
dence in the Central Committee, refused to obey those of 
its decisions "that will be connected with the implementa 
tion of the terms of the peace treaty with Austria and 
Germany", 8 and, in an "explanatory note" to the resolution, 
declared that it "considers a split in the Party in the very 
near future hardly avoidable".* 

There is nothing monstrous, nor even strange in all this. 
It is quite natural that comrades who violently disagree 
with the Central Committee over the question of a separate 
peace violently condemn the Central Committee and 
express their conviction that a split is inevitable. All that 
is the most legitimate right of Party members, which is 
quite understandable. 

But here is what is strange and monstrous. An "explana 
tory note" is appended to the resolution. Here it is in full: 

* Here is the full text of the resolution: "Having discussed the 
activities of the Central Committee, the Moscow Regional Bureau of 
the R.S.D.L.P. expresses lack of confidence in the Central Committee 
owing to its political line and composition, and will at the first 
opportunity insist that a new Central Committee be elected. Further 
more, the Moscow Regional Bureau does not consider itself bound 
to obey unreservedly those decisions of the Central Committee that 
will be connected with the implementation of the terms of the peace 
treaty with Austria and Germany." The resolution was adopted 
unanimously. 



16 V. I. LENIN 



The Moscow Regional Bureau considers a split in the 
Party in the very near future hardly avoidable and it sets 
itself the aim of helping to unite all consistent revolution 
ary Communists who equally oppose both the advocates of 
the conclusion of a separate peace and all moderate oppor 
tunists in the Party. In the interests of the world revolution, 
we consider it expedient to accept the possibility of losing 
Soviet power, which is now becoming purely formal. We 
maintain as before that our primary task is to extend the 
ideas of the socialist revolution to all other countries, reso 
lutely to promote the workers dictatorship and ruthlessly 
to suppress bourgeois counter-revolution in Russia." 

It is the words we have emphasised in this passage which 
are . . . strange and monstrous. 

It is in these words that the crux of the matter lies. 

These words reduce to an absurdity the whole line put 
forward by the authors of the resolution. These words 
expose the root of their error with exceptional clarity. 

"In the interests of the world revolution it is expedient 

to accept the possibility of losing Soviet power " That 

is strange, for there is even no connection between the 
premises and the conclusion. "In the interests of the world 
revolution it is expedient to accept the military defeat of 
Soviet power" such a proposition might be right or wrong, 
but it could not be called strange. That is the first thing. 

Second thing: Soviet power "is now becoming purely for 
mal". Now this is not only strange but downright mon 
strous. Obviously, the authors have got themselves 
thoroughly entangled. We shall have to disentangle them. 

As regards the first question, the authors idea evidently 
is that it would be expedient in the interests of the world 
revolution to accept the possibility of defeat in war, which 
would lead to the loss of Soviet power, in other words, to 
the triumph of the bourgeoisie in Russia. By voicing this 
idea the authors indirectly admit the truth of what I said 
m the theses (of January 8, 1918, published in Pravda on 



STRANGE AND MONSTROUS 17 

February 24, 1918), namely, that refusal to accept the peace 
terms presented by Germany would lead to Russia s defeat 
and the overthrow of Soviet power. 

And so, la raison finit toujours par avoir raison the 
truth always triumphs! My "extremist" opponents, the Mus 
covites who threaten a split, were obliged just because 
they have come to talk openly of a split to completely 
expose their concrete reasons, those very reasons which 
people who confine themselves to general phrase-monger 
ing about revolutionary war prefer to pass over in silence. 
The very essence of my theses and arguments (as anyone 
who cares to read attentively my theses of January 7, 1918, 
may see) is that we must accept this extremely harsh peace 
right now, at once, while at the same time seriously prepar 
ing for a revolutionary war (and accept it, moreover, precise 
ly in the interest of such serious preparations). Those 
who confined themselves to general phrase-mongering 
about a revolutionary war ignored or failed to notice, or did 
not want to notice, the very essence of my arguments. And 
now I must thank precisely my "extremist" opponents, the 
Muscovites, from the bottom of my heart for having broken 
the "conspiracy of silence" over the essence of my argu 
ments. The Muscovites were the first to reply to them. 

And what was their reply? 

Their reply was an admission of the correctness of my 
concrete argument. Yes, the Muscovites admitted, we shall 
certainly be defeated if we fight the Germans now.* Yes, 
this defeat would certainly lead to the fall of Soviet power. 

Again and again I thank my "extremist" opponents, the 
Muscovites, from the bottom of my heart for having brok- 

* As to the counter-argument, that to avoid righting was anyway 
impossible, the reply has been given by the facts: on January 8 my 
theses were read; by January 15 we might have had peace. A respite 
would have been certainly assured (and for us even the briefest 
respite would have been of gigantic significance, both materially 
and morally, for the Germans would have had to declare a new war), 
if ... if it had not been for revolutionary phrase-mongering. 

22283 



, 8 V. I. LENIN 



en the "conspiracy of silence" against the essence of my 
arguments, i.e., against my concrete statement as to what 
the conditions of war would be, if we were to accept 
once, and for having fearlessly admitted the correctness 
of my concrete statement. 

Further, on what grounds were my arguments, the &gt;. 
stantial correctness of which the Muscovites were com 
pelled to admit, rejected? 

On the grounds that in the interests of the world revolu 
tion we must accept the loss of Soviet power. 

Why should the interests of the world revolution de 
mand that? This is the crux of the matter; it is the very 
essence of the reasoning of those who would like to def ea 
my arguments. And precisely on this, the most important, 
fundamental and vital point, not a word is said, either in 
the resolution or in the explanatory note. The authors of 
the resolution found time and space to speak of what 
universally known and indisputable-of "ruthlessly sup 
pressing bourgeois counter-revolution in Russia (using t 
methods and means of a policy which would lead to the 
loss of Soviet power?), and of opposing all moderate op 
portunists in the Party-but of that which is really . 
putable and which concerns the very essence of the po 
tion of the peace opponents not a word! 

Strange. Extremely strange. Did the authors of the reso 
lution keep silent about this because they felt that on t 
point they were particularly weak? To have plainly stated 
why (this is demanded by the interests of the world rev 
olution) would most likely have meant exposing 1 



However that may be, we have to seek out the argu 
ments which may have guided the authors of the : 

^Perhaps the authors believe that the interests of the 
world revolution forbid making any peace at all with im 
perialists? This opinion was expressed by some of the pe 



STRANGE AND MONSTROUS 19 

opponents at one of the Petrograd meetings, but only an 
insignificant minority of those who objected to a separate 
peace supported it. 9 It is clear that this opinion would 
lead to a denial of the expediency of the Brest negotia 
tions and to a rejection of peace, "even" if accompanied 
by the return of Poland, Latvia and Courland. The incor 
rectness of this view (which was rejected, for example, by 
a majority of the Petrograd peace opponents) is as clear 
as day. A socialist republic surrounded by imperialist pow 
ers could not, from this point of view, conclude any eco 
nomic treaties, and could not exist at all, without flying 
off to the moon. 

Perhaps the authors believe that the interests of the 
world revolution demand that it should be given a push, 
and that only war can give that push believe that peace, 
in any case, cannot; that peace might give the people the 
impression that imperialism was being "legalised"? Such 
a "theory" would be completely at variance with Marxism, 
which has always been opposed to "pushing" revolutions 
that develop with the acuteness of the class antagonisms 
engendering revolutions. Such a theory would be tan 
tamount to the view that armed uprising is a form of 
struggle which is obligatory always and under all condi 
tions. Actually, however, the interests of the world rev 
olution demand that Soviet power, having overthrown the """&gt; 
bourgeoisie in our country, should help that revolution, 
but that it should choose a form of help which is com 
mensurate with its own strength. To help the socialist rev- \ 
olution on an international scale by accepting the pos 
sibility of defeat of that revolution in one s own country 
is a view that does not follow even from the pushing 
theory. 

Perhaps the authors of the resolution believe that rev 
olution has already begun in Germany and has already 
reached the stage of an open, nation-wide civil war, that 
we must therefore devote our strength to helping the 



20 



V. I. LENIN 



German workers, and must perish ourselves ("losing 
Soviet power") to save a German revolution which 
has already started its decisive fight and is being hard 
pressed? According to this theory, we, while perishing 
ourselves, would be diverting part of the forces of Ger 
man counter-revolution, thereby saving the German rev 
olution. 

It is quite conceivable that, given these premises, it 
would not only be "expedient" (as the authors of the reso 
lution put it) but a downright duty to accept the possibil 
ity of defeat and the possibility of losing Soviet pow 
er. But obviously these premises do not exist. The German 
revolution is ripening, but it has evidently not reached 
the stage of an explosion in Germany, of civil war in Ger 
many. By "accepting the possibility of losing Soviet pow 
er", we certainly would not be helping the German revolu 
tion to reach maturity, but would be hindering it. We would 
be helping German reaction, playing into its hands, ham 
pering the socialist movement in Germany and repelling 
from socialism large masses of German proletarians and 
semi-proletarians who have not yet come over to social 
ism and would be scared by the defeat of Soviet Russia, 
just as the English workers were scared by the defeat of 
the Paris Commune in 1871. 

Twist and turn them as much as you like, but you will 
find no logic in the authors contentions. There are no sen 
sible arguments to support the view that "in the interests 
of the world revolution it is expedient to accept the pos 
sibility of losing Soviet power". 

"Soviet power is now becoming purely formal" this, 
as we see, is the monstrous view the authors of the Mos 
cow resolution have come to proclaim. 

Since the German imperialists are going to make us pay 
indemnities and forbid us to carry on propaganda and agi 
tation against Germany, Soviet power loses all significance 
and "becomes purely formal" this is probably the line of 



STRANGE AND MONSTROUS 21 

"reasoning" of the authors of the resolution. We say "prob 
ably", for the authors offer nothing clear and specific in 
support of their thesis. 

Profound and hopeless pessimism and complete despair 
such is the sum and substance of the "theory" that the 
significance of Soviet power is purely formal and that 
tactics which will risk the possible loss of Soviet power 
are permissible. Since there is no salvation anyway, then 
let even Soviet power perish this is the sentiment that 
dictated this monstrous resolution. The allegedly "eco 
nomic" arguments in which such ideas are sometimes 
clothed reveal the same hopeless pessimism: what sort of 
Soviet republic is it the implication is when every kind 
of tribute can be exacted from it? 

Nothing but despair: we shall perish anyhow! 

It is a quite understandable mood in the extremely des 
perate situation in which Russia finds herself. But it is 
not "understandable" among conscious revolutionaries. It 
is typical precisely because it expresses the views of the 
Muscovites which have been carried to the point of ab 
surdity. The Frenchmen of 1793 would never have said 
that their conquests the republic and democracy were 
becoming purely formal and that they would have to accept 
the possibility of losing the republic. They were not filled 
with despair, but with faith in victory. To call for a rev 
olutionary war, and at the same time to talk in an official 
resolution of "accepting the possibility of losing Soviet 
power", is to expose oneself completely. 

Early in the nineteenth century, at the time of the Na 
poleonic wars, Prussia and a number of other countries 
suffered incomparably and immeasurably greater hardships 
and burdens of defeat, conquest, humiliation and oppres 
sion on the part of the conqueror than Russia is suffering 
in 1918. Yet the best men of Prussia, when Napoleon s mil 
itary jackboots trampled upon them a hundred times more 



22 



V. I. LENIN 



heavily than we can be trampled upon now, did not de 
spair, and did not say that their national political institu 
tions were "purely formal". They did not drop their hands 
or give way to the feeling: "We shall perish anyhow." They 
signed peace treaties infinitely more drastic, brutal, humi 
liating and oppressive than the Brest Treaty, and then 
knew how to bide their time; they staunchly bore the con 
queror s yoke, fought again, fell under the conqueror s yoke 
again, again signed the vilest of vile peace treaties, and 
again rose, and in the end liberated themselves (not with 
out exploiting the dissensions among the stronger com 
peting conquerors). 

Why shouldn t this be repeated in our history? 
Why should we give way to despair and write resolu 
tions which, by heavens, are more disgraceful than the 
most disgraceful peace saying that "Soviet power is be 
coming purely formal"? 

Why shouldn t the most crushing military defeats in the 
struggle against the giants of modern imperialism steel 
the national character in Russia too, strengthen self-dis 
cipline, put an end to the bragging and phrase-monger 
ing, teach fortitude and bring the people round to the 
correct tactics of the Prussians when they were crushed 
by Napoleon the tactics of signing the most humiliating 
of peace treaties when you haven t an army, then muster 
ing your forces and rising again and again? 

Why should we give way to despair at the first peace 
treaty, incredibly harsh though it be, when other nations 
were able staunchly to bear even bitterer misfortunes? 

Is it the staunchness of the proletarian who knows that 
one must submit when strength is lacking, and is then 
nevertheless able to rise again and again at any price and 
to build up strength under all circumstances, is it this that 
underlies these tactics of despair, or, rather the spine- 
lessness of the petty bourgeois, who, in our country, in 
the shape of the Left Socialist-Revolutionary Party, has 



STRANGE AND MONSTROUS 23 



beaten the record for phrase-mongering about a revolu 
tionary war? 

No, dear Moscow "extremist" comrades, every day of 
trial will drive away from you precisely those workers 
who are the most class-conscious and the staunchest. So 
viet power, they will say, is not becoming, and will not 
become, purely formal; and not only now, when the con 
queror is in Pskov and is making us pay a ten-thousand- 
million-ruble tribute in grain, ore and money, but even if 
he gets as far as Nizhni-Novgorod and Rostov-on-Don and 
makes us pay a tribute of twenty thousand million rubles. 

Never will any foreign conquest render a popular polit 
ical institution "purely formal" (and Soviet power is some 
thing more than a political institution which is far and 
away superior to anything known to history). On the con 
trary, alien conquest will only strengthen popular sym 
pathy for Soviet power, provided provided it does not in 
dulge in reckless follies. 

And to refuse to sign even the vilest peace when you 
have no army would be a reckless folly, for which the peo 
ple would be justified in condemning the government that 
refused to do so. 

Immensely more harsh and humiliating peace treaties 
than the Brest Treaty have been signed in the past 
(we gave some instances above) without discrediting the 
regime or turning it into a formality; they ruined neither 
the regime nor the people, but rather steeled the people, 
taught them the stern and difficult science of building up 
an effective army even in the most desperate conditions 
and under the heel of the conqueror. 

Russia is making for a new and genuine patriotic war, 
a war for the preservation and consolidation of Soviet 
power. It is possible that another epoch will like the 
epoch of the Napoleonic wars be an epoch of liberation 
wars (not one war, but wars) imposed by conquerors upon 
Soviet Russia. That is possible. 



24 



V. I. LENIN 



And, therefore, more humiliating than any harsh or ex 
tremely harsh peace, rendered imperative owing to the 
lack of an army more humiliating than any humiliating 
peace is humiliating despair. We shall not perish even 
from a dozen obnoxious peace treaties if we take revolt 
and war seriously. No conquerors can destroy us if we 
do not destroy ourselves by despair and phrase-mongering. 

Pravda Nos. 37 and 38, Vol. 27, pp. 46-53 

February 28 and March 1, 1918 
Signed: N. Lenin 



SPEECH IN THE MOSCOW SOVIET OF WORKERS , 

PEASANTS AND RED ARMY DEPUTIES 

MARCH 12, 1918 

Verbatim Report 

Comrades, we are celebrating the anniversary of the 
Russian revolution at a time when the revolution is pass 
ing through difficult days, when many are ready to give 
way to despondency and disillusionment. But if we look 
around us, if we recall what the revolution has achieved 
during this past year and how the international situation 
is shaping, then not one of us, I am sure, will find 
room for despair or despondency. There should be no room 
for doubt that the world socialist revolution, begun in 
October, will triumph over all difficulties and obstacles, 
over all its enemies efforts. 

Comrades, remember the way the Russian revolution 
developed. . . . Remember how, in a few days in February, 
thanks to the joint action of the proletariat and the bour 
geoisie, who saw that under tsarlsm even a bourgeois so 
ciety could not exist, thanks to the co-operation between 
the workers and the more enlightened section of the peas 
ants, namely, the soldiers, who had lived through all the 
horrors of war . . . remember how in a few days they suc 
ceeded in overthrowing the monarchy which in 1905, 1906 
and 1907 10 had resisted incomparably heavier blows and 
drowned revolutionary Russia in blood. And when, after 



26 V. I. LENIN 



the February victory, the bourgeoisie found themselves in 
power, the revolution went forward with incredible speed. 
The Russian revolution produced results which sharply 
distinguish it from the revolutions in Western Europe. It 
produced revolutionary people prepared by the events of 
1905 to take independent action; it produced the Soviets 
of Workers , Soldiers and Peasants Deputies, bodies in 
comparably more democratic than all those preceding 
them, able to educate, elevate and lead the downtrodden 
mass of workers, soldiers and peasants. Thanks to these 
circumstances the Russian revolution within a few months 
passed through that era of compromise with the bour 
geoisie which in Western Europe took entire decades. The 
bourgeoisie now say that the working class and its repre 
sentatives, the Bolsheviks, are to blame for the fact that 
the army was unequal to the situation. But we can now see 
that if at that time in March and April power had not 
been in the hands of the conciliators, of the bourgeoisie 
who secured cushy jobs for themselves, and placed the 
capitalists in power while at the same time leaving the 
army ragged and starving, if power had not been in the 
hands of such gentlemen as Kerensky, who called them 
selves socialists, but who actually carried in their pockets 
secret treaties binding the Russian people to fight until 
1918, then perhaps the Russian army and revolution might 
have been spared those incredibly severe trials and humi 
liations through which we have had to pass. If at that time 
power had passed to the Soviets, if the conciliators, in 
stead of aiding Kerensky to drive the army into battle, 
had come forward with a proposal for a democratic peace, 
then our army would not have been so smashed. They 
should have said to it: stand by. In one hand let it hold 
the torn-up secret treaty with the imperialists and the 
proposal to all nations for a democratic peace; in the 
other let it hold rifle and gun, and let the front remain 
absolutely intact. In that case the army and the revolu- 



SPEECH IN THE MOSCOW SOVIET 27 



tion could have been saved. Such a gesture, even before 
an enemy like German imperialism, even if aid were forth 
coming from the whole bourgeoisie, the entire capitalist 
world, all the representatives of the bourgeois parties, 
could, nevertheless, have always been of help. This gesture 
could have put the enemy in a situation where it would 
have seen, on the one hand, the proposed democratic peace 
and the unmasked treaties and, on the other hand, the 
guns. Today we have not got such a strong front. We can 
not reinforce it without artillery. The restoration of the 
front is too difficult, it is proceeding too slowly because 
we have not yet come into contact with the enemy. It 
was one thing to struggle with that idiot Romanov or that 
boaster Kerensky, but here we have an enemy which has 
organised all its forces and the economic life of its coun 
try for defence against the revolution. We knew that in 
June 1917, instead of tearing up the imperialist treaties, 
Kerensky s government hurled the soldiers into the offen 
sive after which their forces were decidedly weakened. And 
now, when the bourgeoisie scream about the unparalleled 
disorganisation and national disgrace, do they imagine that 
the revolution born of war, born of unprecedented destruc 
tion, can develop calmly, smoothly, peacefully, without 
suffering, without torment, without horror? Anyone imag 
ining the revolution beginning in this way is either 
nothing but a phrase-monger, or one of those flabby intel 
lectuals, incapable of understanding the significance of this 
war and of the revolution, who argue in this way. Yes, 
that is how they reason. But to us it is clear that through 
out this whole process a great national upsurge is taking 
place, which those who scream about national disgrace 
do not see. 

However that may be, we have extricated ourselves from 
the war. We are not saying that we extricated ourselves 
without giving anything in return, without paying a price. 
But we managed to get out of the war. We gave the people 



28 V. I. LENIN 



a breathing-space. We do not know how long this breath 
ing-space will last. Possibly it will be exceedingly brief 
because the imperialist robbers are bearing down on us 
from the West and the East, and a new war will inevitably 
begin. We do not close our eyes to the fact that the coun 
try lies in ruins. But the people were able to rid them 
selves of the tsarist government, of the bourgeois govern 
ment, and to create Soviet organisations which only now, 
when the soldiers have returned from the front, have 
reached the remotest villages. The necessity for them and 
their significance have been understood by the lowest 
levels of the people, by the most oppressed, downtrodden 
people, who were wronged and humiliated by tsars, land 
lords and capitalists, and who were seldom able to put 
heart and soul into anything or display their creative abil 
ity. They not only established Soviet power in the large 
towns and factory areas, but also in the most remote cor 
ners of the country. Every peasant who up to now has only 
known oppression and robbery at the hands of the author 
ities, now sees the government of the poor in power, the 
government which he himself elects, which has liberated 
him from oppression and which, despite all the unparalleled 
obstacles and difficulties, will be able to lead him still 
farther forward. 

Comrades, although we now have to live through days 
of heavy defeat and oppression, when the head of the Rus 
sian revolution is under the boot of the Prussian land 
lords and imperialists, I am sure, no matter how great may 
be the anger and indignation in some circles, that deep 
among the people a constructive process is taking place, 
an accumulation of energy and discipline which will give 
us the strength to survive all blows and which proves 
that we have not betrayed, and will not betray, the rev 
olution. If we have been compelled to undergo these trials 
and defeats then this is because the course of history 
does not run smoothly and pleasantly, permitting the work- 



SPEECH IN THE MOSCOW SOVIET 29 

ing people of all countries to rise simultaneously with us. 
We must not forget the sort of enemy we are dealing 
with. The enemies with whom we have had to deal be 
fore Romanov, Kerensky and the Russian bourgeoisie 
stupid, unorganised, uncultured and only yesterday lick 
ing the boots of Romanov and then running about with 
secret treaties in their pockets do these enemies amount 
to anything compared with the international bourgeoisie, 
who have turned all the achievements of the human mind 
into a weapon to suppress the will of the working people 
and have adapted the whole of their organisation to man 
kind s extermination? 

This is the enemy that has hurled itself at us just at the 
moment when we have completely disarmed, when we have 
to state quite openly: we have no army, we are a country 
which has lost its army and is forced to accept a very 
humiliating peace. 

We are not deceiving anybody, we are not betraying any 
one, we are not refusing to aid our brothers. But we shall 
have to accept a very onerous peace, we shall have to 
accept terrible conditions. We shall have to retreat in 
order to gain time while this is still possible, so that our 
allies can come to our aid. And we have got allies. No 
matter how great our hatred of imperialism, no matter how 
strong the emotion, a justified emotion of anger and in 
dignation against it, we must recognise that we are now 
defencists. It is not secret treaties that we are defending, 
we are defending socialism, we are defending our socialist 
fatherland. In order to be able to defend it, however, we 
have had to accept the most bitter humiliation. We know 
that there are periods in every nation s history when it is 
obliged to retreat before the pressure of an enemy with 
stronger nerves. We have gained a breathing-space, and 
we must make use of it so that the army may have some 
sort of respite, so that as a mass (not those tens of thou 
sands in the large cities who attend meetings, but the 



30 



V. I. LENIN 



millions and tens of millions who have dispersed to the 
villages) it should understand that the old war is over, 
and a new war is commencing, a war to which we have 
replied with a peace offer, a war in which we have re 
treated in order to overcome our lack of discipline, our 
inertia, our flabbiness despite which we were able to de 
feat tsarism and the Russian bourgeoisie, but not the 
European international bourgeoisie. If we overcome them 
we shall be the victors, because we have allies, and we 
are convinced of this. 

However viciously the international imperialists now 
behave on seeing our defeat, their enemies, who are our 
allies, are maturing within their own countries. We know 
and have always known for certain that among the German 
working class this process is taking place, perhaps more 
slowly than we expected, than we would have liked, but 
there is no doubt that indignation against the imperialists 
is growing, that the number of our allies in our work is 
increasing and that they will come to our aid. 

You must give all your strength, provide the right watch 
word and enforce discipline. This is our duty to the so 
cialist revolution. Then we shall be able to hold out until 
the allied proletariat comes to our aid and, together, we 
shall defeat all the imperialists and capitalists. 

Izvestia VTslK Vol. 27, pp. 138-42 

No. 47, March 14, 1918 



RESOLUTION OF THE FOURTH EXTRAORDINARY 
ALL-RUSSIAN CONGRESS OF SOVIETS 11 

(MARCH 14-16, 1918) 
RATIFICATION OF THE BREST TREATY 

The Congress confirms (ratifies) the peace treaty con 
cluded by our representatives at Brest-Litovsk on March 3, 
1918. 

The Congress recognises as correct the actions of the 
Central Executive Committee and the Council of People s 
Commissars in deciding to conclude the present incredibly 
harsh, rapacious and humiliating peace in view of the ab 
sence of an army and the extreme war exhaustion of the 
people who have not received the support of the bourgeoi 
sie and bourgeois intelligentsia in their actions, but have 
seen those actions employed for selfish class purposes. 

The Congress also recognises the undoubted correctness 
of the actions of the peace delegation that refused to enter 
into a detailed discussion on the German peace terms, be 
cause those terms were imposed on us in the form of an 
obvious ultimatum and by undisguised force. 

The Congress most insistently presents to all workers, 
soldiers and peasants, to all the working and oppressed 
masses, the main, immediate and most urgent tasks of the 
moment the improvement of the discipline and self-dis 
cipline of the working people, the creation throughout the 
country of strong, well-founded organisations that cover, 



32 V. I. LENIN 



as far as possible, all production and distribution; a ruth 
less struggle against the chaos, disorganisation and eco 
nomic ruin that are historically inevitable as the result 
of the most brutal of wars but which are, at the same time, 
the main obstacle to the complete victory of socialism 
and the strengthening of the foundations of socialist 
society. 

Today, after the October Revolution, after the overthrow 
of the political power of the bourgeoisie in Russia, after 
our denunciation and publication of all secret imperialist 
treaties, after the cancellation of the foreign loans, after 
the workers and peasants government has proposed a just 
peace to all peoples without exception, Russia, having 
escaped from the clutches of the imperialist war, has the 
right to announce that she is not a participant in the 
plunder and suppression of other countries. 

The Russian Soviet Federative Republic, having unan 
imously condemned predatory wars, from now on deems 
it its right and its duty to defend the socialist fatherland 
against all attacks by any of the imperialist powers. 

The OongreSiS, therefore, deems it the unconditional duty 
of all working people to muster all forces to re-establish 
and improve the defence potential of our country, to re 
establish its military strength on the basis of our so 
cialist militia and the universal military training of all 
adolescents and adults of both sexes. 

The Congress expresses its absolute confidence that 
Soviet power, that has valiantly fulfilled all the obligations 
of the international solidarity of the workers of all coun 
tries in their struggle for socialism against the yoke of 
capital, will in future do everything possible to promote 
the international socialist movement, to secure and shorten 
the road leading mankind to deliverance from the yoke of 
capital and from wage slavery, to the creation of a social 
ist society and an enduring, just peace between the 
peoples. 



RESOLUTION ON RATIFICATION OF BREST TREATY 33 

The Congress is firmly convinced that the international 
workers revolution is not far away, that the full victory 
of the socialist proletariat is assured despite the fact that 
the imperialists of all countries do not hesitate to use 
the most brutal means for the suppression of the socialist 
movement. 

Pravda (Sotsial-Demokrat) Vol 27 pp 173-74 

No. 47, March 16, 1918 



REPORT ON FOREIGN POLICY 

DELIVERED AT A JOINT MEETING OF THE 

ALL-RUSSIAN CENTRAL EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE 

AND THE MOSCOW SOVIET 

MAY 14, 1918 

Comrades, permit me to acquaint you with the present 
foreign policy situation. In the past few days our inter 
national position has in many respects become more com 
plicated owing to the aggravation of the general situa 
tion. Because of this aggravation, provocation, the deliber 
ate panic-rnongering of the bourgeois press and its echo, 
the socialist press, is again doing its dark and filthy work 
of repeating the Kornilov affair. 

First, I shall draw your attention to the factors deter 
mining, in the main, the international position of the So 
viet Republic in order to proceed to the outward legal 
forms determining this position, and on the basis of this, 
again to describe the difficulties which have cropped up 
or, to be more precise, outline the turning-point at which 
we have arrived and which is the cause of the worsened 
political situation. 

Comrades, you know, and your knowledge has been par 
ticularly reinforced by the experience of the two Russian 
revolutions, that economic interests and the economic 
position of the classes which rule our state, lie at the root 
of both our home and foreign policy. These propositions 



REPORT ON FOREIGN POLICY 35 

which constitute the basis of the world Marxist outlook 
and have been confirmed for us Russian revolutionaries by 
the great experience of both Russian revolutions, must not 
be forgotten even for a moment if we are to avoid losing 
ourselves in the mazes and labyrinths of diplomatic tricks, 
labyrinths which at times are artificially created and made 
more intricate by people, classes, parties and groups who 
like to fish in muddy waters, or who are compelled to do so. 

The present moment is one in which, despite the exist 
ing international situation, both our counter-revolution 
aries the Cadets,^ bourgeoisie and landlords, and their 
yes-men, the Right Socialist-Revolutionaries and Menshe- 
viks, have been attempting to fish in muddy waters. 

Basically, the position is that the Russian Socialist So 
viet Republic, due to economic and political causes which 
we have described in the press on more than one occasion, 
and of which you are aware, due to a different rate of de 
velopment, a different basis of development than that of 
the West, still remains a lone island in the stormy sea of 
imperialist robbery. The main economic factor in the West 
is that this imperialist war which has tortured and ex 
hausted mankind has given rise to such complicated, such 
acute, such involved conflicts that again and again, at 
every step, the question of war and peace, the solution of 
the question to the advantage of one or other grouping, 
hangs by a thread. We have lived through precisely such 
a situation in the past few days. Contradictions, conflicts, 
struggles and furious clashes developing into war between 
imperialist powers which are unable in their politics to 
stop this war owing to the economic conditions of the de 
velopment of capitalism over a number of decades, make 
it impossible for the imperialists themselves to stop this 
war. This has brought to life the main contradictions, has 
confused and made the situation more complicated. 

Owing to these contradictions the general alliance of the 
imperialists of all countries, forming the basis of the eco- 



36 V. I. LENIN 



nomic alliance of capitalism, the alliance whose natural and 
inevitable aim is to defend capital that recognises no 
fatherland, has proved in the course of many major and 
important episodes in world history that capital places the 
safeguarding of the alliance of the capitalists of all coun 
tries against the working people above the interests of the 
fatherland, of the people or what you will. This alliance is 
not the moving force of politics. 

Of course, as before, this alliance remains the main 
economic trend of the capitalist system which must ulti 
mately rmke itself felt with inevitable force. That the im 
perialist war has divided the imperialist powers which at 
the present moment one may say have divided up the whole 
world among themselves, into hostile groups, into hostile 
coalitions, is an exception to this main tendency of capi 
talism. This enmity, this struggle, this desperate clash, 
proves that in certain circumstances the alliance of world 
imperialism is impossible. We are witnessing a situation in 
which the stormy waves of imperialist reaction, the imperi 
alist slaughter of nations are hurling themselves at the 
small island of the Soviet Socialist Republic, and seemingly 
are ready to drown it any minute, but actually these waves 
only break against each other. 

The basic contradictions between the imperialist powers 
have led to such a merciless struggle that, while recognis 
ing its hopelessness, neither the one, nor the other group 
is in a position to extricate itself from the iron grip of this 
war at will. The war clearly brought out two main contra 
dictions, which in their turn determined the Soviet Social 
ist Republic s present international position. The first is the 
extreme ferocity of the battle being waged on the Western 
front between Germany and Britain. We have heard on 
more than one occasion representatives of the two belliger 
ent groups promise and assure their own people and other 
peoples, that all that is required is one more last effort for 
the enemy to be subdued, the fatherland defended and the 



REPORT ON FOREIGN POLICY 



37 



interests of civilisation and of the war of liberation saved 
for all time. The longer this terrible struggle drags on and 
the deeper the belligerent countries become involved, the 
further off is the way out of this interminable war. And it 
is exactly the violence of this battle that makes extremely 
difficult, well-nigh impossible, an alliance of the great im 
perialist powers against the Soviet Republic, which during 
the bare half-year of its existence has won the warm regard 
and the most whole-hearted sympathy of the class-con 
scious workers of the world. 

The second contradiction determining Russia s interna 
tional position is the rivalry between Japan and America. 
Over several decades the economic development of these 
countries has produced a vast amount of inflammable mate 
rial which makes inevitable a desperate clash between them 
for domination of the Pacific Ocean and the surrounding 
territories. The entire diplomatic and economic history of 
the Far East leaves no room for doubt that under capitalist 
conditions it is impossible to avert the imminent conflict 
between Japan and America. This contradiction, tempora 
rily concealed by the alliance of Japan and America against 
Germany, delays Japanese imperialism s attack on Russia. 
The campaign which began against the Soviet Republic 
(the landing at Vladivostok and the support of the Semyo- 
nov band) is delayed because it threatens to turn the hidden 
conflict between Japan and America into open war. It is 
quite likely, of course, and we must not forget that no mat 
ter how solid the imperialist groupings may appear to be, 
they can be broken up in a few days if the interests of 
sacred private property, the sacred rights of concessions, 
etc., demand it. It may well be that the tiniest spark will 
suffice to blow up the existing grouping of powers, and 
then the afore-mentioned contradictions will no longer pro 
tect us. 

At the moment, however, the situation we have described 
explains why it is possible to preserve our socialist 



V. I. LENIN 



island in the middle of stormy seas, also why its position 
is so unstable, and, at times, to the great joy of the bour 
geoisie and the panic of the petty bourgeoisie, it seems 
that it may be engulfed by the waves any minute. 

The outer aspect, the external expression of this sit 
uation is the Brest Treaty on the one hand, and the customs 
and laws with regard to neutral countries, on the other. 

You know that treaties and laws are worth nothing but 
a scrap of paper in the face of international conflicts. 

These words are usually recalled and quoted as an exam 
ple of the cynicism of imperialist foreign policy; the cyni 
cism, however, lies not in these words, but in the ruthless, 
the cruelly and agonisingly ruthless imperialist war, in 
which all peace treaties and all laws of neutrality have 
been flouted, are flouted and will be flouted, as long as 
capitalism exists. 

That is why, when we come to the most important 
question for us, the Brest peace and the likelihood of its 
violation with all the possible consequences for us- if we 
want to stand firmly on our socialist feet and do not want 
to be overthrown by the plots and provocations of the 
counter-revolutionaries, no matter under what socialist 
labels they disguise themselves, we must not forget for a 
single moment the economic principles underlying all peace 
treaties, including that of Brest-Litovsk, the economic prin 
ciples underlying all neutrality, including our own. We 
must not forget, on the one hand, the state of affairs inter 
nationally, the state of affairs of international imperialism 
in relation to the class which is growing and which sooner 
or later, maybe even later than we desire or expect, but 
which nevertheless will become capitalism s heir and will 
defeat world capitalism. And on the other hand, we must 
not forget the relations between the imperialist countries, 
the relations between the imperialist economic groups. 

Having clarified this situation, I think, comrades, we 
shall not find it difficult to understand the significance of 



REPORT ON FOREIGN POLICY 39 

those diplomatic particulars and details, at times even 
trifles, which mostly occupied our attention during the past 
few days, which have been on our minds during the past 
few days. Clearly, the instability of the international situ 
ation gives rise to panic. This panic emanates from the 
Cadets, the Right Socialist-Revolutionaries and Mensheviks 
who aid and abet the interests of those who want and who 
strive to sow panic. In no way closing our eyes to the full 
danger and tragedy of the situation, and analysing the 
economic relations on an international scale, we must say: 
yes, the question of war and peace hangs by a thread both 
in the West and in the Far East because two trends exist; 
one, which makes an alliance of all the imperialists inevi 
table;, the other, which places the imperialists in opposition 
to each other two trends, neither of which stands on firm 
ground. Yes, now Japan cannot decide to launch a full- 
scale attack, although with her million-strong army she 
could quite easily overrun weak Russia. I do not know, nor 
can anyone know, when this is likely to take place. 

The form of the ultimatum threatens war against the 
allies and a treaty with Germany, but this position can 
change in a few days. There is always the possibility of it 
changing, because the American bourgeoisie, now at log 
gerheads with Japan, can tomorrow come to terms with 
her, because the Japanese bourgeoisie are just as likely 
tomorrow to come to terms with the German bourgeoisie. 
Their basic interests are the same: the division of the world 
between themselves, the interests of the landlords, of capi 
tal, the safeguarding (as they say) of their national self- 
respect and their national interests. This language is suf 
ficiently familiar to those who have, either the misfortune 
or the habit I don t know which of reading newspapers 
like those of the Socialist-Revolutionaries. And when na 
tional self-respect begins to be mentioned frequently we all 
know, we very well know from the experience of 1914, 
what facts of imperialist robbery prompt this. In view of 



40 V. I. LENIN 



this relationship it is clear why the situation in the Far 
East is unstable. One thing must be said: we must have a 
clear understanding of these contradictions of capitalist in 
terests, we must appreciate that the stability of the Soviet 
Republic ensures a growing sympathy towards it from the 
vast mass of working people, all the working and exploited 
people of the world. 

At the same time any day, any moment we must be 
prepared for and expect changes in international politics in 
favour of the policies of the extremist war parties. 

The position of the German coalition is clear to us. At 
the present moment the majority of the German bourgeois 
parties stand for observing the Brest peace, but, of course, 
are very glad to "improve" on it and to receive a few more 
annexations at Russia s expense. What makes them take 
this stand? Political and military considerations of German 
national interests- as they express it imperialist interests 
make them prefer peace in the East, so that their hands 
may be free in the West where German imperialism has 
promised an immediate victory on many occasions, and 
where every week or every month proves that this victory, 
the more the partial successes gained, recedes still further 
into the distance. On the other hand, there is a war party 
which, during discussions on the Brest Treaty, showed 
its hand on a number of occasions, a party which naturally 
exists in all imperialist powers, a war party which says to 
itself: force must be used immediately, irrespective of pos 
sible consequences. These are the voices of the extremist 
war party, known in Germany s history since the time of 
overwhelming military victories, known from 1866, for 
instance, when the extremist war party of Germany defeat 
ed Austria and turned this victory into a complete rout. 
All these clashes, all these conflicts are inevitable and lead 
to a situation where matters now hang by a thread, where, 
on the one hand, the bourgeois imperialist majority of the 
German parliament, the German propertied classes, 



REPORT ON FOREIGN POLICY 41 

German capitalists prefer to stand by the Brest Treaty, 
while, I repeat, not refusing to improve on it. And on the 
other hand, any day, any moment we must be prepared 
for and expect changes in politics in the interests of the 
extremist war party. 

All this explains the instability of the international situ 
ation; all this explains how easy it is, on these grounds, 
for different attitudes to arise in the Party; and all this 
shows what prudence, caution, self-control and presence of 
mind is demanded of Soviet power, so that it may clearly 
define its task. Let the Russian bourgeoisie rush from a 
French to a German orientation. They like doing this. They 
have in several places seen that German support is an ex 
cellent guarantee against the peasants who have taken the 
land, and against the workers who are building the founda 
tions of socialism. Only yesterday, and over a long period, 
over a number of years they branded as traitors those who 
condemned the imperialist war and opened people s eyes to 
its real nature, but now they are all prepared in a few 
weeks to change their political beliefs and to go over from 
an alliance with the British robbers to an alliance with the 
German robbers against Soviet power. Let the bourgeoisie 
of all shades, from the Right Socialist-Revolutionaries and 
Mensheviks to the Left Socialist-Revolutionaries, panic. 
They would be running true to form. Let them spread 
panic, for they are themselves in a panic. Let them rush to 
and fro, unable to do otherwise, vacillating between the 
different orientations and between the absurd phrases that 
fail to take into consideration that to intensify the revolu 
tion when it has attained great proportions, you have to 
live through the most diverse groupings and transitions 
from one stage to another. We Russian revolutionaries 
have had the good fortune in the twentieth century to 
pass through two revolutions, each of which gave us a lot 
of experience that has stamped its impression on the lives 
of the people, the experience of how to prepare a deep- 



42 V. I. LENIN 



going and effective revolutionary movement; how the differ 
ent classes in this movement behave; by what difficult and 
exhausting path, sometimes by a long evolution, the matu 
rity of new classes is growing. 

Remember how hard it was for the Soviets, created by 
the spontaneous outburst in 1905, how hard it was for 
them in 1917 once again to enter the fray, and then, when 
they had to go through all the suffering of conciliation with 
the bourgeoisie and with the hidden, most rabid enemies 
of the working class, who talked of the defence of the 
revolution, of the Red Flag, and committed the greatest of 
crimes in June 1917 13 now, when the majority of the 
working class supports us, remember what it cost after the 
great 1905 Revolution to emerge with Soviets of the work 
ing and peasant classes. Remember all this, and think of 
the mass scale on which the struggle against internation 
al imperialism is developing, think how difficult the tran 
sition to this situation is, and what the Russian Republic 
had to undergo when it found itself ahead of all the remain 
ing divisions of the socialist army. 

I know that there are, of course, wiseacres thinking 
a lot of themselves and even calling themselves socialists, 
who assert that power should not have been taken until the 
revolution breaks out in all countries. They do not realise 
that in saying this they are deserting the revolution to the 
side of the bourgeoisie. To wait until the working classes 
carry out a revolution on an international scale means that 
everyone will remain suspended in mid-air. This is sense 
less. Everyone knows the difficulties of a revolution. It may 
commence with brilliant success in one country and then 
go through agonising periods, since final victory is only 
possible on a world scale, and only by the joint efforts of 
the workers of all countries. Our task consists in being 
restrained and prudent, we must manoeuvre and retreat 
until we receive reinforcements. A change-over to these 
tactics is inevitable, no matter how much they are mocked 






REPORT ON FOREIGN POLICY 43 

by so-called revolutionaries with no idea of what revolu 
tion means. 

Having dealt with the general questions I now want to 
examine the causes of the recent alarm and panic which 
have again enabled the counter-revolutionaries to start 
activities intended to undermine Soviet power. 

I have already mentioned that the outward legal form 
and outer aspect of all international relations of the Soviet 
Socialist Republic are, on the one hand, the Brest-Litovsk 
Treaty, and, on the other, the general law and customs 
defining the status of a neutral country among the other 
belligerent countries; this accounted for the recent difficul 
ties. The conclusion of a full-scale peace with Finland, the 
Ukraine and Turkey was a natural consequence of the 
Brest-Litovsk Treaty, yet we are still at war with these 
countries, and this is not in any way due to our internal 
development, but to the influence of the ruling classes of 
these countries. In these conditions the only temporary 
way out lay in the temporary breathing-space provided by 
the Brest-Litovsk Treaty, the breathing-space which pro 
voked so many futile and unnecessary words about its im 
possibility but which nevertheless turned out to be possible. 
It brought results during the two months, made itself felt 
on the majority of Russian soldiers, enabled them to return 
home and see how things were going, to take advantage of 
the revolution s gains, to work the land, to look around and 
draw new strength for the fresh sacrifices ahead. 

Naturally, this temporary breathing-space appeared to 
be coming to an end when the situation worsened in Fin 
land, the Ukraine and Turkey, when, instead of a full-scale 
peace, we merely obtained a postponement of that self 
same acute economic problem: war or peace? And are we 
to go to war once again, despite all the peaceful intentions 
of Soviet power and its absolute determination to sacrifice 
so-called Great-Power status, i.e., the right to conclude 
secret treaties, to conceal them from the people with the 



44 V. I. LENIN 



assistance of the Chernovs, Tseretelis and Kerenskys, to 
sign secret predatory treaties and conduct an imperialist, 
predatory war? After all, instead of a full-scale peace, all 
that we obtained was a brief postponement of that self 
same acute question of war or peace. 

Here is the result of this situation, and you again clearly 
see what its final outcome boils down to namely, the 
question of what the results will be of the shilly-shallying 
between two groups of hostile imperialist countries the 
American conflict in the Far East, and the German-British 
conflict in Western Europe. It is clear how these contradic 
tions became intensified over the conquest of the Ukraine, 
over the situation which the German imperialists, particu 
larly their main war party, frequently viewed so optimisti 
cally, looked upon as so easy, and which caused precisely 
this extremist German war party such fantastic difficulties. 
It was this situation which temporarily raised the hopes 
of the Russian Cadets, Mensheviks and Right Socialist- 
Revolutionaries, who have become consumed with love for 
that which Skoropadsky brings to the Ukraine, and who 
now hope that this will also be easily achieved in Russia. 
These gentlemen will be mistaken; their hopes will turn to 
dust because . . . (stormy applause), because, I say, that 
same main war party in Germany, which is too accus 
tomed to rely on the power of the sword, even this party 
in these particular circumstances was not supported by 
the majority of the imperialists, those bourgeois imperialist 
circles who saw the unprecedented difficulties in the con 
quest of the Ukraine, in the struggle for the subordination 
of a whole people, in the forced necessity of resorting to a 
terrible coup d etat. 

This main war party created unprecedented difficulties 
in Germany when, having promised its people and the 
workers to achieve supreme victories on the Western Front, 
this extremist war party was forced to recognise that it 
was faced with new, unbelievable economic and political 



OH FdRfiIGN POLICV 45 



difficulties, with having to divert military efforts to tasks 
which also at first seemed easy, and also with having to con 
clude a treaty with the Ukrainian Mensheviks and the Right 
Socialist-Revolutionaries who had signed the peace treaty. 

The extremist war party in Germany reasoned: we shall 
send many troops and obtain grain, but then it became 
necessary to engineer a coup d etat. This turned out to be 
easy there, because the Ukrainian Mensheviks readily sup 
ported this move. But it then turned out that this coup 
d etat creates fresh and gigantic difficulties, because the 
grain and raw materials, without which Germany cannot 
exist, have to be fought for step by step, and their appro 
priation by military force in an occupied country involves 
too great an effort and too many sacrifices. 

Such is the situation that arose in the Ukraine and that 
should have lent wings to the hopes of the Russian 
counter-revolution. It is clear that in this struggle, Russia, 
which had been unable to rebuild her army, suffered and 
suffers further losses. The peace talks led to new, onerous 
conditions, to new open and concealed indemnities. Under 
what decree the Ukraine s frontiers are to be determined 
is not clear. The Rada 14 which signed the decree has been 
removed. The landlord-hetman has been restored instead. 
Because of this uncertainty a whole number of questions 
have emerged which prove that the questions of war and 
peace remain as before. The partial armistice existing be 
tween the Russian and German troops, in no way prede 
termines the general situation. The question hangs in the 
air. The same is true of Georgia where we have a drawn- 
out counter-revolutionary struggle by the government of 
Caucasian Mensheviks, a long struggle by the counter 
revolutionaries calling themselves Social-Democrats. And 
when the victory of Soviet power and the working people, 
having embraced the whole of Russia, has begun to draw 
in the non-Russian outlying areas, when it has become 
quite obvious and beyond all doubt that the victory of 



45 V. i. 



Soviet power, as has been admitted by the counter-revo 
lutionary representatives of the Don Cossacks, cannot be 
delayed, when the Menshevik government in the Caucasus 
has begun to waver the government of Gegechkori and 
Jordania, who realised this too late and started to talk 
about whether to find a common language with the Bolshe 
viks, when Tsereteli, aided by the Turkish troops, showed 
his hand by advancing against the Bolsheviks they will 
reap the same harvest as the Rada. (Applause.) 

Remember, however, that if these smart lads of the Cau 
casian Rada receive the support of the German troops, as 
did the Ukrainian Rada, then there will no doubt be fresh 
difficulties for the Russian Soviet Republic, a new inevi 
tability of war, new dangers and new uncertainties. There 
are people who refer to this uncertainty, to the strain of 
an uncertain situation (in fact such an uncertain situation is 
sometimes worse than any clearly defined one), and say that 
the uncertainty can be easily removed you only have to 
openly demand that the Germans observe the Brest Treaty. 

I happened to hear such naive people, who consider 
themselves to be on the Left, but who in fact only reflect 
the narrow-mindedness of our petty bourgeoisie * 

They forget that you have first to be victorious before 
you can make demands. If you are not victorious the enemy 
can delay his reply or even make no reply at all to your 
demands. That is the law of imperialist war. 

You don t like it. Then succeed in defending your home 
land. For the sake of socialism, for the sake of the working 
class, the worker has every right to defend his homeland. 

I shall only add that this uncertain situation on the 
Caucasian border was a result of the extremely unpardon 
able vacillation of the Gegechkori government which at 
first announced that it did not recognise the Brest peace, 
and then declared its independence, without informing us 



* Phrase omitted, not clear in the verbatim report. Ed. 



REPORT ON FOREIGN POLICY 47 

of what territory this independence covered. We have sent 
innumerable radio-telegrams asking them to please inform 
us of the territory they lay claim to. You have the right to 
claim independence, but since you speak of independence, 
you are bound to say what territory you are representing. 
That was a week ago. Countless radio-telegrams have been 
dispatched, but not a single reply has been received. Ger 
man imperialism is taking advantage of this. It has made 
it possible for Germany, and Turkey as a satellite state, to 
push farther and farther forward, remaining silent, ignor 
ing everything, stating: we shall take whatever we can, we 
are not infringing the Brest peace, because the Transcau- 
casian army does not recognise it, because the Caucasus is 
independent. 

Of whom is the Gegechkori government independent? It 
is independent of the Soviet Republic, but it is dependent, 
just a little, on German imperialism, and quite naturally so. 
(Applause.) 

That is the situation which has developed, comrades an 
acute aggravation of relations in the past few days it is 
a situation which has once again, and fairly obviously, 
confirmed the correctness of the tactics employed by the 
vast majority of our Party, the Russian Communist Party 
of Bolsheviks, and firmly insisted on during recent months, 

We possess great revolutionary experience which has 
taught us that it is essential to employ the tactics of merci 
less attack when objective conditions permit, when the ex 
perience of compromising has shown that the people have 
become angry and that an expression of this change will 
be attack. But we have to resort to temporising tactics, 
to a slow gathering of forces when objective circumstances 
do not favour a call for a general merciless rebuff. 

Whoever opens his eyes to the facts, who is not blind, 
knows that we are merely repeating what we have said 
earlier and what we have always said: that we do not for 
get the weakness of the Russian working class compared 



48 V. 1. LENIN 



to other detachments of the international proletariat. It 
was not our own will, but historical circumstances, the 
legacy of the tsarist regime, the flabbiness of the Russian 
bourgeoisie, that caused this detachment to march ahead of 
the other detachments of the international proletariat; not 
because we desired it, but because circumstances demand 
ed it. We must remain at our post until the arrival of our 
ally, the international proletariat, which will arrive and will 
inevitably arrive, but which is advancing at an immeasur 
ably slower pace than we expect or wish. If we see that 
as a result of objective conditions the international proleta 
riat moves too slowly, we must nevertheless stick to our 
tactics of temporising and utilising the conflicts and contra 
dictions between the imperialists, of slowly accumulating 
strength; the tactics of preserving that island of Soviet 
power in the stormy imperialist sea, maintaining that 
island which attracts the gaze of the working people of all 
countries. That is why we tell ourselves that, if the extre 
mist war party can at any moment defeat any imperialist 
coalition and build a new unexpected imperialist coalition 
against us, we at any rate will not make it any easier for 
them. And if they come against us yes, we are now defen- 
cists we ishall do everything in our power, everything 
within the power of diplomatic tactics, we shall do every 
thing to delay that moment, everything to make the brief 
and unstable respite, given us in March, last longer, for we 
are firmly convinced that behind us are tens of millions of 
workers and peasants who know that with every week and, 
the more so, with every month of this respite they gain 
new strength, they are consolidating Soviet power, making 
it firm and stable. They know that they are introducing a 
new spirit, and that after the attrition and weariness of 
this exhausting, reactionary war, they will create firmness 
and readiness for the last and decisive battle should exter 
nal forces attack the Socialist Soviet Republic. 

We have been defencists since October 25, 1917; we have 



REPORT ON FOREIGN POLICY 49 

won the right to defend our native land. It is not secret 
treaties that we are defending, we have annulled and 
exposed them to the whole world. We are defending our 
country against the imperialists. We are defending and we 
shall win. It is not the Great-Power status of Russia that 
we are defending, of that nothing is left but Russia proper 
nor national interests for we assert that the interests of 
socialism, of world socialism are higher than national inter 
ests, higher than the interests of the state. We are defend 
ers of the socialist fatherland. 

This is not achieved by issuing declarations, but only by 
overthrowing the bourgeoisie in one s own country by a 
ruthless finish started there; and we know that we shall 
win this war. Ours is a small island in the war engulfing 
the imperialist world, but on it we have shown and proved 
to all what the working class can do. This is seen and ack 
nowledged by all. We have proved that we possess the 
right to defend our homeland. We are defencists and look 
upon our task with all the seriousness taught us by the 
four years of war, with all the seriousness and caution 
understood by every worker and peasant who has met any 
soldier and has learned what the soldier has lived through 
in these four years of war the caution which may not be 
understood, which may be sneered at and regarded frivo 
lously only by people who are revolutionaries in word but 
not in deed. Precisely because we support the defence of 
the fatherland we tell ourselves: a firm and strong army 
and a strong rear are needed for the defence, and in order 
to have a firm and strong army we must in the first place 
ensure that the food supplies are on a sound basis. For this 
the dictatorship of the proletariat must be expressed not 
only centrally that is the first step and only the first 
step but there must be dictatorship throughout the whole 
Russia-^that is the second step and only the second 
step which we have not yet carried out sufficiently. Pro 
letarian discipline is essential and necessary for us; real 

42283 



V. I. LENIN 



proletarian dictatorship, when the firm and iron rule of 
class-conscious workers is felt in every remote corner of 
our country, when not a single kulak, not a single wealthy 
person, not a single opponent of the grain monopoly 
remains unpunished, but is found and punished by the iron 
hand of the disciplined dictators of the working class, pro 
letarian dictators. (Applause.) 

We say to ourselves: our attitude to defence of the 
fatherland is a cautious one; it is our duty to do everything 
that our diplomacy can do to delay the moment of war, to 
extend the respite period; we promise the workers and 
peasants to do all we can for peace. This we shall do. And 
bourgeois gentlemen and their hirelings who think that 
just as in the Ukraine where a coup was brought about so 
easily, so it may be possible to give birth to new Skoro- 
padskys in Russia, should not forget that if the war party 
in Germany found it so difficult to effect a coup in the 
Ukraine, it will meet with plenty of opposition in Soviet 
Russia. Everything goes to prove this; Soviet power has 
pursued this line and has made every sacrifice to consoli 
date the position of the working people in the country. 

The situation with regard to peace with Finland may be 
summed up in the words: Fort Ino and Murmansk. Fort Ino, 
which defends Petrograd, lies geographically within the 
Finnish state. In concluding peace with the workers 
government of Finland we, the representatives of socialist 
Russia, recognised Finland s absolute right, to the whole 
territory, but it was mutually agreed by both governments 
that Fort Ino should remain in Russia s hands "for the 
defence of the joint interests of the Socialist Republics", 
as stated in the treaty that was concluded. ^ It is natural 
that our troops should sign this peace in Finland, should 
sign these terms. It is natural that bourgeois and counter 
revolutionary Finland could not but raise a hue and cry 
against this. It is natural that the reactionary and counter 
revolutionary Finnish bourgeoisie would present claims for 



REPORT ON FOREIGN POLICY 



5J 



this stronghold. It is natural that, because of this, the 
question should become acute on a number of occasions 
and should still remain acute. Matters hang by a thread. 
It is natural that the question of Murmansk to which the 
Anglo-French laid claim, should give rise to even greater 
aggravation, because they had spent tens of millions on the 
port s construction in order to safeguard their military rear 
in their imperialist war against Germany. Their respect for 
neutrality is so wonderful that they make use of every 
thing that is in a bad way. Furthermore, sufficient excuse 
for their grabbing proclivities is their possession of a 
battle-ship, while we have nothing with which to chase it 
away. It is natural that all this should have aggravated 
the situation. There is an outer aspect, a legal expression 
resulting from the international position of the Soviet Re 
public, which presumes that it is impossible for armed 
forces of any belligerent state to set foot on neutral terri 
tory without being disarmed. The British landed their mili 
tary forces at Murmansk, and we were unable to prevent 
this by armed force. Consequently, we are presented with 
demands almost in the nature of an ultimatum: if you can 
not protect your neutrality, we shall attack your territory. 
A worker-peasant army, however, has now been formed! 
rallying in the uyezds and gubernias the peasants who had 
returned to their land wrested from the landlords; they 
now have something to defend. An army has been formed 
which has started to build Soviet power and which will 
become the vanguard if an invasion against Russia breaks 
out; we shall rise as one man to meet. the enemy. 

My time is up, and I want to conclude by reading a tele 
gram received by radio from Comrade Joffe, Soviet Ambas 
sador in Berlin. This telegram will show you that, on the 
one hand, you have confirmation from our Ambassador of 
whether my analysis of the international situation is correct 
and, on the other hand, that the foreign policy of our Soviet 
Republic is a responsible one it is a policy of preparation 



V. I. LENIN 



for defence of our country, a steadfast policy, not allowing 
a single step to be taken that would aid the extremist par 
ties of the imperialist powers in the East and West. This 
is a responsible policy with no illusions. There always 
remains the possibility that any day military forces may be 
thrown against us and we, the workers and peasants, 
assure ourselves and the whole world, and shall be able to 
prove, that we shall rise to a man to defend the Soviet Re 
public. I hope, therefore, that the reading of this telegram 
will serve as an appropriate conclusion to my speech and 
will show us the spirit in which the representatives of the 
Soviet Republic work abroad in the interests of the Soviets, 
of all Soviet institutions and the Soviet Republic. 

"The latest radio-telegrams received today report that the German 
War Prisoners Commission is leaving on Friday May 10. We have 
already received a note from the German Government proposing the 
setting up of a special commission to consider all legal questions 
in regard to our possessions in the Ukraine and in Finland, 
agreed to such a commission and have asked you to send the appro 
priate military and legal representatives. Today I had a talk about 
further advances, demands for clearing Fort Ino, and the attitude 
of Russians to Germany. Here is the reply: The German High Com 
mand states that there will be no further advances; Germany s role 
in the Ukraine and Finland has ended. Germany is willing to assist 
our peace talks with Kiev and Helsingfors and is entering into 
negotiations with the governments concerned. As regards Fort Ino, 
in connection with the Finnish peace talks: according to the treaty, 
the forts should be destroyed. Germany considers that when defining 
the frontiers the agreement with the Reds can be accepted; the Whites 
have not yet replied. The German Government declares officially: 
Germany abides firmly by the Brest Treaty, she wants peaceful 
relations with us, she has no aggressive plans and has no intention 
of attacking us in any way. It is promised that, in accordance with 
my request, Russian citizens in Germany will be treated on a par with 
other neutrals." 

Newspaper report published Vol. 27, pp. 329-45 

in Pravda Nos. 93 and 94, 
May 15 and 16, 1918; 
in Izvestia VTsIK 
No. 95, May 15, 1918 



SPEECH ON THE INTERNATIONAL SITUATION 

DELIVERED AT THE SIXTH EXTRAORDINARY 

ALL-RUSSIAN CONGRESS OF SOVIETS OF WORKERS , 

PEASANTS , COSSACKS AND RED ARMY DEPUTIES 16 
NOVEMBER 8, 1918 

(Prolonged applause.) Comrades, from the very begin 
ning of the October Revolution the main question that has 
faced us is that of foreign policy and international rela 
tions. This is not merely because from now on all the states 
in the world are being firmly linked by imperialism into a 
single system, or rather, into one dirty, bloody mass, but 
because the complete victory of the socialist revolution in 
one country alone is inconceivable, and demands the most 
active co-operation of at least several advanced countries, 
amongst whom we cannot include Russia. That is why the 
problem of the extent to which we succeed in broadening 
the revolution also in other countries, the extent to which 
we succeed meanwhile in warding off imperialism, has 
become one of the main problems of the revolution. 

I should like, if I miay, to remind you briefly of the main 
stages of our international policy during the past year. As 
I have already had occasion to point out in my speech on 
the anniversary of the revolution, the main feature charac 
terising our position a year ago was that we were on our 
own. No matter how sound our conviction that a revolu 
tionary force was being and had been created throughout 



54 V. I. LENIN 



Europe and that the war would not end without revolution, 
there were no signs at that time that a revolution had 
begun or was beginning. In these circumstances we could 
do nothing but direct our foreign policy efforts to enlight 
ening the working people of Western Europe. This was 
not because we claimed to be more enlightened than they, 
but because so long as the bourgeoisie of a country have 
not been overthrown, military censorship and that unpre 
cedented blood-thirsty atmosphere which accompanies 
every war, particularly a reactionary one, predominate in 
that country. You are well aware that in the most demo 
cratic, republican countries, war means military censorship 
and unprecedented methods employed by the bourgeoisie 
and the bourgeois military staffs in order to deceive the 
people. It was our task to share our achievements in this re 
spect with other peoples. We did everything possible in this 
connection when we annulled and published the disgrace 
ful secret treaties which the former Tsar had concluded 
with the capitalists of Britain and France to the benefit of 
the Russian capitalists. You know that these were down 
right predatory treaties. You know that the government of 
Kerensky and the Mensheviks kept these treaties secret, 
and upheld them. By way of exception, we come across 
statements in that section of the British and French press 
which is to any degree honest that, thanks only to the 
Russian revolution, the French and the British learned 
much that was material to their diplomatic history. 

We have certainly done very little from the point of view 
of the social revolution as a whole, but what we have done 
has been one of the greatest steps in its preparation. 

If we now make a general survey of the results gained 
by the exposure of German imperialism, we shall see that 
it is now obvious and clear to the working people of all 
countries that they were made to wage a bloody and preda 
tory war. And at the end of this year of war the behaviour 
of Britain and America is beginning to be exposed in the 



SPEECH ON THE INTERNATIONAL SITUATION 55 

same way, since the people are opening their eyes and 
begin to see through their intentions. That is all that we 
have done, but we have done what we could. The exposure 
of these treaties was a blow to imperialism. The terms 
of the peace treaty which we were compelled to conclude 
proved to be a powerful weapon of propaganda and agita 
tion; we did more with them than any other government or 
nation has done. But while it is true that the attempt we 
made to awaken the people did not produce immediate 
results, we never even assumed that the revolution would 
begin immediately, or that all would be lost if it did not. 
During the past fifteen years we have brought about two 
revolutions, and we have clearly seen how much time must 
elapse before they grip the people. Recent events in Aus 
tria and Germany confirm this. We said that we had no in 
tention of allying ourselves with robbers and becoming 
robbers ourselves; no, we expected to arouse the proleta 
riat of the enemy countries. We were jeered at and told 
that we were preparing to arouse the German proletariat 
which would strangle us while we were preparing to 
launch a propaganda attack. But facts have shown that we 
were right to assume that the working people in all coun 
tries are equally hostile to imperialism. They only need to 
be given a certain period for preparation; the Russian peo 
ple, too, despite the memories of the 1905 Revolution, 
required a long period before they again roused themselves 
for revolution. 

Before the Brest peace we did everything in our power 
to strike a blow at imperialism. If the history of the 
growth of the proletarian revolution did not completely 
wipe this out, and if the Brest peace forced us to retreat 
before imperialism, this was because we were insufficiently 
prepared in January 1918. Fate condemned us to isolation, 
and we went through an agonising period after the Brest 
peace, 



56 V. I. LENIN 



Comrades, the four years which we spent in world war 
ended in peace, but in a tyrannical peace. In the final analy 
sis, however, even this tyrannical peace proved that we 
were right and that our hopes were not built on sand. With 
every passing month we became stronger while West- 
European imperialism became weaker. Now, as a result, we 
see that Germany, which six months ago completely ignored 
our Embassy and thought there could be no red insti 
tution there, recently, at any rate, has been weakening. The 
latest telegram informs us of German imperialism s appeal 
to the people to remain calm, and its assurance that peace 
is near at hand. We know what is meant when emperors 
appeal for calm and promise to do what is impossible in 
the near future. If Germany gets peace soon, it will be a 
Brest peace for her, which in place of peace will bring the 
working people more misery than they have ever experi 
enced. 

The results of our international policy shaped in such 
a way that six months after the Brest peace we, from the 
point of view of the bourgeoisie, were a devastated 
country, but, from the proletarian point of view, we were 
rapidly developing and are at the head of the proletarian 
army which has begun to shake Austria and Germany. This 
success vindicated and fully justified all our sacrifices in 
the eyes of any representative of the proletariat. If we 
were to be suddenly wiped out, if our activities were to be 
brought to an end but this is impossible since miracles do 
not happen but if this were to take place, we would be 
justified in saying, without concealing our mistakes, that 
we had made full use of the period, offered us by fate, for 
the world socialist revolution. We have done everything 
we could for the working people of Russia, and we have 
done more than anyone else for the world proletarian 
revolution. (Applause.) 

.Comrades, in recent months, in recent weeks the inter 
national situation has begun to change sharply, until the 



SPEECH ON THE INTERNATIONAL SITUATION 57 

German imperialism was almost completely defeated. All the 
hopes for the Ukraine which German imperialism fostered 
among working people proved to be mere promises. It 
turned out that American imperialism was ready, and a 
blow was struck at Germany. A totally different situation 
has arisen. We have been under no illusions. After the Octo 
ber Revolution we were considerably weaker than imperial 
ism, and even now we are weaker than international imperi 
alism. We must repeat this now in order not to deceive our 
selves: following the October Revolution we were weak 
er and could not fight. And now we are weaker and must 
do everything necessary to avoid a battle with imperialism. 

That we were able to survive a year after the October 
Revolution was due to the split of international imperialism 
into two predatory groups: Anglo-French-American on the 
one hand, and German on the other, which were engaged in 
mortal combat, and which had no time for us. Neither of 
these groups could concentrate considerable forces against 
us, which they would have done had they been in a posi 
tion to do so. They were blinded by the blood-thirsty 
atmosphere of war. The material sacrifices required to 
carry on the war demanded the utmost concentration of 
their efforts. They had no time for us, not because by some 
miracle we were stronger than the imperialists no, that s 
nonsense but only because international imperialism had 
split into two predatory groups which were at each other s 
throats. It is only thanks to this that the Soviet Republic 
was able to openly proclaim battle against the imperialists 
of all countries, depriving them of their capital in the shape 
of foreign loans, slapping them in the face and openly 
emptying their rapacious pockets. 

An end has come to the period of declarations which 
we then made over the correspondence started by the Ger 
man imperialists, even though world imperialism could not 
tear into us as it should have done in accordance with its 
hostility and thirst for capitalist profits, which had been 



58 V. I. LENIN 



incredibly increased by the war. Up till the moment of the 
Anglo-American imperialists victory over the other group 
they were fully occupied fighting among themselves, and 
for this reason could not think of launching a decisive 
campaign against the Soviet Republic. There is no longer a 
second group. Only one group of victors remains. This has 
completely altered our international position, and we must 
take this change into account. The facts show how this 
change bears on the development of the international situa 
tion. Defeated countries are now experiencing the victory 
of the workers revolution, the tremendous growth of 
which is clear to everyone. When we took power in Octo 
ber we were no greater in Europe than a single spark. True, 
the sparks began to fly, and they flew from us. This is the 
greatest thing we managed to do but, even so, these were 
isolated sparks. Now the majority of countries within the 
sphere of German-Austrian imperialism are aflame (Bulga 
ria, Austria, Hungary). We know that after Bulgaria the 
revolution spread to Serbia. We know how these worker- 
peasant revolutions passed through Austria and reached 
Germany. A whole number of countries are enveloped in the 
flames of workers revolutions. In this respect our efforts 
and sacrifices have been justified. They were not adven 
tures, as our enemies slanderously claimed, but an essen 
tial step towards world revolution, which had to be taken 
by the country that had been placed in the lead, despite 
its under-development and backwardness. 

This is one result the most important from the point 
of view of the final outcome of the imperialist war. The 
other result is the one to which I referred earlier, that 
Anglo-American imperialism is now exposing itself in the 
same way as Austro-German did in its time. We can see 
that if, at the time of the Brest negotiations, Germany had 
to some extent been level-headed and able to refrain from 
making gambles, she would have been able to maintain her 
domination, and undoubtedly would have been able to 



SPEECH ON THE INTERNATIONAL SITUATION 59 

secure an advantageous position in the West. She did not 
do this because when a machine like a war involving mil 
lions and tens of millions, a war which inflamed to the 
last degree chauvinist passions, a war which is bound up 
with capitalist interests totalling hundreds of billions of 
rubles when such a machine has gathered full speed there 
are no brakes that can stop it. This machine went farther 
than the German imperialists desired, and they were 
crushed by it. They could not move; they landed in the pre 
dicament of a man who had overeaten, and met his doom 
as a result. And now, before our very eyes, British and 
American imperialism is in this extremely ugly, but, from 
the viewpoint of the revolutionary proletariat, extremely 
useful position. You would have thought they have much 
greater political experience than Germany. Here are people 
accustomed to democratic rule, not to the rule of some 
junker or other, people who endured the most difficult 
period of their history hundreds of years ago. You would 
have thought these people would have retained their pres 
ence of mind. If we were to speak as individuals, from the 
point of view of democracy in general, as bourgeois philis- 
tines, professors, who have understood nothing in the strug 
gle of imperialism and the working class, whether or not they 
were capable of level-headedness, if we reasoned from the 
point of view of democracy in general, then we would have 
to say that Britain and America are countries with a cen 
turies-old tradition of democracy, that the bourgeoisie there 
would be able to hold their ground. If they were to succeed 
now by some means or other in holding on, this would at 
any rate be for a fairly long period. But it seems that the 
same thing is happening to them as to the militarist- 
despotic Germany. In this imperialist war there is a 
tremendous difference between Russia and the republican 
countries. The imperialist war is so steeped in blood, so 
predatory and bestial, that it has effaced even these impor 
tant differences, and in this respect it has brought the 



6Q V. I. LENIN 



freest democracy of America to the level of semi-militarist 
despotic Germany. 

We see that Britain and America, countries which had 
greater opportunities than others for remaining democratic 
republics, have gone out of their way as outrageously and 
insanely, as Germany did in her time, and they, therefore, 
just as quickly, and maybe even faster, are heading to 
wards the end so successfully arrived at by German impe 
rialism. First it incredibly .swelled out over three-quarters 
of Europe, became distended and then burst, leaving 
behind it an awful stench. And now British and American 
imperialism is madly racing to the same end. You only 
have to take a cursory glance at the armistice and peace 
terms which the "liberators" of the peoples from German 
imperialism, the British and Americans, are presenting to 
the defeated nations, to be convinced of this. Take Bulga 
ria. You would have thought that a country like Bulgaria 
could hold no terror for the Anglo-American imperialist 
colossus. Nevertheless, the revolution in this small, weak, 
absolutely helpless country caused the Anglo-Americans to 
lose their heads and present armistice terms that are equiv 
alent to occupation. In this country where a peasants 
republic has been proclaimed, in Sofia, . an important 
railway junction, all the railway lines are now occupied by 
Anglo-American troops. They are forced to fight against 
this little peasants republic. From the military point of 
view this is a trifle. People who take the view of the bour 
geoisie, of the old ruling class, of old military relations, 
merely smile contemptuously. What does this pigmy Bul 
garia signify in comparison with the Anglo-American 
forces? From the military standpoint nothing, but from the 
revolutionary standpoint a great deal. This is not a colony 
where they are used to exterminating the defeated people 
in millions and millions. The British and Americans consid 
er that this is only establishing law and order, introducing 
civilisation and Christianity to savage Africans. But this is 



SPEECH ON THE INTERNATIONAL SITUATION . 61 

not Central Africa. Here the soldiers, no matter how strong 
their army, become demoralised when they corne face to 
face with a revolution. Germany proves this to be no mere 
empty phrase. In Germany, at any rate from the point of 
view of discipline, the soldiers were model army men. But 
when the Germans marched into the Ukraine, factors other 
than discipline came into play. The starving German 
soldier marched for bread, and it would have been unre 
alistic to demand that he should not steal too much bread. 
Moreover, we know that in this country he was most of all 
infected by the .spirit of the Russian revolution. This was 
perfectly understood by the German bourgeoisie and this 
caused Wilhelm to panic. The Hohenzollerns are mistaken 
if they imagine that Germany will shed a single drop of 
blood for them. This is the result of the policy of bellicose 
German imperialism. The same thing is repeating itself so 
far as Britain is concerned. The Anglo-American army is 
already becoming demoralised; this began as soon as it 
launched a ferocious campaign against Bulgaria. And this 
is only the beginning. Austria followed Bulgaria. Permit 
me to read you some of the clauses of the terms dictated 
by the Anglo-American imperialist victors. These are the 
people who most of all shouted to the working people that 
they were conducting a liberation war, that their main 
aim was to crush Prussian militarism which threatened to 
spread the despotic regime over all countries. They 
shouted that they were conducting a liberation war. This 
was a deception. You know that bourgeois lawyers, these 
parliamentarians, who have spent their whole lives learning 
the art of deception without blushing, find it easy to deceive 
each other but when they have to deceive the workers in 
the same way, they don t get away scot-free. British and 
American politicians and parliamentarians are past masters 
at this art. But they will not succeed in their deception. The 
working people, whom they aroused in the name of free 
dom, will come to their senses straight away, and this is 



Q2 V. I. LENIN 



still to be felt when, on a mass scale, not from proclama 
tions (which help, but do not really move the revolution), 
but from their own experience, they see that they are 
being deceived, when they become aware of the peace 
terms with Austria. 

This is the peace now being forced on a comparatively 
weak, disintegrating state, by the people who shouted that 
the Bolsheviks were traitors because they signed the Brest 
peace. When the Germans wanted to send their soldiers 
to Moscow, we said, we would rather all fall in battle 
than agree to this. (Applause.) We told ourselves that 
severe sacrifices would have to be made by the occu 
pied areas, but everybody knows how Soviet Russia helped 
and kept them supplied with necessities. Now the demo 
cratic troops of Britain and France will have to serve to 
"maintain law and order", and this is said when there are 
Soviets of Workers Deputies in Bulgaria and Serbia, when 
there are Soviets of Workers Deputies in Vienna and Bu 
dapest. We know what kind of order this means. It means 
that the Anglo-American troops are called on to play the 
role of throttlers and executioners of the world revolution. 

Comrades, when the Russian serf troops were sent to 
throttle the Hungarian Revolution 17 in 1848, they could get 
away with this because they were serf troops; they could 
get away with this in relation to Poland 1 ^ but it is 
inconceivable that a people who has known freedom for a 
century and who was incited rto hate German imperialism 
because it was a beast which had to be destroyed, should 
not understand that Anglo-American imperialism is the 
same sort of beast whom it would be only just to crush as 
well. 

And now history, with its usual malicious irony, has 
arrived at the point where, after the exposure of German 
imperialism, it is the turn of Anglo-French imperialism to 
utterly expose itself. W e declare to the Russian, German 
and Austrian working people that these are not the Russian 



SPEECH ON THE INTERNATIONAL SITUATION 



63 



serf troops of 1848! They will not get away with this! They 
are trying to suppress people who are making the transi 
tion from capitalism to freedom and they are trying to 
throttle the revolution. We assert with absolute conviction 
that this engorged monster will fall into the same abyss as 
did the monster of German imperialism. 

Comrades, I shall now touch on matters which mainly 
affect us. I shall begin with the peace terms which Germa 
ny will have to sign. The comrades from the Commissariat 
for Foreign Affairs told me that The Times, the chief organ 
of the astoundingly rich British bourgeoisie, which actually 
shapes the whole policy, had already published the terms 
to be imposed on Germany. She is expected to hand over 
Heligoland and the Wilhelmshaven Canal, to give up Es 
sen, where practically all. military equipment is manufac 
tured, to destroy her mercantile fleet, to immediately hand 
over Alsace-Lorraine and to pay indemnities totalling 
60 thousand million, a great part of which must be paid 
in kind because money has depreciated everywhere 
and British merchants too have begun to calculate in other 
currency. We can see that the peace they are preparing 
for Germany will be completely devastating, a far 
more harsh one than the Brest peace. From the view 
point of their material and physical strength they could do 
this, were it not for the existence of Bolshevism, which is 
so odious to them. By imposing this peace they are prepar 
ing their own doom. For this is not taking place in Central 
Africa, but in civilised countries in the twentieth century. 
The once disciplined German soldier who suppressed the 
illiterate Ukrainian population has now buried his disci 
pline; it is all the most certain, therefore, that the British 
and American imperialists will bury themselves when they 
make a gamble which will bring about their political down 
fall, when they assign to their troops the role of throttlers 
and gendarmes of the whole of Europe. For a long time 
they have endeavoured to destroy Russia, and for a long 



64 V. I. LENIN 



time they have had the campaign against her in mind. You 
only have to remember the occupation of Murmansk, the 
millions which they squandered on the Czechoslovak 
Corps, * 9 the treaty which they concluded with Japan; and 
now Britain has a treaty with the Turks which gives her 
Baku so that she may strangle us by depriving us of raw 
materials. 

British troops are ready to start a campaign against Rus 
sia from the south, through the Dardanelles, or through 
Bulgaria and Rumania. They are closing in around the 
Soviet Republic, they are trying to break economic commu 
nications between the republic and the whole world. For 
this reason they compelled Holland to break off diplomatic 
relations with us. 20 When Germany drove out our Ambas 
sador she acted, if not in direct agreement with Anglo- 
French policy, then hoping to do them a service so that 
they should be magnanimous to her. The implication was 
we are also fulfilling the duties of executioner against the 
Bolsheviks, your enemies. 

Comrades, we should say that the chief result of the 
international situation may be described (as I did the 
other day) as that we have never been so near to world 
proletarian revolution as now. We have proved that we 
were not mistaken in banking on the world proletarian rev 
olution. Our great national and economic sacrifices were 
not made in vain. We achieved successes. But if we have 
never before been so close to world revolution, then it is 
also true to say that never have we been in such a danger 
ous situation as now. The imperialists were occupied with 
each other, but now one group has been wiped out by the 
Anglo-French-American group. The members of this group 
consider their main task to be the extermination of world 
Bolshevism, strangulation of its main centre, the Russian 
Soviet Republic. To do this, they intend to surround them 
selves with a Great Wall of China in order to keep out the 
plague, the plague of Bolshevism. These people are trying 



SPEECH ON THE INTERNATIONAL SITUATION 65 

to rid themselves of Bolshevism by going into quarantine, 
but this cannot be done. Even if these Anglo-French impe 
rialist gentlemen, who possess the best technique in the 
world, succeed in building this Great Wall around the re 
public, the germ of Bolshevism will still penetrate the wall 
and infect the workers of all lands. (Applause.) 

Comrades, the West-European press, the press of Anglo- 
French imperialism tries in every way to keep silent about 
its position. No lie or slander is vile enough to use against 
Soviet power. It is true to say now that the whole of the 
Anglo-French and American press is in capitalist hands 
and it controls billions and that in order to suppress the 
truth about Soviet Russia, in order to spread lies and sland 
ers against us, it operates as one syndicate. Yet despite 
the fact that for years there has been a military censorship 
which has succeeded in preventing a word of truth about 
the Soviet Republic from appearing in the press of the 
democratic countries, there is not a single large meeting 
of workers held in any country at which the workers have 
not proved to be on the side of the Bolsheviks, because it 
is impossible to hide the truth. The enemy accuses us of 
implementing the dictatorship of the proletariat. They are 
right we do not hide this. The fact that the Soviet Gov 
ernment is not afraid and openly admits this attracts to its 
side more millions of working people, because the dic 
tatorship it exercises is directed against the exploiters, and 
the working people see and become convinced that the 
struggle we are waging against the exploiters is a serious 
one and will be brought to a serious conclusion. Although 
the European press surrounds us with a conspiracy of 
silence, they have so far announced that they regard it as 
their duty to march against Russia, because Russia surren 
dered to Germany, because Russia is in fact a German 
agent, because the heads of government in Russia, they 
claim, are German agents. New forged documents, for 
which a good price is paid, appear every month proving 

5-2283 



V. I. LENIN 



that Lenin and Trotsky are downright traitors and German 
agents. Despite all this they cannot hide the truth, and 
from time to time there are open signs that the imperi 
alist gentlemen do not feel safe. L Echo de Paris 21 admits: 
"We are going into Russia to break the power of the Bol 
sheviks/ Their official line is that they are not conducting 
a war with Russia, that they are not interfering in military 
matters, but are only fighting German domination. 
Our French internationalists who publish the Third 
International 22 in Moscow, cited this quotation, and 
although we have been cut off from Paris and France 
by an extremely elaborate Great Wall of China, we 
say: you, French imperialist gentlemen, cannot defend 
yourselves against your own bourgeoisie. This small quota 
tion, and not only this one, is, of course, known to hund 
reds of thousands of French workers. They see that the 
declarations of their rulers, of their bourgeoisie, are noth 
ing but lies. Their own bourgeoisie let the cat out of the 
bag; they acknowledge that they want to break the power 
of the Bolsheviks. After four years of bloody war they have 
to tell their people: go and fight again against Russia in 
order to break the power of the Bolsheviks whom we hate 
because they owe us 17 thousand million and don t want 
to pay up, whom we hate because they ill-treat capitalists, 
landlords and tsars. Civilised nations who are reduced to a 
position where they have to admit such things, most of 
all betray the fact that their policy is doomed, and no 
matter how strong they may be militarily we regard their 
strength in a perfectly calm manner and say: but in your 
rear you have an even more terrible enemy the people, 
whom, up to now, you have deceived; so much so that 
your tongue has dried up from the lies and slanders you 
have spread about Soviet Russia. Similar information may 
be gleaned from the British bourgeois newspaper The Man 
chester Guardian of October 23. This bourgeois British 
newspaper writes: "If the Allied armies still remain in 



SPEECH ON THE INTERNATIONAL SITUATION 57 

Russia and still operate in Russia, their purpose can only 
be to effect a revolution in the internal affairs of Russia. 
The Allied governments must, therefore, either ... put 
an end to their operations in Russia or announce that they 
are at war with Bolshevism." 

I repeat that the significance of this small quotation, 
which for us sounds like a revolutionary call, like a power 
ful revolutionary appeal, is that it is written by a bourgeois 
newspaper, which is itself an enemy of the socialists, but 
feels that the truth can no longer be hidden. If bourgeois 
papers write in this way you can imagine what the British 
workers must be thinking and saying. You know the sort 
of language used by the liberals in tsarist times, prior to 
the 1905 and 1917 revolutions. You know that this lan 
guage of the liberals heralded an approaching explosion 
amidst the revolutionary proletariat. From the language 
of these bourgeois British liberals, therefore, you can 
draw conclusions as to what is taking place in the moods, 
minds and hearts of the British, French and American 
workers. Without concealing anything we must, therefore, 
face the bitter truth about our international position. The 
world revolution is close at hand, but it cannot develop ac 
cording to a particular time-table; of this, we who have 
survived two revolutions are well aware. But we know that 
whereas the imperialists are unable to contain the world 
revolution, certain countries are likely to be defeated, and 
still heavier losses are possible. They know that Russia is 
in the birthpangs of a proletarian revolution, but they are 
mistaken if they think that by crushing one centre of the 
revolution they will crush the revolution in other countries. 

We, for our part, must say that the situation is more 
dangerous than ever before, that again and again we shall 
have to strain every effort. During the past year we have 
laid a firm foundation, created a socialist Red Army based 
on a new discipline, and we are absolutely certain that we 
can and must continue the work we are doing. At all meet- 



V. I. LENIN 



ings, at every Soviet institution, at trade union meetings 
and at meetings of Committees of Poor Peasants we must 
say: comrades, we have survived a year and have achieved 
success, but all this is still insufficient when we compare 
it to the powerful enemy bearing down on us. This enemy, 
Anglo-French imperialism, is world-wide, powerful and 
has defeated the whole world. We are going to fight it not 
because we think we are equal ourselves economically and 
technically with the advanced countries in Europe. No, 
but we do know that this enemy is going to topple into 
that same abyss as Austro-German imperialism; we know 
that the enemy which has now ensnared Turkey, seized 
Bulgaria and is intent on occupying the whole of Austro- 
Hungary with the object of establishing a tsarist, gendarme 
regime is heading for its doom. We know that this is a 
historical fact, and that is why, while in no way setting 
ourselves impossible tasks, we say that we can beat off 
Anglo-French imperialism. 

Every step in the strengthening of our Red Army will 
be echoed by a dozen steps in the disintegration of, and rev 
olutions in, this apparently very powerful enemy. There 
fore, there is no cause whatsoever to succumb to despair 
or pessimism. We know that the danger is great. It may 
be that fate has even more bitter sacrifices in store for 
us. Even if they can crush one country, they can never 
crush the world proletarian revolution, they will only add 
more fuel to its flames which will consume all of them. 
(Prolonged applause.) 

Newspaper reports published in Vol. 28, pp. 132-45 

Izvestia VTsIK No. 244, 

November 9, 1918, and in 

Pravda No. 243, November 10, 

1918 

First published in full in 
1919 in The Sixth Extraordinary 
All-Russian Congress of Soviets. 
Verbatim Report, Moscow 



TO THE AMERICAN WORKERS 

Comrades, 

About a year ago, in my letter to the American work 
ers (dated August 20th, 1918) I exposed to you the situa 
tion in Soviet Russia and the problems facing the latter. 
That was before the German revolution. The events which 
since took place in the world s history proved how right 
the Bolsheviks were in their estimation of the imperialist 
war of 1914-1918 in general and of the Entente imperial 
ism in particular. As for the Soviet power it became since 
then understandable and dear to the minds and hearts of 
the working masses of the whole world. Everywhere the 
working people, in spite of the influence of the old lead 
ers with their chauvinism and opportunism penetrating 
them through and through, become aware of the rottenness 
of the bourgeois parliaments and of the necessity of the 
Soviet power, the power of the working people, the dic 
tatorship of the proletariat, for the sake of the emancipa 
tion of humanity from the yoke of capital. And Soviet 
power will win in the whole world, however furiously, 
however frantically the bourgeoisie of all countries rages 
and storms. The bourgeoisie inundates Russia with blood, 
waging war upon us and inciting against us the counter 
revolutionaries, those who wish the yoke of capital to be 
restored. The bourgeoisie inflicts upon the working masses 
of Russia unprecedented sufferings through the blockade 



70 V. I. LENIN 



and through the help it gives to counter-revolution, but 
we have already defeated Kolchak and we are carrying on 
the war against Denikin with the firm assurance of our 
coming victory. 

N. Lenin 
September 23, 1919 



I am often asked, whether those American opponents of 
the war against Russia not only workers, but mainly 
bourgeois are right, who expect from us, after peace is 
concluded, not only resumption of trade relations, but also 
the possibility of receiving concessions in Russia. I repeat 
once more that they are right. A durable peace would be 
such a relief to the working people of Russia that they 
would undoubtedly agree to certain concessions being 
granted. The granting of concessions under reasonable 
terms is desirable also for us, as one of the means of at 
tracting into Russia, during the period of the coexistence 
side by side of socialist and capitalist states, the technical 
help of the countries which are more advanced in this 
respect. 

N. Lenin 
September 23, 1919 

Published in English Vol. 30, pp. 20-21 

December 27, 1919 
in the magazine 
Soviet Russia No. 30 

First published in Russian 
November 7, 1930 in Pravda 
No. 308 



ANSWERS TO QUESTIONS PUT BY A CHICAGO 
DAILY NEWS CORRESPONDENT 

October 5, 1919 

I beg to apologise for my bad English. I am glad to 
answer your few questions: 

1. What is the present policy of the Soviet Government on the 
question of peace? 

2. What, in general outline, are the peace terms put forward by 
Soviet Russia? 

- Our peace policy is the former, that is, we have accepted 
the peace proposition of Mr. Bullitt. 23 We have never 
changed our peace conditions (Question 2), which are for 
mulated with Mr. Bullitt. 

We have many times officially proposed peace to the 
Entente before coming of Mr. Bullitt. 

3. Is the Soviet Government prepared to guarantee absolute non 
intervention in the internal affairs of foreign states? 

We are willing to guarantee it. 

4. Is the Soviet Government prepared to prove that it represents 
the majority of the Russian people? 

Yes, the Soviet Government is .the most democratic gov 
ernment of all governments in the world. We are willing 
to prove it. 



72 V. I. LENIN 



5. What is the position of the Soviet Government in respect of an 
economic understanding with America? 

We are decidedly for an economic understanding with 
America with all countries but especially with America. 

If necessary we can give you the full text of our 
peace conditions as formulated by our government with 
Mr. Bullitt. 

Wl Oulianoff (N. Lenin) 

Published in The Chicago Vol. 30, pp. 32-33 

Daily News No. 257, ., , G , 

October 27, 1919 ^, . Verified with the 

Chicago Daily News text 
First published in Russian in 
1942 



DRAFT RESOLUTION PRESENTED TO THE EIGHTH 

ALL-RUSSIAN CONFERENCE OF THE R.C.P.(B.) 

ON THE QUESTION OF FOREIGN POLICY2* 

The Russian Socialist Federative Soviet Republic wishes 
to live in peace with all peoples and devote all its efforts to 
internal development in order to establish the smooth run 
ning of production, transport and government affairs on 
the basis of the Soviet system; this has so far been pre 
vented by the intervention of the Entente and the starva 
tion blockade. 

The workers and peasants government has made fre 
quent peace proposals to the Entente powers the message 
from the People s Commissariat for Foreign Affairs to the 
American representative, Mr. Poole, on August 5, 1918; to 
President Wilson on October 24, 1918; to all Entente gov 
ernments through representatives of neutral countries on 
November 3, 1918; in a message from the Sixth All-Rus 
sian Congress of Soviets on November 7, 1918; Litvinov s 
note in Stockholm to all Entente representatives on De 
cember 23, 1918; then there were the messages of Jan 
uary 12, January 17 and February 4, 1919 and the draft 
treaty drawn up jointly with Bullitt on March 12, 1919; 
and a message through Nansen on May 7, 1919. 

The Seventh Congress of Soviets fully approves these 
many steps taken by the Council of People s Commissars 
and the People s Commissariat for Foreign Affairs, once 



74 V. I. LENIN 



more confirms its unwavering desire for peace and again 
proposes to the Entente powers, Britain, France, the United 
States of America, Italy and Japan, individually and col 
lectively, to begin immediately negotiations on peace; the 
Congress instructs the All-Russian Central Executive Com 
mittee, the Council of People s Commissars and the Peo 
ple s Commissariat for Foreign Affairs to continue this 
peace policy systematically (or: to continue this peace pol 
icy systematically, adopting all measures necessary for 
its success). 

Written December 2, 1919 Vol. 30, pp. 169-70 

First published in 1932 



REPORT OF THE ALL-RUSSIAN CENTRAL EXECUTIVE 

COMMITTEE AND THE COUNCIL OF PEOPLE S 

COMMISSARS DELIVERED AT THE SEVENTH 

ALL-RUSSIAN CONGRESS OF SOVIETS^ 

DECEMBER 5, 1919 

(Applause. Delegates give Lenin standing ovation.) 
Comrades, in accordance with the decision of the Presi 
dium, I have been entrusted to make a political report 
which is a joint report of the All-Russian Central Executive 
Committee and the Council of People s Commissars. I 
trust that you are not expecting me to enumerate the laws 
and administrative measures introduced by us during the 
year under review. No doubt you are conversant with them 
from the newspapers. Furthermore, small booklets pub 
lished by nearly all our Commissariats are being distrib 
uted to all Congress delegates, describing their main 
activities during the period under review. I should like 
to draw your attention to several overall results, which in 
my view may be deduced from our experience and which 
may serve as useful instructions and material for the 
future work of all comrade-delegates in the localities. 

When speaking of the political results and lessons of 
our activities the Soviet Republic s international position 
comes naturally in the forefront. Both prior to October and 
during the October Revolution, we always said that we 
regard ourselves and can only regard ourselves as one of 



76 V. I. LENIN 



the contingents of the international proletarian army, a 
contingent which came to the fore, not because of its 
level of development and preparedness, but because of 
Russia s exceptional conditions; we always said that the 
victory of the socialist revolution, therefore, can only be 
regarded as final when it becomes the victory of the prole 
tariat in at least several advanced countries. It was over 
this that we had the greatest difficulties. 

Our stake, if you can call it that, on the world revolu 
tion has been fully justified on the whole. But from the 
point of view of the speed of its development we endured 
an exceptionally difficult period; we saw for ourselves that 
the revolution s development in more advanced countries 
proved to be considerably slower, considerably more dif 
ficult, considerably more complicated. This should not sur 
prise us for it was naturally easier for a country such as 
Russia to start a socialist revolution than it was for the 
advanced countries. But, in any case, this slower, more 
complicated, more zig-zag development of the socialist 
revolution in Western Europe burdened us With incredible 
difficulties. The question that primarily comes to mind is: 
how was it possible for such a miracle to take place as So 
viet power holding out for two years in a backward, ruined 
and war-weary country, in the face of the stubborn strug 
gle waged against it first by German imperialism, which at 
that time was considered omnipotent, and then by En 
tente imperialism, which a year ago settled accounts with 
Germany, was unrivalled and lorded it over all the coun 
tries on earth? From the point of view of a simple calcula 
tion of the forces involved, from the point of view of a 
military assessment of these forces, it really is a miracle, 
because the Entente was and continues to be immeasur 
ably stronger than we are. Nevertheless, the year under 
review is noteworthy most of all for our having won a 
tremendous victory, so great a victory that I think we may 
say without exaggeration that our main difficulties are al- 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 77 

ready behind us. No matter how great the dangers and 
difficulties in store for us, evidently the main ones are be 
hind us. We must understand the reasons for this, and, 
what is most important, must correctly determine our 
future policy, since the future will almost certainly bring 
many further attempts by the Entente to repeat interven 
tion, and possibly a rebirth of the previous predatory al 
liance between the international and Russian capitalists 
to restore the power of the landlords and capitalists, to 
overthrow Soviet rule in Russia, in a word, one pursuing 
the old aim of extinguishing the centre of the world social 
ist conflagration the Russian Socialist Federative Soviet 
Republic. 

Looking from this point of view at the history of the 
Entente intervention and its political lesson for us, I would 
say that this history could be divided into three main 
stages, each of which has successively given us full and 
lasting victory. 

The first stage, naturally the most convenient and easiest 
for the Entente, involved their attempt to settle matters 
with Soviet Russia by using their own troops. Of course, 
after the Entente countries had defeated Germany they 
had armies of millions of men who had not yet openly de 
clared for peace and who did not immediately recover from 
the fright given them by the bogey of German imperialism, 
which had been used to scare them in all the Western 
countries. At that time, of course, from the military point 
of view, from the point of view of foreign policy, it would 
have been easy for the Entente countries to take a tenth 
part of their armies and dispatch them to Russia. Note that 
they completely dominated on sea, they had complete nav 
al supremacy. Troop transportation and supplies were al 
ways completely under their control. Had the Entente 
countries, who hated us as only the bourgeoisie can hate 
the socialist revolution, then been able to fling with any 
success even a tenth part of their armies against us, there 



78 V. I. LENIN 



cannot be the slightest doubt that the fate of Soviet Russia 
would have been sealed and it would have met the same 
doom as Hungary. 

Why did the Entente countries fail to achieve this? They 
landed troops in Murmansk. The drive into Siberia was 
undertaken with the aid of Entente troops, and Japanese 
troops continue to hold a distant slice of Eastern Siberia, 
while military units, even though they were not big, of 
all the Entente states were to be found all over Western 
Siberia. Then French troops were landed in the south of 
Russia. That was the first stage of international interven 
tion in our affairs, the first attempt, so to speak, to crush 
the Soviets with troops taken by the Entente from their 
own countries, i.e., with the aid of workers and peasants 
of the more advanced countries, who were splendidly 
equipped, and, generally speaking, as far as the technical 
and material prerequisites for the campaign were con 
cerned, the Entente countries lacked nothing. There were 
no obstacles confronting them. How, then, are we to ex 
plain the failure of that attempt? It ended in the Entente 
countries having to withdraw their troops from Russia, be 
cause they proved incapable of waging a struggle against 
revolutionary Soviet Russia. That, comrades, has always 
been our main and principal argument. From the very out 
set of the revolution, we have said that we constitute a 
party of the international proletariat, and that, however 
great the difficulties facing the revolution, there would 
come a time when, at the most decisive moment, the sym 
pathy, the solidarity of the workers oppressed by interna 
tional imperialism would make itself felt. For this we were 
accused of being Utopians. But experience has shown that 
while we cannot always and in all cases rely on action 
by the proletariat, at any rate we may say that during 
these two years of the world s history we have been proved 
correct a thousand times. The attempt by the British and 
French to crush Soviet Russia with their own troops, an 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 79 

attempt that promised them certain and very easy success 
in a minimum of time, ended in failure: the British troops 
have left Archangel, and the French troops that had landed 
in the South were all taken back home. Despite the block 
ade, despite the ring encircling us, news does reach us 
from Western Europe, we do get British and French news 
papers, however sporadically, from which we learn that 
letters sent by British soldiers from the Archangel Region 
reached Britain and were published there. We know that 
the name of the Frenchwoman, Comrade Jeanne Labourbe, 
who engaged in communist activity among French sol 
diers and workers and was shot in Odessa, became known 
to the entire French proletariat and became a battle-cry, 
a name around which all French workers, irrespective of 
the apparently insurmountable factional trends of syndi 
calism, united for action against international imperialism. 
The words of Comrade Radek, who fortunately, as today s 
reports state, has been liberated by Germany and whom 
we shall perhaps see soon, that the soil of Russia, aflame 
with the fire of revolution, would prove inaccessible to 
the Entente troops these words, which seemed to be just 
a writer s flight of fancy, proved to be an exactly realised 
fact. Despite all our backwardness, despite all the burden 
of our struggle, the workers and peasants of Britain and 
France were incapable of fighting us on our own soil. The 
result was a victory for us. The first time that they 
tried to send massive military forces against us and 
without them victory is impossible the only result was 
that, thanks to their correct class instinct, the French and 
British soldiers brought home from Russia the very ulcer 
of Bolshevism that the German imperialists were fighting 
when they expelled our envoys from Berlin.26 They thought 
they would fortify themselves in this way against the ulcer 
of Bolshevism, which now spreads over the whole of Germa 
ny in the shape of a strengthened labour movement. The vic 
tory we won in compelling the evacuation of the British 



30 V. I. LENIN 



and French troops was the greatest of our victories over 
the Entente countries. We deprived them of their soldiers. 
We answered unlimited military and technical superiority 
of the Entente countries by depriving them of it, thanks 
to the solidarity of the working people against the impe 
rialist governments. 

This revealed how superficial and inexact it is to judge 
these so-called democratic countries by the accepted cri 
teria. Their parliaments have stable bourgeois majorities. 
This they call "democracy . Capital dominates and weighs 
down everything and causes them to continue to resort to 
military censorship. And they call that "democracy". 
Among the millions of copies of their newspapers and 
magazines you will be hard put to find more than a few 
that contain even a hint of anything favourable about the 
Bolsheviks. That is why they say: "We are protected 
against the Bolsheviks, there is order in our countries," 
and they call it "democracy". How could it happen that a 
small section of British soldiers and French sailors were 
able to compel the withdrawal of the Entente troops from 
Russia? There is something wrong here. It means that even 
in Britain, France and America the mass of the people are 
for us; it means that all these external features, as has al 
ways been asserted by socialists who have refused to be 
tray socialism, are a deception; it means that the bour 
geois parliamentary system, bourgeois democracy, bour 
geois freedom of the press are merely freedom for the 
capitalists, freedom to bribe public opinion, to exert pres 
sure on it by all the power of money. That is what social 
ists have always said until the imperialist war scattered 
them to their national camps and turned each national 
group of socialists into lackeys of their bourgeoisie. That 
was said by socialists before the war, that was always 
said by the internationalists and Bolsheviks during the 
war and it all proved to be absolutely correct. All the 
external features, all the window-dressings, are a decep- 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 81 

tion; and this is becoming increasingly obvious to the peo 
ple. They all shout about democracy, but in no parliament 
in the world did they dare to say that they were declaring 
war on Soviet Russia. That is why we read in the numer 
ous French, British and American publications now to 
hand the proposal to "place the heads of states in the 
dock for having violated the Constitution, for waging war 
on Russia without declaring war". When and where was it 
sanctioned, what article of the Constitution, what Parlia 
ment sanctioned it? Where did they gather their parlia 
mentary representatives together, even after taking the 
precaution to imprison all Bolsheviks and near-Bolsheviks, 
to use the expression of the French press? Even under 
those conditions they did not dare to state in their parlia 
ments that they were fighting Russia. That was why the 
splendidly armed, previously undefeated troops of Britain 
and France were unable to defeat us and departed from 
the Archangel Region in the North, and from the South. 

That was our first and main victory, because it is not 
only a military victory, and not even a military victory 
at all, but actually a victory of that international solidarity 
of the working people for which we began the whole rev 
olution, and which we pointed to and said that, however 
numerous the trials we would have to undergo, all these 
sacrifices would be repaid a hundredfold by the develop 
ment of the world revolution, which is inevitable. It was 
apparent from the fact that in the sphere where the gross 
est and the material factors play the greatest part, name 
ly, in the military sphere, we defeated the Entente coun 
tries by depriving them of the workers and peasants in 
soldier s uniforms. 

The first victory was followed by the second period of 
Entente intervention in our affairs. Each nation is headed 
by a group of politicians who possess wonderful exper 
ience, and that is why, after losing this stake, they made 
another stake, taking advantage of their dominant posi- 

62283 



82 V. I. LENIN 



tion in the world. There is not a single country, not a single 
bit of the earth s surface, which is not in fact totally 
dominated by British, French and American finance cap 
ital. That was the basis for the new attempt they made, 
namely, to compel the small countries surrounding Russia, 
many of whom were liberated and able to declare them 
selves independent only during the war Poland, Estonia, 
Finland, Georgia, the Ukraine, etc., to compel these small 
states to go to war against Russia on British, French and 
American money. 

You may remember, comrades, the report in our news 
papers of a speech by the well-known British Minister 
Churchill, in which he said that 14 states would attack 
Russia and that September would see the fall of Petrograd, 
and December that of Moscow. I heard that Churchill then 
disclaimed this report, but it was taken from the Swedish 
Folkets Dctgblad Politiken of August 25. But even if this 
source proved unreliable we know that Churchill and the 
British imperialists acted precisely in this way. We are 
perfectly well aware that everything was done to exert 
pressure on Finland, Estonia and other small countries, in 
order to persuade them to wage war on Soviet Russia. I 
happened to read a leading article in The Times, the most 
influential bourgeois newspaper in Britain, a leader written 
when Yudenich s troops, obviously supplied, equipped and 
conveyed aboard Entente ships, were a few versts away 
from Petrograd, and Detskoye Syelo had been taken. The 
article was a veritable onslaught, in which the maximum 
pressure was exerted military, diplomatic and histori 
cal. British capital flung itself on Finland and faced 
her with an ultimatum: "The eyes of the whole world 
are on Finland," said the British capitalists, "the 
entire fate of Finland depends on whether it understands 
her role, whether she will help to crush the filthy, dirty, 
bloody wave of Bolshevism and liberate Russia." And in 
return for this "great and moral" work, for this "noble, 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 



civilised" work, Finland was promised so many million 
pounds, such-and-such a piece of territory, and such-and- 
such benefits. And what was the result? There was a time 
when Yudenich s troops were a few versts away from 
Petrograd, when Denikin stood to the north of Orel, when 
the slightest assistance to them would have quickly settled 
the fate of Petrograd to the advantage of our enemies, in 
a minimum of time and at negligible cost. 

The entire pressure of the Entente was brought to bear 
on Finland, which is over head and ears in debt to them. And 
not only in debt: Finland cannot carry on for one month 
without the aid of these countries. How did the "miracle" 
happen that we won the battle against such an enemy? 
And we did win it. Finland did not enter the war, Yudenich 
was defeated, so was Denikin, and that at a time when 
joint action by them would most surely, most swiftly have 
led to the settling of the whole struggle to the advantage 
of international capitalism. We won the battle with inter 
national imperialism in this most serious and desperate 
trial of strength. But how did we do it? How could such 
a "miracle" have taken place? It took place because the 
Entente made the same stake as all capitalist states, which 
operate wholly and solely by deception and pressure; that 
was why everything they did aroused such resistance that 
the result was to our advantage. We were very poorly 
armed, worn out, and we said to the Finnish workers, 
whom the Finnish bourgeoisie had crushed: "You must 
not fight against us." The Entente countries appeared in all 
the strength of their armaments, of their external might, 
with their food supplies with which they were in a position 
to provide these countries, and demanded that they fight 
against us. We won this battle. We won because the En 
tente countries now had no troops of their own to fling 
against us, they had to resort to the forces of the small 
nations, but here, not only the workers and peasants, but 



84 V. I. LENIN 



even the considerable section of the bourgeoisie that had 
crushed the working class, did not after all go against us. 

When the Entente imperialists spoke of democracy and 
independence, these nations had the impudence, from the 
Entente viewpoint, and from our viewpoint, the foolish 
ness, to take these promises seriously and to understand 
independence as really implying independence, and not a 
means of enriching the British and French capitalists. They 
thought that democracy meant to live as free men, and not 
that all American multimillionaires should be able to 
plunder their country, or that every tinpot aristocrat of 
an officer should be able to behave like a cad and turn 
into a brazen black-marketeer prepared, for the sake of a 
few hundred per cent profit, to do the dirtiest of jobs. 
That was how we won victory! The Entente encountered 
opposition to the pressure they exerted on these small 
countries, on each of thes e 14 countries. The Finnish bour 
geoisie, which employed White Terror to crush tens of 
thousands of Finnish workers and which knows that this 
will not be forgotten, that the German bayonets that made 
this possible no longer exist this Finnish bourgeoisie hates 
the Bolsheviks as intensely as an exploiter would hate the 
workers who kicked him out. Nevertheless this Finnish 
bourgeoisie said to themselves: "If we follow the instruc 
tions of the Entente, that means we shall undoubtedly lose 
all hope of independence." And this independence was 
given to them by the Bolsheviks in November 1917, when 
Finland had a bourgeois government. The attitude of wide 
sections of the Finnish bourgeoisie, therefore, proved to 
be one of vacillation. We won the battle with the Entente 
countries because they counted on the small nations and 
at the same time repelled them. 

This experience confirms, on an enormous, global scale, 
what we have always said. There are two forces on earth 
that can decide the destiny of mankind. One force is inter 
national capitalism, and should it be victorious it will dis- 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 35 

play this force in countless atrocities this may be seen 
from the history of every small nation s development. The 
other force is the international proletariat, which fights 
for the socialist revolution through the dictatorship of the 
proletariat, which it calls workers democracy. Neither the 
vacillating elements here in Russia, nor the bourgeoisie of 
the small countries believed us; they called us Utopians or 
bandits or even worse, for there is no stupid and monstrous 
accusation that they will not fling at us. But when 
they squarely faced the issue of either going with the En 
tente countries and helping them to crush the Bolsheviks, 
or of helping the Bolsheviks by neutrality, it turned out 
that we won the battle and got that neutrality. We had no 
treaties, whereas Britain, France and America had all sorts 
of promissory notes, all sorts of treaties, yet the small na 
tions did as we wanted them to; they did so not because 
the Polish, Finnish, Lithuanian or Latvian bourgeoisie de 
rived satisfaction from conducting their policy in a way 
that suited the Bolsheviks that, of course, is nonsense 
but because our assessment of the historical forces involved 
was correct; the issue was: either brute capital would be 
victorious, and then, even if it were in the most democratic 
republic, it would crush all the small nations of the world 
or the dictatorship of the proletariat would be victorious, 
the sole hope of all working people and of the small, down 
trodden and weak nations. It turned out that we were right 
not only in theory, but also in practical world politics. 
When this battle for the troops of Finland and Estonia 
took place we won it, although they could have crushed 
us with insignificant forces. Despite the fact that the En 
tente countries threw the whole weight of their financial 
pressure, their military might, and their food supplies into 
the fray, in order to compel Finland to take action, we won 
the battle. 

That, comrades, was the second stage of international 
intervention, our second historic victory. Firstly, we won 



V. I. LENIN 



the workers and peasants away from Britain, France and 
America. These troops could not fight against us. Secondly, 
we won away from them these small countries, all of which 
are against us, and in which not Soviet, but bourgeois 
rule dominates. They displayed friendly neutrality towards 
us and acted contrary to the desires of that mighty world 
force, the Entente, for it was a beast that wanted to crush 

them. 

We witness here on a world scale the same thing that 
happened to the Siberian peasants, who believed in the 
Constituent Assembly and helped the Socialist-Revolutio 
naries and Mensheviks to join forces with Kolchak and to 
strike at us. When they learned to their own cost that 
Kolchak represented the dictatorship of the very worst 
exploiters, a plunderous dictatorship of landlords and ca 
pitalists which was worse than that of the tsar, they or 
ganised the tremendous number of revolts in Siberia about 
which comrades have given us exact reports, and which 
now guarantee the complete return to us of Siberia, this 
time politically conscious. What happened to the Siberian 
muzhik, with all his backwardness and political ignorance, 
has now happened on a broader scale, on a world scale, 
with all the small nations. They hated the Bolsheviks; some 
of them had suppressed the Bolsheviks with a bloody hand, 
with furious White Terror, but when they saw their "libe 
rators", the British officers, they understood the meaning 
of British and American "democracy". When the represen 
tatives of the British and American bourgeoisie appeared 
in Finland and in Estonia, they began to suppress more 
brazenly than the Russian imperialists had, because the 
Russian imperialists were representatives of the old times 
and did not know how to suppress properly, whereas these 
people do know, and go about it thoroughly. 

That is why this victory at the second stage is a far more 
lasting one than is now apparent. I am .not exaggerating 
at all, and consider exaggerations to be extremely dan- 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 87 

gerous. I have not the slightest doubt that further attempts 
will be made by the Entente to set now one, now another 
of our small neighbouring states against us. Such attempts 
will occur because the small states are wholly dependent 
on the Entente, because all this talk about freedom, inde 
pendence and democracy is just hypocrisy, and the En 
tente may compel them once again to raise their hands 
against us. But if this attempt has been foiled at such a 
convenient moment when it was so easy to wage a 
struggle against us, we may, I think, say definitely that in 
this regard the main difficulty is undoubtedly behind us. 
We are entitled to say this, and do so without the slightest 
exaggeration, fully conscious that the Entente countries 
possess a tremendous advantage in strength. We have won 
a lasting victory. Attempts will be made against us, but 
we shall defeat them with greater ease, because the small 
states, despite their bourgeois system, have become con 
vinced by experience, not theory these gentlemen are 
theory-proof that the Entente is a more brazen and 
predatory brute than the one they have in their minds when 
they think of the Bolsheviks, the bogey used for scaring 
children and cultured Philistines all over Europe. 

But our victories were not limited to this. In the first 
place we won over to our side the workers and peasants 
of the Entente countries; secondly, we gained the neutral 
ity of the small nations under the Entente s domination 
and, thirdly, we began to win over, within the Entente 
countries, the petty bourgeoisie and educated urban petty 
bourgeoisie who had been completely opposed to us. To 
prove this I will quote the newspaper L Humanite of Octo 
ber 26 which I have here. This newspaper, which always 
belonged to the Second International, was rabidly chauvin 
istic during the war, adhered to the viewpoint of such 
socialists as our Mensheviks and Right Socialist-Revolu 
tionaries, and still plays the role of a conciliator, now 
announces that it has become convinced of a change in 



gg V. I. LENIN 



mood among the workers. It saw this, not in Odessa, but 
on the streets and at meetings in Paris, when the workers 
stopped everyone who dared say a word against Bol 
shevik Russia. As politicians who have learned a fair 
amount during the course of several revolutions, as per 
sons who understand what the people represent, they dare 
not say a word in favour of intervention, and are all speak 
ing against it. Moreover, it is not only the socialists who 
say this (they call themselves socialists, although for a 
long time we have been aware what sort of socialists they 
are); the same issue of L Humanite of October 26, which I 
quoted, contains a statement by a whole number of French 
intellectuals, of French public opinion. In this statement, 
headed by the signature of Anatole France and including 
that of Ferdinand Buisson, I counted the names of 71 bour 
geois intellectuals famed throughout France, who state that 
they are against intervention in Russia s affairs, because 
the blockade and the attempt to starve her out, from which 
children and the aged perish, are incompatible with culture 
and civilisation; that they cannot tolerate this. The well- 
known French historian Aulard, who supports the bour 
geois point of view to the hilt, writes in his letter: "As a 
Frenchman I am an enemy of the Bolsheviks, as a French 
man I support democracy, it is ridiculous to suspect me &lt; 
the contrary, but when I read that France invites Germany 
to participate in the blockade of Russia, when I read that 
France has approached Germany with this proposal then 
I feel myself blushing with shame." It may be that these 
are just fine words on the part of an intellectual, but we 
are justified in saying that this is the third victory won 
by us over imperialist France, within the country itself. 
That is the implication of this statement, feeble and pa 
thetic as it is, the statement of intellectuals whose bark, as 
we know from hundreds of examples, is worse than their 
bite, but who serve as a good barometer, an indicator of 
the trend developing amongst the petty bourgeoisie, of the 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 89 

way in which public opinion is reacting, permeated as it is 
with bourgeois sentiment. If we have achieved such results 
within France herself, where all the bourgeois papers write 
about us only in the most lying terms, then we say to 
ourselves: it looks like a second Dreyfus case 27 is be 
ginning in France only on a much larger scale. At that time 
the bourgeois intellectuals fought against clerical and mili 
tary reactionaries, while the working class could not con 
sider it their business, as the objective conditions were 
absent, the deep revolutionary feeling of today did not 
then exist. And now? If, after the recent electoral victory 
of the most rabid reaction and in the face of a regime 
hostile to the Bolsheviks, the French bourgeois intellec 
tuals say that they are ashamed of the alliance between 
reactionary France and reactionary Germany the object of 
which is to starve out the workers and peasants o|f Russia 
by famine then we can &gt;say to ourselves: this, comrades, 
is the third and greatest of victories. And I should like to 
see how, with this situation within the country, Clemen- 
ceau, Lloyd George and Wilson will carry out their plan 
of fresh attacks on Russia, of which they dream. Just try 
it, gentlemen! (Applause.) 

Comrades, I repeat, that it would be a great mistake to 
jump to hasty conclusions because of all this. There can 
be no doubt that the imperialists will resume their at 
tempts, but we are absolutely confident that these at 
tempts, no matter by what powerful forces they may be 
undertaken, will end in failure. We can say that the Civil 
War which we conducted with such tremendous sacrifices, 
ended in victory. It was victorious, not only on the Rus 
sian scale, but on a world-historical scale. Every conclu 
sion that I have presented to you has been based on the 
results of the military campaign. That is why, I repeat, 
new attempts are doomed to failure because the imperial 
ists have become much weaker and we have become much 
stronger after our victory over Kolchak, over Yudenich, 



90 V. I. LENIN 



and the complete victory over Denikin which is in its 
early stages, but which is imminent. Did not Kolchak have 
the aid of the all-powerful Entente? Did not the peasants 
of the Unals and Siberia who returned the smallest number 
of Bolsheviks to the Constituent Assembly, solidly support 
the Constituent Assembly front, at that time the front of 
the Mensheviks and Socialist-Revolutionaries? Were not 
they the best human material against the Communists? Is 
it not a fact that Siberia was a country where landed estates 
were non-existent and where we were not immediately able 
to assist the mass of peasants as we were able to help the 
Russian peasants elsewhere? What did Kolchak lack to 
defeat us? He lacked what all imperialists lack. He re 
mained an exploiter. He had to act in the backwash of a 
world war, in circumstances which gave him the chance 
to merely babble about democracy and freedom, but which 
made a dictatorship possible: either the dictatorship of the 
exploiters, who frenziedly defend their privileges and in 
sist on payment of the tribute on the bills, whereby they 
wish to squeeze billions out of all peoples, or the dictator 
ship of the workers which fights the power of the capital 
ists and strives to firmly safeguard the power of the work 
ing people. It was only because of this that Kolchak came 
to grief. This is the way not by voting which is, of 
course, in certain circumstances not a bad way in which 
indeed the Siberian and Ural peasant has chosen his des 
tiny. He was dissatisfied with the Bolsheviks in the sum 
mer of 1918. He saw that the Bolsheviks forced him to 
sell his surplus grain at a non-speculative price and he 
turned to Kolchak. Now he hais seen, compared and arrived 
at a different conclusion. He has understood, despite 
all that he has been taught in the past, because he has 
learned from his own experience what many Socialist-Rev 
olutionaries and Mensheviks do not want to understand 
(applause) that there can be only two dictatorships, that 
it. is necessary to choose either the dictatorship of the 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 91 

workers and this means to assist all working people to 
throw off the yoke of the exploiters or the dictatorship 
of the exploiters. We have won the peasants to our side, 
we have proved in practice through the most bitter experi 
ence, through unprecedented difficulties that we, as repre 
sentatives of the working class, can lead the peasants 
better, with greater success than any other party. Other 
parties like to accuse us of carrying on a struggle against 
the peasants, of being unable to arrive at a proper agree 
ment with them, and they all offer their kind, noble serv 
ices to reconcile us With the peasants. We are most grate 
ful to you, gentlemen, but we do not think that you will 
succeed. We, at any rate, have shown long ago that we 
have been able to do this. We did not paint rosy pic 
tures for the peasant saying that he would be able to make 
the transition from capitalist society without iron disci 
pline and the firm rule of the working class; or that the 
mere counting of votes would decide the world-historical 
problem of the struggle with capital. We said openly: dic 
tatorship is a harsh word, severe and even bloody, but we 
said that the dictatorship of the workers will ensure the 
end of the yoke of the exploiters, and we proved to be 
correct. The peasant, having experienced both dictator 
ships, chose the dictatorship of the working class, and 
will go forward with it to complete victory. (Applause) 
Comrades, from what I have said about our international 
successes it follows and, I think, it is not necessary to 
dwell at length on this that we must repeat our peace 
proposal in a manner that is calm and business-like to the 
maximum degree. We must do this because we have al 
ready made such a proposal many times. Each time we 
made this proposal, we gained something in the eyes of 
every educated man, even if he was our enemy, and that 
educated man blushed with shame. That was the case 
when Bullitt came here, was received by Comrade Chiche- 
rin, talked with him and with me, and when we concluded 



92 V. I. LENIN 



a preliminary agreement on peace in the course of a few 
hours. And he assured us (those gentlemen like to boast) 
that America is everything, and who would care about 
France in view of America s strength? But w r hen we signed 
the agreement the French and British ministers made this 
gesture. (Lenin made an expressive gesture with his foot. 
Laughter.) Bullitt was left with a useless piece of paper 
and he was told: "Who could have expected you to be 
so naive and so foolish as to believe in the democracy of 
Britain and France?" (Applause.) The result is that in the 
same issue I read the full text of the agreement with Bul 
litt in French and it was published in all the British and 
American newspapers. The result is that they are showing 
themselves to the whole world to be either rogues or in 
fants let them take their choice! (Applause.) All the sym 
pathies even of the petty bourgeoisie, even of those bour 
geois who have any sort of an education and who recall 
how they once fought their own tsars and kings, are on 
our side, because we signed the hardest possible peace 
terms in a business-like manner and said: "The price of 
the blood of our workers and soldiers is too high for us; 
we shall pay you businessmen a heavy tribute as the price 
of peace; we consent to a heavy tribute to preserve the 
lives of our workers and peasants." That is why I think 
there is no reason for us to dwell long on this, and in 
conclusion I shall read a draft resolution that will express, 
in the name of the Congress of Soviets, our unwavering 
desire to pursue a policy of peace. (Applause.) 

Now I wish to pass from the international and military 
section of our report to the political. 

We have gained three tremendous victories over the En 
tente, and they were not just military victories. They were 
victories achieved by the dictatorship of the working class, 
and each victory strengthened our position, not only be 
cause it has weakened our enemy and has lost him his 
troops; our international position strengthened because 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 93 

each time we won out in the eyes of all toiling mankind 
and even of many members of the bourgeoisie. In this con 
nection, the victories which we won over Kolchak and 
Yudenich, and are now winning over Denikin, will make 
it possible in the future to gain much greater sympathy 
by peaceful means. 

We have always been accused of terrorism. This is a 
current accusation which is never absent from the pages 
of the press. We are accused of conducting terrorism on 
principle. To this we reply: "You yourselves do not believe 
this slander." The historian Aulard who sent a letter to 
L Humanite, writes: "I have studied and taught history. 
When I read that the Bolsheviks are freaks, monsters and 
scarecrows, I say: the same sort of thing was written about 
Robespierre and Danton. I in no way compare these great 
men to the present Russians, nothing of the sort, there is 
absolutely no resemblance between them. But as a histor 
ian, I say you cannot believe every rumdur." When a bour 
geois historian begins to speak in this way we see that 
the lie being spread about us fizzles out. We say that terror 
was thrust on us. They forget that terrorism was provoked 
by the attack of the omnipotent Entente. Is it not terror 
when the world s fleet blockades a starving country? Is it 
not terror when foreign representatives, relying on their 
so-called diplomatic immunity, organise whiteguard in 
surrections? There must, after all, be a more sober look 
at things. It must be understood that international imperial 
ism has staked everything on suppressing the revolution, 
that it stops at nothing and says: "For one officer one 
Communist, and we shall win." And they are right. If we 
had attempted to use words and persuasion to influence 
these troops which were created by international bandits, 
which the war has brutalised, to influence them other than 
by resorting to terror, we would not have held out even 
two months; we would have been fools. The terror has been 
forced on us by the terror of the Entente, the terror of 



4 V. I. LENIN 



mighty world capitalism which has been throttling the 
workers and peasants, and is condemning them to death 
by starvation because they are fighting for their country s 
freedom. Our every victory over this prime cause of 
and reason for the terror will inevitably and invariably 
mean that in our administration we shall do without this 
means of persuasion and influence. 

What we say about terrorism also applies to our atti 
tude towards all waverers. We are accused of having 
created extraordinarily difficult conditions for the middle 
sections of the population, for the bourgeois intellectuals. 
We reply that the imperialist war was a continuation of 
imperialist politics and for this reason it led to revolution. 
During the imperialist war everyone felt that the war was 
being conducted by the bourgeoisie in their own selfish 
interests, that in this war the people die while the bour 
geoisie profit. This is the basic motive inspiring the policy 
of the bourgeoisie in all countries, which is their undoing 
and which will seal their fate. Our war is the continuation 
of the politics of revolution, and every worker and peas 
ant knows, and if he does not know then he instinctively 
feels and sees, that this is a war of defence against the 
exploiters, a war demanding the greatest sacrifices from 
the workers and peasants, but which stops at nothing 
in order to ensure that these sacrifices are also borne by the 
other classes. We know that it is more difficult for them 
than it is for the workers and peasants, because they have 
belonged to a privileged class. But we say that when it 
is a case of freeing millions of working people from exploi 
tation, a government that held back from making other 
classes bear the burden, would not be a socialist govern 
ment, but a traitor government. If we have burdened the 
middle classes it is because we have been placed in extra 
ordinarily difficult conditions by the Entente governments. 
Every step in our victories as we see it from the exper 
ience of our revolution, though I cannot deal with this in 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 5 

detail is characterised by the fact that through all the 
waverings and innumerable attempts to return to the 
past, more and more waverers are becoming convinced that 
there really is no other choice but the dictatorship of the 
working people or the rule of the exploiters. If these 
waverers have had a hard time of it, this is not the fault 
of Bolshevik rule, but the fault of the whiteguards, the 
fault of the Entente, and a victory over them will be a 
real and sound condition for improving the lot of all these 
classes. In this connection, comrades, I should like, in pass 
ing on to the lessons of the political experience within 
the country, to say a few words about the war s sig 
nificance. 

Our war is the continuation of the politics of revolu 
tion, the politics of overthrowing the exploiters, capitalists 
and landlords. The workers and peasants are therefore 
drawn to our side despite the infinite gravity of our war. 
War is not only a continuation of politics, it is the epitome 
of politics, political education in this unprecedented- 
ly difficult war which the landlords and capitalists have 
brought down on us With the aid of the mighty Entente. 
The workers and peasants have learned a great deal dur 
ing this ordeal. The workers have learned how to use 
state power, and how to utilise every step for propaganda 
and education, how to make the Red Army, consisting 
mainly of peasants, a weapon for their education, how to 
make the Red Army an instrument for utilising bourgeois 
specialists. We know that in their overwhelming majority 
these bourgeois specialists are against us, and must be 
against us in their overwhelming majority due to their 
class character; we need have no doubts on this score. 
Hundreds and thousands of these specialists have be 
trayed us, and tens and tens of thousands have come to 
serve us more faithfully, because in the course of the 
struggle itself they were drawn to us, because that rev 
olutionary enthusiasm which did wonders in the Red 



96 V. I. LENIN 



Army arose because we served and satisfied the inter 
ests of the workers and peasants. This situation, in which 
masses of workers and peasants act in harmony and know 
what they are fighting for, has had its effect, and still 
larger and larger sections of people who have come over 
to our side from the other camp, at times unconsciously, 
have turned and are turning into our conscious supporters. 

Comrades, the task which now confronts us is to trans 
fer the experience gained during our military activities to 
the sphere of peaceful construction. There is nothing which 
fills us with so much joy or which gives us such an op 
portunity of greeting the Seventh All-Russian Congress of 
Soviets as the turning-point in the history of Soviet Rus 
sia, as the fact that the main period of the civil wars lies 
behind us, and that ahead of us lies the main period of 
peaceful construction which means so much to all of us, 
which we desire, which we must carry out and to which 
we shall dedicate all our energies and our whole lives. We 
can now say, on the basis of the severe ordeals of the 
war, that in the main, in the military and in the internation 
al sphere, we are victorious. The path of peaceful con 
struction opens out before us. We have, of course, to re 
member that the enemy is always watching every step 
we take and will make many more attempts to overthrow 
us by all the means that lie in his power: by force, fraud, 
bribery, conspiracies, etc. Our task is to direct all the ex 
perience gained in war towards the solution of the main 
questions of peaceful construction. I shall enumerate these 
main questions. First and foremost there is the question of 
food supplies, the question of grain. 

We have carried out a most difficult struggle against 
prejudices and old customs. On the one hand, the peasant 
is a toiler, who for decades has suffered the oppression of 
the landlord and capitalist; with the instinct of the op 
pressed man he knows that they are beasts whom rivers of 
blood will not prevent from attempting to regain their 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 97 

power. On the other hand, the peasant is a small pro 
prietor. He wants to sell his grain freely, he wants "free 
dom of trade", he does not understand that the free sale 
oi gram in a starving country means freedom for specula 
tion, freedom for the rich to make profits. And we say that 
we shall never agree to this, we would sooner die than 
make this concession. 

We know that in this cas e we conduct a policy whereby 
the workers persuade the peasants to loan them grain, be 
cause the piece of paper the peasants receive in return is 
not equivalent to the grain s value. The peasant sells us 
grain at fixed prices but does not receive goods in return 
because we have none; instead he receives a piece of col 
oured paper. He is giving us the grain as a loan and we 
say to him: "If you are a toiler, can you deny that this is 
fair? How can you not agree that it is essential to loan 
the existing grain surpluses at fixed prices and not to 
dispose of them at speculative prices, since speculation 
means a return to capitalism, a return to exploitation, to 
all that we have fought against?" It was extremely difficult 
to do this, and we hesitated a good deal. We have gained 
this fundamental experience although we have taken many 
steps gropingly and continue to do so. When you hear the 
report of Comrade Tsyurupa or of others concerned with 
food supplies you will see that when the government says 
to the peasants they must loan their grain they are becom 
ing accustomed to this compulsory delivery, for we have 
information from a number of volosts of its 100 per cent 
fulfilment. Although the successes are meagre, they are 
nevertheless successes, and our food supply policy en 
ables the peasants to understand more and more clearly: 
if you want free sale of grain in a ruined country, go back, 
try out Kolchak and Denikin! We shall fight against this 
to the last drop of blood. There can be no concessions in 
this. On this fundamental question, the question of grain, 
we shall fight with all our might to prevent speculation, 

72283 



98 V. I. LENIN 



to see that the sale of grain should not enrich the rich, 
and that all grain surpluses raised on state land by the 
efforts of generations of toilers, should be the property of 
the state; that now, When the state is impoverished, these 
surpluses should be loaned by the peasants to the workers 
state. If the peasant does this, we shall pull out of all our 
difficulties, we shall rehabilitate industry, and the worker 
will repay his debt to the peasant a hundredfold. He and 
his children will be guaranteed a livelihood without hav 
ing to work for the landlord and the capitalist. That is 
what we tell the peasant, and he is becoming convinced 
there is no alternative. The peasant is being convinced of 
this, not so much by us, as by our enemies, Kolchak and 
Denikin. They, more than anybody else, are giving the 
peasant practical lessons of life, and turning him to our 
side. 

However, comrades, after the problem of grain there is 
the second question that of fuel At the moment suffi 
cient stocks of grain have been collected in the grain-grow 
ing regions to feed the starving workers of Petrograd and 
Moscow. But if you walk through the workers districts 
of Moscow you will find them in the grip of the most 
frightful cold, frightful calamity, intensified owing to the 
fuel problem. Here w&gt;e are going through a desperate crisis, 
we are far behind the demands of the situation. Recently 
a number of meetings of the Council of Defence and the 
Council of People s Commissars were devoted entirely to 
working out measures for solving the fuel crisis. Comrade 
Ksandrov has supplied material for my speech which shows 
that we have begun to emerge from this desperate crisis. 
At the beginning of October 16,000 trucks were loaded in 
a week; by the end of October this figure had dropped to 
10,000 a week. This was a crisis, a catastrophe; it meant 
hunger for the workers of a whole number of factories 
in Moscow, Petrograd and a number of other places. The 
results of this catastrophe are felt even today. And then 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 99 

we came to grips with the problem, bent all our energies 
on solving it, and did the same as we had done in relation 
to military matters. We said: all socially conscious work 
ers must throw their full weight into solving the fuel prob 
lem, not in the old capitalist way, when the speculators 
were given a bonus and enriched themselves on contracts 
no, we said: solve this problem in a socialist way, by 
self-sacrifice; solve this problem in the same way that we 
saved Red Petrograd, liberated Siberia, by which we gained 
victory in all those difficult moments, in face of all the 
difficult problems of the revolution and by which we shall 
always be victorious. From loading 12,000 trucks in the 
last week of October we now load 20,000. We are emerg 
ing from this catastrophe, but we are far from having 
solved the problem. It is essential that all workers know 
and bear in mind that without bread for the people, with 
out bread for industry, that is without fuel, the country 
is doomed to calamity. And this applies not only to us. 
Today s newspapers carry the news that in France, a vic 
torious country, the railways are grinding to a halt. What 
can you expect of Russia? France will crawl out of the 
crisis the capitalist way, the way of enrichment of the 
capitalists and continued deprivation of the people. So 
viet Russia will emerge from the crisis through the dis 
cipline and self-sacrifice of the workers, through a firm 
attitude towards the peasants, that firm attitude, which in 
the final analysis, the peasant can always understand. The 
peasant will learn from experience that no matter how dif 
ficult the transition, no matter how firm the state rule 
of the workers, it is the rule of the toiler who is fighting 
for the alliance of the working people, for the complete 
abolition of all exploitation. 

There is yet a third scourge bearing down on us, lice, 
typhus, which is mowing down our troops. Comrades, it is 
impossible to imagine the dreadful situation in the locali 
ties afflicted with typhus, when the population is broken, 



100 v - L LENIN 



weakened, without material resources, When all life, all 
public life ceases. To this we say: "Comrades, everything 
must be concentrated on this problem. Either the lice will 
defeat socialism, or socialism will defeat the lice!" And 
here too, comrades, by using the same methods as else 
where, we are beginning to achieve success. There are still 
some doctors, of course, who hold preconceived notions and 
have no faith in workers rule, who prefer to draw fees 
from the rich rather than fight the severe battle With ty 
phus. But these are in the minority, they are becoming 
fewer, and the majority are those who see that the people 
are struggling for their very existence, who realise that 
by their struggle the people desire to solve the fundament 
al question of preserving civilisation. These doctors are 
behaving in this arduous and difficult matter with no less 
self-sacrifice than any military specialists. They are willing 
to put themselves at the service of the working people. I 
must say that we are beginning to emerge also from this 
crisis. Comrade Semashko has given .me some informa 
tion about this work. According to news from the front, 
122 doctors and 467 field nurses arrived at the front be 
fore October 1. One hundred and fifty doctors have been 
sent from Moscow. We have reason to believe that by 
December 15 another 800 doctors will have arrived at 
the front to help in the battle against typhus. We must pay 
great attention to this scourge. 

We must concentrate on consolidating our foundation: 
grain, fuel, and the battle against typhus. I particularly 
wished to mention these matters because a certain lack 
of co-ordination has been noted in our socialist construc 
tion, and understandably so. When people decided to 
transform the whole world, it is only natural that inex 
perienced workers and inexperienced peasants are drawn 
into this work. There can be no doubt that a considerable 
period must elapse before we are able to correctly deter 
mine where to chiefly concentrate our attention. It is not 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 101 

surprising that such great historical tasks frequently give 
rise to great visions, which develop side by side with many 
small, unsuccessful dreams. There have been many in 
stances when we wanted to build a house from above, 
starting from a small upper wing, ia cornice, but paid no 
real attention to the foundations. I must tell you that from 
my own experience, from my observations of the work 
being performed, it is my opinion that the essential task 
for our policy is to lay that foundation. It is necessary for 
every worker, every organisation, every institution to bear 
this in mind at every meeting. If we are able to supply 
grain, if we succeed in increasing the fuel supply, if we 
bend all our energies to wiping out typhus in Russia, 
which comes from a lack of culture, from poverty, 
backwardness and ignorance, if we devote all the strength 
and experience gained by us in a bloody war, to this blood 
less war we can be certain that we shall achieve even 
greater successes in this work, which is, after all, much 
easier land much more humane than a war. 

We have carried out military mobilisation. The parties 
which were our most uncompromising opponents, which 
to a far greater extent than others supported and still 
support the idea of capitalism, like the Socialist-Revolu 
tionaries, for instance, have had to recognise, despite all 
the accusations rained on us by the bourgeois imperial 
ists, thait the Red Army has become a People s Army. This 
indicates that in this most difficult task we achieved the 
alliance of the working class with the great mass of peas 
ants who are coming over to the side of the working class, 
and we have, by this means, shown the peasants what is 
meant by the leadership of the working class. 

The words "dictatorship of the proletariat" frighten the 
peasants. This is a bogey for the Russian peasants. They 
turn their backs on people who try to scare them with this 
bogey. But they now realise that, while the words "dicta 
torship of the proletariat" are probably very wise Latin 



102 v - I- LENIN 



words, in practice they stand for that selfsame Soviet 
power which transfers the state apparatus to the workers. 
This being the case, it is the true friend and ally of the 
working people and the merciless enemy of any form of 
exploitation. That is why we shall ultimately defeat all 
imperialists, for we possess a deep source of strength, a 
broad and deep-rooted reservoir of human material, such 
as has never been accessible to any bourgeois government 
and never will, We possess the material from which we 
can draw ever greater and more profound strength, pro 
ceeding not only from the most advanced workers to the 
middle sections, but even lower down the scale, to the 
toiling peasants, the poor peasants and the very poor peas 
ants. The Petrograd comrades have recently said that 
Petrograd has given up all its workers and can supply no 
more. But when a critical hour struck, Petrograd proved to 
be remarkable, as Comrade Zinoviev justly remarked, 
proved to be the town which gave birth to new forces as 
it were. Workers, who had no experience in politics or go 
vernment, who were considered to be below the middle 
sections, drew themselves up to their full stature, gave a 
mass of forces for propaganda, agitation, organisation, per 
formed new miracles. We have an enormous source for 
further miracles. Every new section of the workers and 
peasants who have not yet been drawn into the work is 
our true friend and ally. At the present moment we have 
quite often to rely on a very small section of leading work 
ers in state administration. In the course of our Party work 
and our Soviet practice we must repeatedly approach non- 
Party people, approach non-Party workers and peasants 
more boldly, not with the object of winning them to our 
side immediately, or of drawing them into the Party that 
is not so important for us but making them understand 
that their help is needed to save the country. When the 
people, whom the landlords and capitalists least of all 
permitted to participate in running the state, are brought 



REPORT OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 103 

to realise that we are calling on them to join us in building 
the solid foundation for the Socialist Republic, then our 
cause will be once and for alii invincible. 

That is why, on the basis of two years experience, we 
can say to you with absolute certainty that every step in 
our military victories will with terrific speed bring closer 
the time now very near when we can devote the whole 
of our energy to peaceful construction. On the basis of 
experience gained, we can guarantee that in the next few 
years we shall perform even greater miracles in peaceful 
construction than we did in the two years of victorious 
war against the all-powerful Entente. (Applause.) 

Comrades, in conclusion, allow me to read to you the 
draft resolution, which I now present to you. 

"The Russian Socialist Federative Soviet Republic wishes 
to live in peace with all peoples and devote all its efforts 
to internal development in order to establish the smooth 
running of production, transport and government affairs 
on the basis of the Soviet system; this has so far been 
prevented by the intervention of the Entente and the star 
vation blockade. 

"The workers and peasants government has made 
frequent peace proposals to the Entente powers the mes 
sage from the People s Commissariat for Foreign Affairs 
to the American representative, Mr. Poole, on August 5, 
1918; to President Wilson on October 24, 1918; to all 
Entente governments through representatives of neutral 
countries on November 3, 1918; in a message from the 
Sixth All-Russian Congress of Soviets on November 7, 
1918; Litvinov s note in Stockholm to all Entente repre 
sentatives on December 23, 1918; then there were the mes 
sages of January 12, January 17 and February 4, 1919 and 
the draft treaty drawn up jointly with Bulllitt on March 12, 
1919; and a message through Nansen on May 7, 1919. 

"The Seventh Congress of Soviets fully approves these 
many steps taken by the Council of People s Commissars 



104 V. I. LENIN 



and the People s Commissariat for Foreign Affairs, once 
more confirms its unwavering desire for peace and again 
proposes to the Entente powers, Britain, France, the United 
States of America, Italy and Japan, individually and col 
lectively, to begin immediately negotiations on peace; the 
Congress instructs the All-Russian Central Executive Com 
mittee, the Council! of People s Commissars and the 
People s Commissariat for Foreign Affairs to continue this 
peace policy systematically, taking all appropriate meas 
ures to ensure its success." 



Published December 7, 9 and 10, 1919 Vol. 30, pp. 183-209 

in Pravda Nos. 275, 276 and 277 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF THE ALL-RUSSIAN 
CENTRAL EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE AND THE COUNCIL 
OF PEOPLE S COMMISSARS DELIVERED AT THE FIRST 
SESSION OF THE ALL-RUSSIAN CENTRAL EXECUTIVE 

COMMITTEE OF THE SEVENTH CONVOCATION 
FEBRUARY 2, 1920 

Comrades, my report on the activities of the Council 
of People s Commissars and the All-Russian Central Execu 
tive Committee, whose functions in the intervals between 
meetings have been carried out by the Presidium of the 
All-Russian Central Executive Committee, falls naturally 
into two main subdivisions, the first is international 
policy, the Soviet Republic s international position, and the 
second is internal construction and our main economic 
tasks. Allow me to present to you in that order the main 
facts of our work during the period under review, i.e., dur 
ing the past two months. 

As far as the Soviet Republic s international position is 
concerned, the main factor determining this position was 
the successes of the Red Army. As you know, the last 
remnants of Koichak s army in the Par East have almost 
been wiped out, while the rivalry and enmity between 
Japan and America, nominally allies, are becoming more 
and more obvious and prevent them from fully developing 
their onslaught against the Soviet Republic. After the 
annihilation of Yudenich s troops and after the capture, in 
the South, of Novocherkassk and Rostov-on-Don in early 



106 V. I. LENIN 



January, their main forces suffered so decisive &lt;a blow that 
the Soviet Republic s military position radically changed, 
and although the war was not over, every state clearly 
saw that its previous hopes of crushing the military 
forces of the Soviet Republic had been dashed. 

Acknowledgement of this radical change in the Soviet 
Republic s international position was shown by the radio 
message to us (not delivered officially) of the decision of 
the Allied High Command adopted on January 16 to lift 
the blockade against the Soviet Republic. The main section 
of the decision taken by the High Command reads: (reads). 28 

There is no need for me to criticise the diplomacy 
contained in this formulation; it is so striking that it is 
not worth dwelling on the fact that the attitude of the Al 
lies to Russia remains unchanged. If that is how the Allies 
understand their policy that it is unchanged by the lifting 
of the blockade, then it shows how untenable their policy is. 
The importance of this decision for us, however, lies in its 
economic, not political, aspect. Lifting the blockade is 
a fact of major internationail significance showing that a 
new stage in the socialist revolution has begun, For the 
blockade was in fact the principal, the really strong weap 
on wielded by the imperialists of the world for strangling 
Soviet Russia. 

At the last Congress of Soviets I had occasion to state 
and expound the idea that the struggle against Soviet Rus 
sia resulted, not only in the workers and peasants of 
France, Britain and other advanced countries forcing the 
imperialists to renounce the struggle, but in the mass of 
the petty bourgeoisie within these countries becoming 
opponents of the blockade. And of course, this opposi 
tion by the middle sections of the population in countries 
like Britain and France was bound to influence internation 
al imperialist policy. Knowing their brand of diplomacy, 
we cannot expect them to act in a straightforward manner, 
without any reservations, without wanting to restore the 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 



past, to slip in by some cunning trick or other their 
previous policy which at the moment they cannot openly 
pursue. It must be said, however, that on the whole we 
have gained tremendous victories, that we were even able 
to deprive the Allies of the weapon which only they pos 
sessed the navy, despite the fact that waverers tried to 
scare us by saying the navy was invincible. Nevertheless, 
the development of political relations proved that even this 
invincible navy was unable to venture against us. We, who 
were unable to put up any naval resistance, forced the 
imperialist powers to abandon this weapon. 

Of course, this change in policy on the international 
scene does not have an effect immediately, but the fact re 
mains that we have now entered the sphere of world-wide 
international relations, and this enabllies us to get support 
from the more advanced countries. It is true that econom 
ically and financially these countries are in a sorry plight, 
they are all going downhill, and we cannot rely on much 
from them; but with the opportunity to develop our own 
industry, we can count on .receiving machinery for pro 
duction, machinery for restoring our industry. And above 
all, that which had cut us off completely, by means of the 
blockade, from the advanced countries, has been broken 
down. 

After the Allied High Command had been forced to 
abandon this weapon our victories in the field of interna 
tional politics continued, the greatest of them being that 
we succeeded in concluding peace with Estonia. We re 
ceived a communication from Joffe and Gukovsky today 
saying: "Today, February 2 at 2 a.m. Moscow time, peace 
was signed between Russia and Estonia. The Estonian Min 
ister of Foreign Affairs, Birk, arrived from Revel to sign 
the document." 

Comrades, the text of this peace document which was 
discussed at great length and is of tremendous importance 
has been sent by courier who should arrive tomorrow 



108 v - T - LENIN 



morning, but we have now received the exact text by 
telegraph, and it will be distributed tomorrow. It will be 
discussed and ratified. This document is of the highest im 
portance to us. The peace treaty between Russia and Esto 
nia is of epoch-making significance. We have succeeded in 
concluding a peace treaty with a government which is also 
becoming democratic and whose relations with us will 
now be stable, but which up to now was supported by the 
whole imperialist world. Therefore we must regard this as 
an act of tremendous historical importance. 

We know that people who stand between imperialism 
and democracy usually go over to one side or the other. 
So you see, we have undoubtedly gained a victory, because 
peace has been signed, and now this government must 
come out against our enemy. The significance of this fact 
from the point of view of principle is that in the imperial 
ist epoch the whole world is split into a vast number of 
big and small states, the small states being absolutely 
helpless, an insignificant group in relation to the rich pow 
ers which completely dominate a number of small, weak 
states. Imperialism is the epoch in which the division of the 
whole world takes place, when the whole of the world s 
population is divided into a minority of exploiting oppres 
sor countries, and a majority of countries with small, weak 
population, existing in a state of colonial dependence. 

When we gained peace with Estonia we proved that we 
were able to go forward as a proletarian and communist 
state. How? Alii the belligerent Entente powers, opposed 
to peace, have been shown that the sympathy we are able 
to evoke from our opponents and bourgeois governments, 
that the sympathy of a small country is more powerful 
than all that military oppression, all that financial aid and 
all those economic ties which link this small country to 
the omnipotent states. The Entente has seen that we are 
able to win not only when we use force, and we are in a 
position to refute the lie and slander spread against us by 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 1Q9 

the bourgeois governments of the world when they say 
the Bolsheviks only retain power by force. What was it 
that enabled us to prevail over the united forces of world 
imperialism in regard to Estonia, a country which had 
always suffered violence at the hands of tsarist, landlord 
Russia? It was the fact that we proved our ability to re 
nounce the use of force at the appropriate moment and in 
all sincerity, in order to change to a peace policy, so win 
ning the sympathy of the bourgeois government of a small 
country, regardless of all the support given it by inter 
national capital. This is a fact of historical significance. 
Estonia is a small country, a smalll republic, but it is op 
pressed economically and militarily in a thousand and one 
ways by world imperialist capital, so much so that its en 
tire population comes under this oppression. And now this 
peace proves that we can, in spite of our exhaustion, weak 
ness and disarray, gain the upper hand over the white- 
guard army with its imperialist backing. The powerful 
Entente knows how to reply to force with even more tri 
umphant force, but this peace proves that it is not by 
resorting to force that we are able to win the sympathy 
and support of the bourgeoisie. 

A most difficult international! problem had arisen in this 
respect. The rate of capitalist development in different 
countries varies; it takes place under different conditions, 
in various ways and by various means. The socialist re 
public of one country exists alongside all the capitalist 
countries of the world and causes their bourgeoisie to 
waver. The conclusions they arrived at were: "Your posi 
tion is a hopeless one; even if you defeated the white- 
guards by force, what are you going to do with the rest 
of the world?" We shall defeat it also. The peace with 
Estonia proves that this is no empty phrase. The entire 
pressure of international capital was overcome in that 
area where our rejection of the usie of force was recognised 
to be sincere. International capital said: "Don t make peace 



110 V. I. LENIN 



with the Bolsheviks, otherwise we shall conquer you by 
starvation; we shall give you neither financial nor eco 
nomic aid." And Estonia proved to be one of the small, 
formally independent countries which said to itself: "We 
rely more on the fact that the Bolsheviks are able to live 
in peace with other, weaker nations, even with a bour 
geois government, than on the whole powerful Entente 
democracy." 

The most prominent manifestation of democracy is in 
the fundamental question of war and peace. All the pow 
ers are preparing a new imperialist war, and this is seen 
daily by the workers of the world. Any day now America 
and Japan will huril themselves at each other; Britain has 
grabbed so many colonies after her victory over Germany 
that the other imperialist powers will never resign them 
selves to this. A new fanatical war is being prepared, and 
the people are aware of this. And just at this moment a 
democratic peace is signed between Estonia and Russia 
with her huge forces, who now that she has disposed of 
Yudenich, Kolchak and Denikin, is accused of intending 
to fling all her forces against a small state. Furthermore, 
the terms of the peace treaty provide for a number of ter 
ritorial concessions on our part which do not completely 
correspond to the strict observance of the principle of self- 
determination of nations, and prove in practice that the 
question of frontiers is of secondary importance for us, 
while the question of peaceful relations, the question of 
our capacity for watching the development of the condi 
tions of life of each nation, is not only an important ques 
tion of principle, it is also a matter in which we have suc 
ceeded in winning the confidence of nations hostile to us. 
It was no accident that we achieved this in relation to 
Estonia; it was evidence that the weak proletarian repub 
lic, existing in isolation and apparently helpless, had be 
gun to win to its side the countries and they constitute 
a majority which are dependent on the imperialist states. 



Ill 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 

That is why our peace with Estonia is of such historical 
significance. No matter how the Entente strives to start 
a war even if it succeeds in turning peace once again 
into war-^the fact will remain, firmly established in his 
tory, that despite all the pressure of international capi 
tal we were able to inspire greater confidence in a small 
country ruled by the bourgeoisie than the so-caliled demo 
cratic, but in reality, predatory imperialist bourgeoisie. 

On the question of how our policy compared with the 
policy of the allegedly democratic, but, in actual fact, 
predatory powers of the whole world, we are by chance in 
possession of some particularly interesting documents, 
which you will permit me to read to you. These docu 
ments were furnished by a whiteguard officer or official 
named Oleinikov who was commissioned by one white- 
guard government to hand over ,some highly important 
documents to another. But he handed them over to us in 
stead. 29 (Applause.) It proved possible to send these docu 
ments to Russia, and I shall read them to you, although it 
will take some time to do so. Nevertheless, they are very 
interesting for they very clearly reveal the hidden springs 
of policy. The first document is a telegram to Guilkevich 
from Sazonov: 

Paris, October 14, 1919, No. 668. 

S. D. Sazonov conveys his respects to Constantin Nikolayevich 
and has the honour to enclose for his information copies of a telegram 
from B. A. Bakhmetev, No. 1050, and a telegram from I. I. Sukin, 
No. 23, on the situation in the Baltic Provinces. 

Here is a more interesting document a telegram of 
October 11 from Washington: 

Received October 12, 1919. Incoming No. 3346. 

Bakhmetev to the Minister. 

Washington, October 11, 1919, No. 1050. 

Further to my telegram No. 1045. 

(In code) The State Department acquainted me verbally with the 
instructions given to Gade. He is appointed the Commissar of the 



112 V. I. LENIN 



American Government in the Baltic Provinces of Russia. He is not 
accredited to any Russian Government. His mission is to observe and 
inform. His behaviour must not lead the local population to expect 
that the American Government could agree to support separatist 
trends going beyond autonomy. On the contrary, the American 
Government trusts that the population of the Baltic Provinces will 
help their Russian brothers in their work of general state importance. 
The instructions are based on the interpretation of the agreement of 
the Allied governments with the Supreme Ruler* as outlined in my 
memorandum of June 17 to the Government. Gade has been given 
extracts from the recent speeches of the President in which he 
fulminates against Bolshevism. 

So, the American Government intimates that its repre 
sentative cam issue any kind of instructions but may not 
support independence, i.e., may not guarantee independ 
ence as regards these states. This is what directly or in 
directly came to light, and Estonia could not be kept in 
ignorance of the fact that it was being deceived by the 
Great Powers. Of course, everyone could have guessed 
this, but now we have the documents and they will be 
published: 

Received October 12, 1919. Incoming No. 3347. 

Sukin to the Minister. 

Omsk, October 9, 1919, No. 28. 

(In code) Knox has given the Supreme Ruler the message of the 
British War Office in which the latter warns of the inclination of the 
Baltic States to conclude a peace with the Bolsheviks who guarantee 
them immediate recognition of their independence. At the same time 
the British War Office raises the question of the advisability of 
paralysing this pledge by satisfying, in its turn, the wishes of the 
states indicated. We replied to Knox by referring to the principles 
outlined in the note of the Supreme Ruler to the Powers on June 4, 
and, in addition, we pointed out that the conclusion of a peace 
between the Baltic States and the Bolsheviks would be undoubtedly 
fraught with danger since this would permit the freeing of part of 
the Soviet forces and would clear the way to the infiltration of 
Bolshevism in the West. The mere fact that they are ready to talk 
peace is in our opinion evidence of the utter demoralisation of the 



* The reference is to Kolchak. Ed. 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 



113 



parties of these self-governing entities which cannot protect them 
selves from the penetration of aggressive Bolshevism on their ow 
Expressing the conviction that the Powers could not approve of 
the further spread of Bolshevism, we pointed to the necessity o 
withdrawing all aid from the Baltic States since this would be a 
real means of exerting influence by the Powers, and is more advisable 
than competition in promises with the Bolsheviks, who now have 
nothing to lose. 

In transmitting the above, I would request you to make similar 

and London; we ar 



Received October 9, 1919. Incoming No. 3286 

Sablin to the Minister. 

London, October 7, 1919, No 677 



theW, ff DireCt r f Militar y Operations 

the War Office to whom Guchkov made an offer of our 



ur 

in order to facilitate the delivery of supplies to Yudenich 
British, states that in the opinion of the War Office Yudenich has all 
that he requires at the moment, and that Britain is experiencing some 
difficulty in providing further supplies. He adds, however, that as we 
have shipping, we could arrange the delivery of supplies to Yudenich 
r PHP TiT^ ba !J S providin S w e obtain credits. At the same time 
General Radcliffe admits that Yudenich s army must be properly 
equipped since it is "the only force among the Baltic States able to 
engage m active operations against the Bolsheviks". 

Minister to Bakhmetev in Washington. 

Paris, September 30, 1919, No. 2442. 

(In code) From a rather confidential Swedish source I learn that the 
American envoy in Stockholm, Morris, says about growing sympathy 
m America towards the Bolsheviks and of intentions to cease aid to 
Kplchak in order to enter into contacts with Moscow in the interests 
of American trade. Such statements on the part of an official repre 
sentative make a strange impression. 

Received October 5, 1919. Incoming No. 3244 
Bakhmetev to the Minister. 
Washington, October 4, 1919, No. 1021. 
Further to your telegram No. 2442. 

(In code) The State Department informed me in confidence that it 
5 true that the envoy in Stockholm, Morris, and particularly Hapgood 
Copenhagen, are well known for their Left sympathies, but that 
they have no influence or authority here, and that the government 
bilged to admonish them from time to time, categorically pointing 

82283 



v - J - LENIN 



out that American policy is one of imdeviating support of our 
government in the struggle against the Bolsheviks. 

Here are all the documents which we shall publish and 
which cleanly show how the battle went on around Esto 
nia, how the Entente together with Kolchak and America, 
Britain and France all brought .pressure to bear on Estonia 
with the one aim of preventing the signing of a peace 
treaty with the Bolsheviks, and how the Bolsheviks, pledg 
ing themselves to territorial concessions and guaranteeing 
independence, won this trial of strength. I state that this 
victory is of gigantic historical significance, because it has 
been gained without the use of force. This victory over 
world imperialism is a victory thanks to which the Bol 
sheviks are gaining the sympathy of the whole world. This 
victory by no means denotes that universal peace will be 
concluded immediately; but this victory does show that we 
represent the peace interests of the majority of the world s 
population against the imperialist warmongers. Such an 
assessment of the situation has induced bourgeois Estonia, 
an opponent of communism, to conclude peace with us. 
If we, a proletarian state, a Soviet Republic, conclude a 
peace treaty, if we act in the spirit of peace towards bour 
geois governments oppressed by the great magnates of 
imperialism, then this must enable us to decide how our 
international policy is to be shaped. 

The main task we set ourselves is to defeat the exploit 
ers and to win to our side the waverers this is a task of 
historic significance. Among the waverers are a whole 
number of bourgeois states which, as bourgeois states, de 
test us, but which, on the other hand, as oppressed states, 
prefer peace with us. This explains the peace with Esto 
nia. This peace is, of course, only a first step, and its in 
fluence will only be felt in the future, but that it will be 
felt is a fact. Up to now our negotiations with Latvia have 
only occurred through the Red Cross, 30 and the same is 
true of the Polish Government. I repeat the peace with 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. H5 

Estonia is bound to influence events because the basis is 
identical; the same attempts are being made to goad Lat 
via and Poland into making war on Russia as were made in 
the case of Estonia. Perhaps these attempts will prove suc 
cessful, and we must be vigilant, since war with Poland 
is possible, but we are certain this has been demonstrated 
by our main achievements that we can conclude peace 
and make concessions which permit the development of 
any form of democracy. This is now especially important 
because the Polish question is particularly acute. We have 
received a number of communications indicating that apart 
from bourgeois, conservative, landlord Poland, apart from 
the pressure being exerted by all capitalist parties in 
Poland, all the Entente powers are doing their utmost to 
incite Poland to make war against us. 

As you know, the Council of People s Commissars has 
issued an appeal to the working people of Poland. 31 We 
are going to ask you to endorse this appeal as a means of 
fighting that campaign of vilification in which the Polish 
landlord circles are engaged. We shall submit an addi 
tional text of an appeal to the working people of Poland. 
This appeal will be a blow to the imperialist powers, who 
are doing their utmost to incite Poland against us; for 
us the interests of the toiling majority take first place. 

I shall now acquaint you with a telegram intercepted by 
us yesterday, which illustrates the activities of American 
capital aimed at presenting us in a certain light and there 
by dragging us into a war with Poland. The telegram says 
(reads). I have said and heard nothing of the sort, but they 
are able to lie because they do not spend their money 
for nothing on spreading lying rumours. Their bourgeois 
government guarantees them this. (Continues reading the 
telegram.) This telegram is travelling from Europe to 
America, it is paid for out of capitalist funds and it serves 
as a means of promoting war with Poland in a most un 
ashamed way. American capital is doing its utmost to 

8* 



V. I. LENIN 



bring pressure to bear on Poland and does -this unashamed 
ly, making it appear that the Bolsheviks want to finish with 
Koilchak and Denikin in order to throw all their "iron 
troops" against Poland. 

It is important that we should here and now endorse the 
decision of the Council of People s Commissars, and then 
we must do. what we did previously in relation to other 
states, and also what we did in regard to the troops of 
Kolchak and Denikin. We must immediately appeal to the 
democratic people within Poland and explain the real state 
of affairs. We know full well that this method of ours has 
the most positive effect in that it tends to disrupt the ranks 
of our enemy. And in the end, this method will lead to the 
path we need, the path to which it has led the working 
population of all countries. This policy must set a definite 
beginning no matter how difficult this may prove and 
once a beginning is made, we shall carry it through to 
completion. 

I must mention that we have been pursuing the same 
policy in respect to all other countries. We invited Georgia 
and Azerbaijan to conclude an agreement against Denikin. 
They refused, pleading non-interference in the affairs of 
other countries. We shalil see how the workers and peas 
ants of Georgia and Azerbaijan regard this. 

This policy has been even more cautious in relation to 
the Western nations than in dealing with the nations of 
Russia. It involved such countries as Latvia, Estonia, 
Poland and, on the other hand, a number of Eastern coun 
tries whose development level is the same as that of the 
vast majority of the colonial countries which constitute the 
majority of the world s population. They are weighed down 
by Britain, who continues to hold the colonial slaves under 
her sway. If our policy in relation to West-European coun 
tries has been so cautious it will take some time for them 
to outlive their Kerensky period our policy in the East 
must be even more cautious and patient, for here we are 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. \\J 

dealing with countries that are much more backward, are 
under the oppressive influence of religious fanaticism, are 
imbued with greater distrust of the Russian people, and 
for decades and centuries were oppressed by the tsarist 
government s capitalist policy and imperialism, the policy 
conducted towards these nations by Russia as the dom 
inant nation. 

We have granted autonomy to the Bashkir Republic.- 52 
We must found an autonomous Tatar Republic. 33 And we 
continue the same policy in relation to all the Eastern peo 
ples, and say to ourselves: faced by a huge front of impe 
rialist powers, we, who are fighting imperialism, represent 
an alliance that requires close military unity. Any attempt 
to violate this unity we regard as absolutely impermissible, 
as a betrayal of the struggle against international imperial 
ism. However, in implementing this policy we must be 
even more cautious. For if the European countries have to 
go through a Kerensky period, in the countries that are at 
a lower development level there are even greater ele 
ments of distrust, and it will require more time to in 
fluence them. We support the independence of these coun 
tries. We appeal to their working people. We say: unity of 
the military forces is imperative; any deviation from this 
unity is impermissible. 

We are confident that, by systematically going forward 
with our policy of close alliance, we shall achieve greater 
success than before in our relations with the peoples of 
the East. And our success is already great. The Soviet Re 
public enjoys tremendous popularity among aill the Eastern 
peoples for the same reason that made it possible for us 
to conclude a peace treaty with a small Western state, 
namely, because they see in us an unswerving fighter 
against imperialism, the only republic which is waging a 
war against imperialism and is capable of utilising every 
situation, without using force, and which is able to gain 
victory also by renouncing the use of force. 



V. I. LENIN 



Needless to say a far more refined form of this policy 
is being implemented in relation to the Ukrainian Repub 
lic. Here the problem has been simplified by the prior con 
clusion of an agreement between the All-Russian Central 
Executive Committee and the Central Executive Commit 
tee of the Ukrainian Soviet Republic. On the basis of this 
agreement, which implies a close federation of both repub 
lics in the struggle against the imperialist countries, we 
are building an even closer alliance. As a result of their 
bitter experience of Denikin s rule, the mass of Ukrainian 
peasants and workers are becoming convinced that only 
the closest alliance with the Russian Republic will be real 
ly invincible in the face of international imperialism, and 
that at the time of struggle against imperialism there is 
nothing to be gained by the separation of the Ukrainian 
state, as imperialism takes advantage of every division in 
order to crush Soviet power. Such a division is criminal. 
Our policy is taking deep root in the Ukraine, and we are 
confident that the forthcoming All-Ukraine Congress of 
Soviets of Workers and Peasants will officially endorse this 
policy. These are the few remarks to which I must limit 
myself on the question of the international position. I shall 
ask this session to endorse all the practical proposals I 
have to make and have enumerated on behalf of the Coun 
cil of People s Commissars and the All-Russian Central 
Executive Committee. 

In passing on to the work of internal construction I must 
in the first place deal with certain measures taken by our 
government, and then proceed to the most important mat 
ter of all the change-over to a new course, the transi 
tion from military tasks to those of state construction. 

In regard to our internal policy for the two months 
under review, among the main measures which more or 
less stand out from a number of current tasks, the follow 
ing decision requiring the endorsement of the All-Russian 
Central Executive Committee is of considerable impor- 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 



tarace. This is the decision to abolish the death penalty. As 
you know, immediately after the main victory over Deni- 
kin, after the capture of Rostov, Comrade Dzerzhinsky, 
who is in charge of the Cheka and the People s Commissar 
iat for Home Affairs, submitted a proposal to the Coun 
cil of People s Commissars, and had it endorsed in his own 
department, that the passing of all death sentences by the 
Cheka be abolished. When bourgeois democracy in Europe 
does all in its power to spread the lie that Soviet Russia 
is predominantly terrorist, when this lie is spread about 
us by bourgeois democracy and by the socialists of the 
Second International, when Kautsky writes a special book 
entitled Terrorism and Communism in which he declares 
that the communist state is based on terrorism, then you 
can well imagine the kind of lies spread on this sub 
ject. In order to refute this lie we have decided on the 
step taken by Comrade Dzerzhinsky, endorsed by the 
Council of People iS Commissars, and which now needs 
the approval of the All-Russian Central Executive Com 
mittee. 

We were forced to use terror in answer to the terror 
employed by the Entente, when the mighty powers of the 
world flung their hordes against us, stopping at nothing. 
We could not have lasted two days had we not replied to 
these attempts of officers and whiteguards in a merciless 
fashion. This meant the use of terror, but this was forced 
on us by the terrorist methods of the Entente. But as 
soon as we had gained a decisive victory, even before the 
end of the war, immediately after Rostov s capture we 
rejected capital punishment, and have therefore proved 
that we intend to carry out our own programme as we had 
promised. We say that the use of violence arises from the 
need to crush the exploiters, the landlords and the capital 
ists. When this is accomplished we shall renounce all 
extraordinary measures. We have proved this in practice. 
And I think, I hope, and I am confident, that the All-Rus- 



120 V. I. LENIN 



sian Central Executive Committee will unanimously en 
dorse this measure of the Council of People s Commissars 
and wi ll implement it in such a way that it will be impos 
sible to apply the death penalty in Russia. Needless to 
say, any attempt by the Entente to resume methods of war 
will force us to reintroduce the former terror; we know 
that we are living at a time of jungle-law, when kind words 
are of no avail. This is what we had in mind, and as soon 
as the decisive struggle was over, we immediately began 
to abolish measures which all other powers apply in per 
petuity. 

Further, I should like to refer to the discussion on Work 
ers Inspection. There is to be a special report on this sub 
ject, and it would be wrong of me to dwell much on it. 
The most important problem confronting us here is that 
of drawing the mass of people into the field of manage 
ment. This is a more acute problem than the task of large- 
scale construction. You will be presented with detailed 
plans, and when you have discussed and amended them, 
you will understand that this construction must continue 
with far greater participation by the mass of the workers. 
This is our main task, with which it is extremely difficult 
to get to grips in the existing chaos, but nevertheless we 
are approaching it steadily. 

There is another question before us the question of co 
operation. We have set ourselves the task of uniting the 
whole population in co-operatives differing from previous 
forms of co-operation, which at best only covered an up 
per section of the population. 

Socialism would be impossible if it did not make use 
of the technical knowledge, culture and the apparatus 
created by bourgeois, capitalist civilisation. Part of this 
apparatus is the co-operative movement whose growth is 
all the greater the higher the level of capitalist develop 
ment in a country. We have set our co-operative move 
ment the task of embracing the whole country. Up to now 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 121 

the co-operative movement only covered an upper section 
and benefited those able to pay their dues. The working 
people, however, were unable to make use of its services. 
We have resolutely broken with this type of co-operation, 
but not so that co-operation as such is completely wiped 
out, for in March and April 1918 we set it the task of 
covering the whole population. If there are co-operators 
who value the ideas of the founders of the co-operative 
movement (the old aims of co-operation were to satisfy 
the needs of the working people), they will sympathise 
with this aim. We are certain that we have the sympathy 
of the majority of the members of the co-operative organ 
isations, although we are by no means under the illusion 
that we have won to our side the majority of the leaders 
of the co-operatives, who subscribe to bourgeois and petty- 
bourgeois views, who see co-operation merely as another 
form of capitalist economy and the notorious freedom of 
trade which means fortunes for the few and ruin for the 
majority. Instead of this, we announced the country-wide 
task of co-operation to pass on to genuinely catering for 
the working people so that it covers the whole population. 
This could not be accomplished at once. Having set this 
task we worked systematically, and will go on working to 
achieve this end, so that ultimately all the population will 
be united in co-operatives; and we can say with certainty 
that the whole of the Soviet Republic, perhaps in a few 
weeks, or at most in a few months, will become one great 
co-operative of working people. After this the develop 
ment of independent activity by the working people, their 
participation in construction will proceed along even 
broader lines. 

In ^accomplishing this, we have decided that all types of 
co-operatives, not only consumers , but credit, production, 
etc., should, by appropriate stages and with due care, be 
amalgamated into a Central Union of Consumers Societies 
(Centrosoyuz). We are confident that our steps in this direc- 



122 V. I. LENIN 



tion will meet with the approval of the Central Executive 
Committee and the workers in the localities who, after the 
formal amalgamation of the co-operatives, will, by their 
work of economic construction and of drawing the major 
ity of the workers and peasants into this, achieve what we 
regard as one of the major tasks: that of making co-oper 
ation also a prime factor in the struggle against bureauc 
racy, this legacy from the old capitalist state, a 
struggle which we proclaimed in our programme, too, as 
being of the highest importance. We shall carry on this 
struggle in all offices and departments by every means and, 
incidentally, through the amalgamation of the co-opera 
tives and by shifting the appeal from the bourgeois co 
operative top sections to the genuine working people, who 
must all undertake independent work in co-operative con 
struction. 

From among the problems of internal construction I now 
wish to refer to what has been done in the sphere of agri 
culture. In order to place land tenure on a proper 
basis, the People s Commissar for Agriculture in July 1919 
issued a circular on measures against the frequent 
redistribution of allotted land. This circular was published 
on July 1 in Izvestia VTsIK and was included in "Collec 
tion of Statutes and Decrees of the Workers and Peasants 
Government". This circular is important because it meets 
the many suggestions and demands of the peasants who 
pointed out that the frequent rea llotment of the land in 
conditions of small-scale farming prevented better labour 
discipline and the higher productivity of labour. This view 
is shared by the Council of People s Commissars which 
has empowered the Commissariat for Agriculture to work 
out a draft decree on procedures relating to re-allotment. 
This draft will be considered shortly. Similarly, the Peo 
ple s Commissariat for Agriculture sees as its task a num 
ber of urgent measures for rehabilitation of livestock and 
farm equipment. In this connection the systematic efforts 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 123 

of local workers themselves are extremely important, and 
we hope that the members of the All-Russian Central Exec 
utive Committee will bring the appropriate pressure to 
bear on the authorities and render assistance, so that these 
measures of the People s Commissariat for Agriculture 
can be put into effect in the shortest space of time. 

I shall now turn to the final, and in reality, the most 
important problem of our construction the problem of the 
armies of labour and the labour mobilisation of the popu 
lation. The most difficult task in the sharp turns and 
changes of social life is that of taking due account of the 
peculiar features of each transition. How socialists should 
fight within capitalist society is not a difficult question 
and has long since been decided. Nor is it difficult to visu 
alise advanced -socialist society. This problem has also 
been decided. But how in practice to effect the transition 
from the old, customary, familiar capitalism to the new 
socialism, as yet unborn and without a firm basis, is the 
most difficult task of all. At best this transition will take 
many years, in the course of which our policy will split 
into a number of even smaller transitions. And the whole 
difficulty of the task which falls to us, the whole difficulty 
of politics and the art of politics, lies in the ability to take 
into account the specific tasks of each of these transitions. 

We have only just solved the problem of the war in its 
principal and basic features, though not yet completely. 
Our main task was to repel at all costs the attack of the 
whiteguards. We said: everything for the war effort. This 
was a correct policy. We are fully aware that this policy 
caused unparalleled hardships in the rear such as cold, 
famine and devastation. But the very fact that the Red 
Army, which is regarded, incidentally, in the way shown 
by the examples I have read out to you, has resolved this 
problem in the most backward country, proves that new for 
ces in the country do exist. Otherwise the creation of this 
model army, and its victory over far better equipped 



124 V. I. LENIN 



armies, would have been inconceivable. But after we had 
geared the entire apparatus to this task and had suc 
ceeded in surmounting the specific features of this prob 
lem the subordination of everything to the war effort 
the situation demands a swift and sharp change in policy. 
We have not yet finished the war. We must maintain our 
military readiness intact, we must destroy Denikin s 
troops, we must show the landlords and capitalists of 
every country that if they want to deal with Russia by 
war, they will meet the same fate as Kolchak and Denikin. 
We must not take a single step, therefore, which would 
weaken our military strength. At the same time, how 
ever, we must switch the whole country onto a different 
course, reconstruct its whole mechanism. We can no long 
er, and we have no need to, gear everything to the war 
effort, because in the main the problem of the war has 
been solved. 

The task of the transition from war to peaceful con 
struction arises in such peculiar conditions that we can 
not disband the army, since we have to allow, say, for the 
possibility of an attack by that selfsame Poland or any 
of the powers which the Entente continues to incite against 
us. This specific feature of the problem of not being able 
to reduce our military forces, yet at the same time hav 
ing to switch the whole of the Soviet state machine which 
is geared to war onto the new course of peaceful econom 
ic construction, demands exceptional attention. It is the 
type of problem that cannot be coped with by general for 
mulas, the general provisions of a programme, general 
communist principles, but which requires that the specific 
features of the transition from capitalism to communism 
have to be taken into consideration, the transition from 
the position of a country whose whole attention has been 
concentrated on the war, to the position of a country which 
has won a decisive military victory and must go on to 
solve economic questions by military methods, because the 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. ] 25 



situation, as you all realise, is extremely grave. The end 
of the winter will bring and has brought the working peo 
ple unbelievable hardships cold, famine, devastation. We 
must overcome this at all costs. We know that we can 
do this. It has been proved by the enthusiasm of the Red 
Army. 

If, up to the present, we were able to battle on, sur 
rounded on all sides and cut off from the richest areas of 
grain and coal, now when we poss ess all this, when there 
is the possibility of solving the problems of economic con 
struction, jointly with the Ukraine, we can solve the main 
problem: to get in large quantities of grain and foodstuffs, 
bring them to the industrial centres so that industrial con 
struction can commence. We must concentrate all our 
efforts on this task. It is inadmissible to allow ourselves 
to be diverted from it to any other practical task. It has 
to be solved by adopting military methods, with absolute 
ruthles,sness, absolute suppression of all other interests. 
We know that a whole number of perfectly legitimate de 
mands and interests will go by the board, but if it were not 
for these sacrifices, we should not have won the war. The 
situation now demands that we make a sharp and swift 
turn towards the creation of a basis for peaceful economic 
construction. This basis must be the laying-in of great 
stocks of food and their transportation to the central re 
gions; the task of transport is to convey raw materials and 
provisions. From August 1917 to August 1918 we collected 
30 million poods of grain, in the second year 110 million, 
and now in five months 90 million have been collected by 
our Commissariat for Food Supplies, collected by socialist, 
not capitalist methods, by compulsory delivery of grain 
by the peasants at fixed prices, and not by selling on the 
free market and this means that we have found our way 
ahead. We are certain that it is the correct way and that 
it will enable us to achieve results which will ensure tre 
mendous economic construction. 



126 



All our forces must be dedicated to this task. All our 
military power, which came to the fore in military organ 
isation, must be switched onto this new way. This is the 
specific situation, the specific transition, which engendered 
the idea of armies of labour and led to the law on the 
creation of the first army of labour in the Orals and the 
Ukrainian army of labour. It was followed by the law on 
the utilisation of the army reserves for civilian labour and 
the decree issued by the Soviet Government on the Com 
mittees for Labour Conscription. All these laws will be 
outlined to you by a member oif the Ail-Russian Central 
Executive Committee in a fully detailed report. I naturally 
cannot trespass on this ground because the special report 
will throw sufficient light upon it. I only emphasise its 
significance in relation to our general policy, the signif 
icance of this transition which confronts us with its specific 
tasks, for which we are to redouble our efforts as in the 
military field, to organise them so that we can lay in large 
food reserves and bring them to the industrial centres. To 
achieve this we must at all costs create armies of labour, 
organise ourselves in a military way, reduce, even close 
down a whole number of institutions so that in the next 
few months, no matter what happens, we can overcome 
transport dislocation, and emerge from this desperate sit 
uation of cold, famine and impoverishment brought by 
the end of winter. We must and can get out of this situa 
tion. When the All-Russian Central Executive Committee 
endorses all the measures connected with labour conscrip 
tion and the armies of labour, when it has succeeded in 
instilling these ideas in the broad mass of the population 
and demands that they be put into practice by the work 
ers in the localities, then we are absolutely convinced that 
we shall cope with this most difficult of tasks, while not 
in the least degree weakening our military readiness. 

We must at all costs, without weakening our military 
readiness, switch the Soviet Republic onto the new course 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. 12? 

of economic construction. This task must be accomplished 
in the next few weeks, possibly months. Every Soviet or 
Party organisation must do everything in its power to end 
the transport dislocation and increase the grain reserves. 

Them, and only then, shall we have a basis, a sound basis 
for industrial construction on a wide front, for the electri 
fication of Russia. In order to prove to the population, and 
in particular to the peasants, that these extensive plans are 
not fantasies, but are borne out by and based on technol 
ogy and science, I think we should adopt a resolution, and 
I hope that the Central Executive Committee will support 
this idea, recommending that the Supreme Economic 
Council and the Commissariat for Agriculture jointly draft 
a plan for the electrification of Russia. 

Thanks to the aid of the State Publishing House and the 
energy of the workers at the former Kushnerev Printing 
Works, now the 17th State Printing Works, I succeeded in 
getting Krzhizhanovsky s pamphlet The Main Tasks of the 
Electrification of Russia published at very short notice, and 
tomorrow it will be distributed to all members of the All- 
Russian Central Executive Committee. This pamphlet of 
Comrade Krzhizhanovsky s, who works in the Electro- 
Technical Sub-Department of the Supreme Economic 
Council, summarises what has already been achieved and 
raises questions, the popularisation of which, not the prac 
tical application, is now one of the most important tasks. 

I hope that the Central Executive Committee will adopt 
this resolution which instructs, in the name of the Central 
Executive Committee, the Supreme Economic Council and 
the People s Commissariat for Agriculture to work out over 
the next few months our practical tasks during this period 
will be different with the aid of scientists and engineers 
a broad and complete plan for the electrification of Russia. 
The author of this pamphlet is absolutely correct in choos 
ing as its motto the saying: "The age of steam is the age 
of the bourgeoisie, the age of electricity is the age of social- 



128 V. I. LENIN 



ism." We must have a new technical foundation for the 
new economic construction. This new technical foundation 
is electricity, and everything will have to be built on this 
foundation, but it will take many long years. We shall not 
be afraid of working ten or twenty years, but we must 
prove to the peasants that in place of the old isolation of 
industry and agriculture, this very deep contradiction on 
which capitalism thrived and which sowed dissension be 
tween the industrial and agricultural workers, we set our 
selves the task of returning to the peasant the loan we 
received from him in the form of grain, for we know that 
paper money, of course, is not the equivalent of bread. We 
must repay this loan by organising industry and supplying 
the peasants with its products. We must show the peasants 
that the organisation of industry based on modern, advanced 
technology, on electrification which will provide a link 
between town aind country, will put an end to the division 
between town and country, will make it possible to raise 
the level of culture in the countryside, and to overcome, 
even in the most remote corners of the land, the backward 
ness, ignorance, poverty, disease and barbarism. We shall 
tackle the problem as soon as we have dealt with our cur 
rent, basic task. Not for a single moment shall we allow 
ourselves to be deflected from our fundamental, practical 
task to achieve this. 

In the next few months all our energies must be concen 
trated on food transport and the extension of our resources 
of food supplies. There must not be the slightest departure 
from this. At the same time let the scientists and tech 
nicians produce a long-term plan for the electrification of 
the whole of Russia. Let the links which we have estab 
lished with the outside world, with capitalist Europe, that 
gateway which we made for ourselves by concluding peace 
with Estonia, serve to provide us immediately with essen 
tial technical aid. And having solved the basic tasks of 
transport and food supplies in the coming months, having 



REPORT ON THE WORK OF C.E.C. AND C.P.C. ] 29 

solved the problem of labour conscription, on which we 
shall wholly concentrate all our energies, not allowing our 
selves to be deflected from this in the next few months by 
anything else having solved this, we shall prove that we 
can pass to the tasks of construction for many years to 
come, to the tasks of putting the whole of Russia onto an 
advanced technological footing which will abolish the divi 
sion between town and country, and will make it possible 
to conquer completely and decisively the backwardness of 
the countryside, its scattered economy and its ignorance, 
which is the prime reason for all the stagnation, all the 
backwardness, all the oppression that have existed up to 
now. And in this matter, that of the peaceful victory on 
the bloodless front of the reorganisation of industry, we 
shall, if we employ all our military skill and all our energy, 
and concentrate all our forces on the fulfilment of this task, 
win victories in this field which will be even more decisive, 
even more glorious, than those we have won in the mili 
tary field. (Applause.) 

Brief reports published Vol 30 pp 291-312 

in Pravda No. 23, February 3, 
1920, and in Izvestia VTsIK 
No. 23 

First published in full in the 

4th Russian edition of 

V. I. Lenin s Collected Works 



IN REPLY TO QUESTIONS PUT BY A CORRESPONDENT 
OF THE NEW YORK EVENING JOURNAL^ 

1. "Do we intend to attack Poland and Rumania?" 

No. We have declared most emphatically and officially, 
in the name of the Council of People s Commissars and the 
Aill-Russian Central Executive Committee, our peaceful 
intentions. It is very much to be regretted that the French 
capitalist government is instigating Poland (and presum 
ably Rumania, too) to attack us. This is even mentioned by 
a number of American radios from Lyons. 

2. "What are our plans in Asia?" 

They are the same as in Europe: peaceful coexistence 
with all peoples, with the workers and peasants of all na 
tions awakening to a new life a life without exploiters, 
without landlords, without capitalists, without merchants. 
The imperialist war of 1914-18, the war of the capitalists 
of the Anglo-French (and Russian) group against the Ger 
man-Austrian capitalist group for the partition of the world 
has awakened Asia and has strengthened there, as every 
where else, the urge towards freedom, towards peaceful 
labour and against possible future wars. 

3. "What would be the basis of peace with America?" 



IN REPLY TO NEW YORK EVENING JOURNAL 131 

Let the American capitalists leave us alone. We shall not 
touch them. We are even ready to pay them in gold for 
any machinery, tools, etc., useful to our transport and in 
dustries. We are ready to pay not only in gold, but in raw 
materials, too. 

4. "What are the obstacles to such a peace?" 

None on our part; imperialism on the part of American 
(and of any other) capitalists. 

5. "What are our views on the deportation of Russian 

revolutionaries from America?" 

i 

We have accepted them. We are not afraid of revolu 
tionaries here in this country. As a matter of fact, we are 
not afraid of anybody, and if America is afraid of a few 
more hundred or thousand of its citizens, we are ready to 
begin negotiations with a view to receiving any citizens 
whom America thinks dangerous (with the exception of 
criminals, of course). 

6. "What possibilities are there of an economic alliance 
between Russia and Germany?" 

Unfortunately, they are not great. The Scheidemanns are 
bad allies. We stand for an alliance with all countries 
without exception. 

7. "What are our views -upon the Allied demand for the 
extradition of war criminals?" 

If we are to speak seriously on this matter of war guilt, 
the guilty ones are the capitalists of all countries. Hand 
over to us all your landed proprietors owning more than 
a hundred hectares and capitalists having a capital of more 
than 100,000 francs, and we shall educate them to useful 
labour and make them break with the shameful, base and 
bloody role of exploiters and instigators of wars for the 



132 V. I. LENIN 



partition of colonies. Wars will then very soon become 
absolutely impossible. 

8. "What would be the influence of peace with Russia 
upon the economic conditions in Europe?" 

Exchange of machinery for grain, flax and other raw 
materials I ask, can this be disadvantageous for Europe? 
Clearly, it cannot be anything but beneficial. 

9. What is our opinion regarding the future devel 
opment of the Soviets as a world force?" 

The future belongs to the Soviet system all the world 
over. The facts have proved it. One has only to count, by 
quarterly periods say, the growth in the number of 
pamphlets, books, leaflets and newspapers standing for or 
sympathising with the Soviets published in any country. 
It cannot be otherwise. Once the workers in the cities, the 
workers, landless peasants and the handicraftsmen in the 
villages as well as the small peasants (i.e., those who do 
not exploit hired labour) once this enormous majority of 
working people have understood that the Soviet system 
gives all power into their hands, releasing them from the 
yoke of landlords and capitalists how could one prevent 
the victory of the Soviet system all over the world? I, for 
one, do not know of any means of preventing it. 

10. "Has Russia still to fear counter-revolution from 
without?" 

Unfortunately, she has, for the capitalists are stupid, 
greedy people. They have made a number of such stupid, 
greedy attempts at intervention and one has to fear repeti 
tions until the workers and peasants of all countries 
thoroughly re-educate their own capitalists. 

11. "Is Russia ready to enter into business relations with 
America?" 



IN REPLY TO NEW YORK EVENING JOURNAL 133 

Of course she is ready to do so, and with all other 
countries. Peace with Estonia, to whom we have conceded 
a great deal, has proved our readiness, for the sake of busi 
ness relations, to give even industrial concessions on cer 
tain conditions. 

V. Ulyanov (N. Lenin) 
February 18, 1920 



Published February 21, 1920 Vol. 30, pp. 340-42 

Verified with the 
American newspaper text 



in New York Evening Journal 

No. 12671 Verified with the 



First published in Russian 
on April 22, 1950 in 
Pravda No. 112 



IN REPLY TO QUESTIONS PUT BY A CORRESPONDENT 
OF THE DAILY EXPRESS^ 

1. "What is our attitude towards the raising of the 
blockade?" 

We consider it a big step forward. The possibility is 
being opened for us to pass from a war that was forced on 
us by the capitalist governments of the Entente to peaceful 
reconstruction. This is of the greatest importance to us. 
Straining all our efforts towards the restoration of the 
economic life of the country, ruined first by war between 
capitalists over the Dardanelles and the colonies, then by 
the war of the capitalists of the Entente and Russia against 
the workers of Russia, we are now, among other measures, 
working out, with the aid of a number of scientists and 
experts, a plan of electrification of the whole country. This 
plan is to be realised over a period of many years. The 
electrification will rejuvenate Russia. Electrification based 
on the Soviet system will mean the complete success of the 
foundations of communism in our country foundations 
of a cultured life, without exploiters, without capitalists, 
without landlords, without merchants. 

The raising of the blockade will help to accomplish Rus 
sia s electrification. 

2. "What influence will the Allies decision to cease 
offensive action have on the offensive actions of the So 
viet power?" 



IN REPLY TO DAILY EXPRESS 135 

The Entente, together with their allies and their lackeys 
Kolchak, Denikin and the capitalists of the surrounding 
countries have attacked us. We did not attack any one. 
We concluded peace with Estonia even at the cost of mate 
rial sacrifices. 

We are impatiently waiting to see the Allies "decision" 
supported by their deeds, but the story of the Versailles 
Peace and of its consequences, unfortunately, indicates 
that in most cases the Allies words disagree with their 
deeds and the decisions remain scraps of paper. 

3. "Is the present status quo satisfactory from the stand 
point of Soviet policy?" 

Yes, because every status quo in politics is a transition 
from old forms to new ones. The present status quo is, 
from many points of view, a transition from war to peace. 
Such a change is desirable to us for this reason, and in so 
far do we consider the status quo satisfactory. 

4. "What are our aims in connection with the cessation 
of hostilities on the part of the Allies?" 

Our aims, as already mentioned, are peaceful, economic 
building. A detailed plan of it, on the basis of electrifi 
cation, is being at present worked out by a committee of 
scientists and technicians or rather, by a number of com 
mittees in accordance with the resolution of the February 
(1920) session of the Ail-Russian Central Executive Com 
mittee. 

Written February 18, 1920 Vol. 30, pp. 343-44 

Published February 23, 1920 VprifipH with th^ 

in the Doily Express No. 6198 af Ixprm text 

First published in Russian 
April 22, 1950 in 
Pravda No. 112 



SPEECH DELIVERED AT THE JOINT MEETING OF THE 

ALL-RUSSIAN CENTRAL EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE, 

THE MOSCOW SOVIET OF WORKERS , PEASANTS 

AND RED ARMY DEPUTIES, AND TRADE UNIONS 

AND FACTORY COMMITTEES 

MAY 5, 192036 

(Applause.) Comrades, I should like to draw your atten 
tion to one aspect distinguishing the present war from 
previous wars from the international point of view, or to 
put it more correctly, from the point of view of Russia s 
international position. Of course, none of you doubt, or 
could doubt, that this war is one link in a long chain of 
events involving the frantic resistance of the international 
bourgeoisie against the victorious proletariat, the frantic 
attempt of the international bourgeoisie to crush Soviet 
Russia and to overthrow the first Soviet state at all costs 
and by all means. There cannot be the slightest doubt that 
there is a connection between these events, between pre 
vious attempts of the international bourgeoisie and the 
present war. But at the same time we see what a tremen 
dous difference there is between this war and previous 
wars from the point of view of our international position. 
We see what a tremendous impetus our struggle gave to 
the international working-class movement. We see how the 
international proletariat reacts to Soviet Russia s victories, 



SPEECH AT THE JOINT MEETING OF THE C.E.C. 137 

how the world proletarian struggle grows and strength 
ens, and what gigantic work has been done in the slightly 
more than two years existence of the Soviet Republic. 

You remember how the most responsible, most powerful 
ministers of the mightiest, unrivalled capitalist powers 
announced quite recently that they had prepared an al 
liance of 14 powers against Russia; you know how this 
alliance, under pressure of the powerful capitalists of 
France and Britain, brought together Yudenich, Kolchak 
and Denikin, and how it drew up a really grandiose and 
comprehensive military plan of campaign. We ruined this 
plan because the imperialists only appeared to be united, 
and the forces of the international bourgeoisie cannot sur 
vive a single trial when it is a matter of real sacrifice. It 
appeared that after four years of imperialist slaughter 
the working people do not recognise the justice of a war 
against us, and in them we have a great ally. The Entente s 
plan was really destructive, but it came to grief because 
the capitalist states, despite their very powerful alliance, 
could not carry it through they were unable to put it 
into effect. Not a single power, any one of whom could 
have gained the upper hand over us, was able to show 
unity, because the organised proletariat is not in support of 
it, not a single army neither the French nor the British- 
could ensure that its soldiers could fight against the So 
viet Republic on Russian soil. 

If in our mind s eye we follow the desperate situations 
in which our republic found itself when in fact it stood 
against the whole world, against powers immeasurably 
more mighty, and if we recollect how we emerged com 
pletely victorious from these terrible trials, then these re 
collections will give us a clear idea of what we now face. 
What we have here is not a new plan but at the same time 
it in no way resembles that really comprehensive, unified 
plan that faced us six months ago. We have the debris of 
the former plan and this, above all, in the light of the 



138 V. I. LENIN 



international balance of forces, guarantees the futility of 
the present attempts. The former plan was an attempt by 
all the imperialist powers to crush the Workers and Peas 
ants Republic in alliance with all the small border states 
of the former Russian Empire which had been shamelessly 
and outrageously oppressed by the tsarist and capitalist 
government of Great Russia. Now a few powers, in alliance 
with one of the border states, are attempting to accomplish 
what was found impossible by all the imperialist powers in 
alliance with all the border states and what was under 
taken by them twelve and six months ago in alliance with 
Kolchak, Denikin and others. We now see the debris of the 
imperialist plan. The peculiarity of the imperialist plans is 
that the bourgeoisie are showing their particular tenacity. 
They know that they are fighting to hold onto power at 
home, that it is not the Russian or Polish question that is 
being decided, but the question of their own survival. We 
should, therefore, expect them to try to salvage the former, 
unsuccessful plan from the debris. 

All of us can clearly see the clashing of interests of the 
imperialist states. Despite all the pronouncements of their 
ministers about the peaceful settlement of questions in 
dispute, in reality the imperialist powers cannot take one 
serious step in political matters without disagreeing. The 
French need a powerful Poland and a powerful Russia of 
the tsarist brand, and they are prepared to make every 
sacrifice to this end. Britain, however, owing to her geo 
graphical position strives for something else for the 
breaking up of Russia and the weakening of Poland, so as 
to strike an even balance between France and Germany 
which would guarantee the imperialist victors control of 
the colonies they acquired by robbing Germany as a con 
sequence of the world war. Here the difference of interests 
is really glaring, and no matter how the representatives of 
the imperialist powers at San Remo 37 try to convince us 



SPEECH AT THE JOINT MEETING OF THE C.E.C. 139 

that there is absolute unanimity between the Allies, we 
know that this is not so. 

We know that Poland s attack is a debris of the old plan 
which at one time united the entire international bourgeoi 
sie, and if that grandiose plan was unsuccessful then, even 
though from the purely military point of view it was sure 
of certain success, today, even from that aspect, it has 
not a hope. Furthermore, we know that the imperialist 
powers who have made an alliance with the Polish bour 
geoisie and the Polish Government are in a bigger mess 
than ever. Every political move made by the Polish bour 
geoisie over the past months, weeks and days has shown 
them up before their own working people. They quarrel 
with their allies and cannot make a single consistent step 
in their policy. One moment they announce their uncom 
promising attitude to Soviet Russia and the impossibility 
of having any kind of negotiations with her, the next mo 
ment they raise the blockade and solemnly announce this 
on behalf of the allegedly existing alliance, the allegedly 
existing League of Nations. Then they again commence a 
policy of vacillation, in consequence of which the imperial 
ists have enabled and are enabling us to prove that our po 
licy is peaceful, that our international policy has nothing 
in common with either tsarist policy or that of the Russian 
capitalists or. the Russian bourgeoisie, even a democratic 
bourgeoisie. We have proved to the entire world that our 
foreign policy has nothing in common with the policy con 
stantly attributed to us by the whole bourgeois press. 
Consequently, the Poles themselves have exposed every 
bit of deception in their policy. The experience of three 
Russian revolutions has taught us how they were prepared 
and how each served as the basis for the further develop 
ment of home and foreign policy. This experience proves 
that our most faithful assistants in the preparation of 
revolution are the ruling classes, who, laying claim to all 
kinds of coalitions, constituent assemblies and so on, 



140 V. I. LENIN 



claiming to represent the will of the people, actually in 
their own policy at every serious, difficult and crucial mo 
ment in the life of the country, show up the self-interest of 
bourgeois groups battling against each other, unable to 
come to terms, of competing capitalist groups who expose 
themselves a hundred times more effectively than is done 
by communist propaganda. There is not a single country 
or state where the working class, even if it were the most 
revolutionary, could ever be made revolutionary by any 
propaganda and agitation, unless that agitation was backed 
up in practice by the behaviour of the ruling classes of its 
own country. 

What is now taking place in all capitalist countries (and 
this will develop even more with time, particularly in a 
country like Poland) makes us confident that if we emerged 
as victors from a war that was undoubtedly far more 
difficult, and if we have correctly assessed the discord and 
irreconcilability of the bourgeoisie of various groups and 
parties at times when they are particularly in need of 
such an alliance, the improvement in our international 
position is now enormous. This fills us with confidence in 
view of both the internal and the international balance 
of forces. If we take the entire system of all the modern 
imperialist states, if we take all their desires and we 
know that their desire to use every moment for an attack 
on Russia is irresistible and judge them quite objectively 
in the light of the incontrovertible facts of the history of 
recent years and particularly of the past six months, we 
shall see that the international enemy is weakening, and 
that all attempts at an alliance between the imperialists are 
becoming more and more futile, and that from this aspect 
our victory is assured. 

However, comrades, while engaged in economic tasks 
and having concentrated all our attention on peaceful eco 
nomic construction, we face the approach of a new war, 
and it is essential for us to rapidly re-form our ranks. Our 



SPEECH AT THE JOINT MEETING OF THE C.E.C. 141 

entire army, which has recently been a labour army, 38 must 
now turn its attention to other matters. We must drop 
everything else and concentrate on this new war. We are 
perfectly well aware that after all that we have been 
through we do not have to fear the enemy before us now, 
but he may impose new, heavy sacrifices on the 
workers and peasants, he may considerably impede our 
economic construction, bring on the ruin and devastation 
of tens, hundreds and thousands of peasant households. He 
may also, by his temporary success, revive the lost hopes 
of the imperialists who were defeated by us and who will, 
of course, unavoidably join forces with this enemy. We 
must, therefore, declare that the rule observed by us 
throughout all previous wars must be resolutely re-en 
forced. If in the face of all our most conciliatory intentions, 
despite the fact that we made great concessions and 
renounced all national claims, the Polish landlords and the 
Polish bourgeoisie have forced a war on us; if we are cer 
tain, and we must be certain, that the bourgeoisie of all 
countries, even those who at present are not helping the 
Poles, will help them when the war flares up, because 
it is not only a Russian or Polish question but a question 
of the survival of the whole bourgeoisie then we must 
remember and at all costs carry right through the rule that 
we followed in our policy and which was always the guar 
antee of our success. This rule is that once things have 
led to war then everything must be subordinated to its 
interests; all the internal life of the country must be sub 
ordinated to the interests of the war; the slightest hesita 
tion on this score is impermissible. No matter how hard 
it is for the great majority of comrades to tear themselves 
away from their work which has only recently been 
switched onto a new course, more gratifying and essential 
for the tasks of peaceful construction, it must be remem 
bered that the least oversight or inattention may often mean 
the deaths of tens of thousands of our best comrades, our 



142 V. I. LENIN 



younger generation of workers and peasants, our commu 
nists who, as always, are in the front ranks of the fighters. 
Therefore, once more everything for the war effort. Not 
a single meeting, not a single conference should be held 
without having as its first item the question: have 
we done everything possible to help the war effort, 
have all our forces been sufficiently mobilised, have we 
sent sufficient help to the front? Only those people who 
cannot help at the front should remain here. Every sacrifice, 
every assistance for the front, without the slightest hesi 
tation. And, by concentrating all efforts and bearing every 
sacrifice, we shall undoubtedly triumph again. (Applause.) 

Published in 1920 in the book Vol. 31, pp 107-12 

Verbatim Reports of Plenary 
Meetings of the Moscow Soviet 
of Workers , Peasants and Red 
Army Deputies 



SPEECH DELIVERED AT A CONFERENCE 

OF CHAIRMEN OF UYEZD, VOLOST AND VILLAGE 

EXECUTIVE COMMITTEES OF MOSCOW GUBERNIA 

OCTOBER 15, 1920 

Comrades, you wanted to hear a report on the question 
of the domestic and foreign position of the republic, and I 
shall naturally have to devote most of my remarks to the 
war with Poland and its causes. It v/as precisely this war 
that in the main determined the domestic and foreign 
position of the republic during the past six months. And 
it is only now when a provisional peace with Poland has 
just been signed, it is now that it is possible and 
necessary to take a general look at this war, at its sig 
nificance and try to think over the lessons taught us all by 
this war which has only just finished, but whether for good 
nobody knows. Therefore, I first wish to remind you that 
on April 26 this year the Poles started their attack. The 
Soviet Republic solemnly and formally made a peace offer 
to the Poles, the Polish landlords and the Polish bourgeoi 
sie, the terms of which were more favourable than the 
present terms despite the great reverses suffered by our 
troops at Warsaw, and the even greater reverses during 
the retreat from Warsaw. At the end of April this 
year, the Polish front lay 50-150 versts to the east of the 
line which they now regard as the line of the provisional 
peace; in spite of the fact that at that time the line was 



144 V. I. LENIN 



obviously unfair, we solemnly, on behalf of the All-Russian 
Central Executive Committee, made a peace offer to them, 
since, as you all of course know and remember, the main 
concern of the Soviet Government then was to safeguard 
the transition to peaceful construction. We had no reason 
for wishing to settle questions in dispute between ourselves 
and the Polish state through war. We were fully aware that 
the Polish state was then and still is a state of landlords 
and capitalists, and that it is absolutely dependent on the 
capitalists of the Entente countries, in particular on France. 
Despite the fact that at that time Poland held sway, not 
only over the whole of Lithuania, but over Byelorussia, to 
say nothing of Eastern Galicia, we considered it our duty 
to do everything possible to avoid war, so that the working 
class and peasants of Russia would be able to rest, even if 
for a short while, from imperialist and civil wars, and at last 
get down in earnest to peaceful work. What happened has 
happened all too frequently; our straightforward, open 
statement that we were offering the Poles peace on the 
line where they stood, was regarded as a sign of weakness. 
Bourgeois diplomats of all countries are not accustomed to 
such frank declarations, and our readiness to conclude 
peace on a line so disadvantageous to us was taken and 
interpreted as proof of our extreme weakness. The French 
capitalists succeeded in inciting the Polish capitalists to 
go to war. You will remember how, after a short interval, 
following the Polish attack, we replied by dealing a coun 
ter-blow and almost reached Warsaw, after which our 
troops suffered a heavy defeat, and were thrown back. 

For more than a month and during the entire recent 
period our troops were retreating and suffered reverses, 
for they were utterly worn out and exhausted from their 
incredible march from Polotsk to Warsaw. But, I repeat, 
despite this grim situation, peace was concluded on terms 
less advantageous to Poland than the previous terms. The 
frontier at that time was 50 versts to the east, now it is 



SPEECH TO EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE CHAIRMEN 145 

50 versts to the west. Despite the fact, therefore, that we 
concluded peace at a time when it was advantageous only 
to the enemy, when our troops were retreating and Wran- 
gel was pressing forward with renewed force, the terms of 
the peace treaty were more advantageous for ourselves. 
This once again proves to you that when the Soviet Gov 
ernment makes a peace offer, its words and statements 
have to be treated seriously, for otherwise what happens 
is that we offer peace on terms less favourable to us and 
get this peace on more ifarvourable terms. The Polish land 
lords and capitalists will not, of course, forget this lesson; 
they realise that they went too far; now the peace terms 
give them less territory than was offered them previously. 
And this is not the first lesson. Probably you all remember 
that in the spring of 1919 a representative of the American 
Government came to Moscow and proposed a provisional 
peace with us and with all the whiteguard commanders at 
the time: Kolchak, Denikin and others, a peace which 
would have been extremely unfavourable to us. When he 
returned and reported on the terms of this peace, our 
terms were not considered advantageous, and the war 
continued. You know the results of this war. This means 
that it is not the first time that the Soviet Government has 
proved to be considerably stronger than it appears, and 
that our notes do not contain the boasts and threats which 
are customary to all bourgeois governments; this means 
that not to agree to peace with Soviet Russia is tantamount 
to obtaining peace some time later on far worse conditions. 
Such things are not forgotten in international politics, and 
having proved to the Polish landlords that they now have 
a worse peace than the one which we originally offered, 
we shall teach the Polish people, the Polish peasants and 
workers, to judge and compare the statements of their 
government and of our government. 

Possibly many of you have seen in the newspapers the 
note of the American Government in which it states: "We 

102283 



146 V. I. LENIN 



do not wish to have dealings with the Soviet Government 
because it does not fulfil its pledges." We are not surprised, 
because this has been said for many years, and still the 
ultimate result has always been that all their attempts to 
invade Soviet Russia ended in disaster. The Polish newspa 
pers, nearly all of which are in the pay of the land 
lords and capitalists this they call the freedom of the 
press say that the Soviet Government is not to be trusted, 
that it is a government of tyrants and cheats. All the Polish 
newspapers say this, but the Polish workers and peasants 
check the words with the deeds, and deeds have shown 
that we proved our love of peace the first time we made 
our peace offer; by concluding peace in October we proved 
this again. You will not find such proof in the history of a 
single bourgeois government, and this fact cannot but 
leave an impression on the minds of the Polish workers and 
peasants. The Soviet Government concluded peace at a 
time when it was not to its advantage to do so. Only in this 
way shall we teach the governments of states in the hands 
of landlords and capitalists to stop lying, and shall we de 
stroy the faith which the workers and peasants have in them. 
We must reflect more on this than on anything else. Soviet 
power in Russia is surrounded by innumerable enemies, 
and yet these enemies are powerless. Think of the course 
and outcome of the Polish war. We now know that the 
French capitalists were behind Poland, that they supplied 
Poland with money, equipment, uniforms, shells and sent 
them French officers. We learned quite recently of the 
appearance of black troops on the Polish front, namely, 
French colonial troops. This means that France conducted 
the war, and she was assisted by Britain and America. At 
the same time in the person of Wrangel France recognised 
the legitimate government of Russia so France was sup 
porting Wrangel as well and gave him the means to equip 
and maintain an army. Britain and America are also giving 
aid to Wrangel s army. Consequently, three allies were 



SPEECH TO EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE CHAIRMEN j 47 

against us: France, supported by all the rich countries of 
the world, Poland and Wrangel and we emerged from this 
war having concluded a favourable peace. This means we 
remained victors. Looking at the map everyone will see 
that we were victorious, that we emerged from this war 
with more territory than we had before it started, But can 
it be said that the enemy is weaker than we are, that he is 
weaker in the military sense, and that he has fewer peo 
ple, fewer war supplies, less ammunition? He has more of 
everything. This enemy is stronger than we are, and yet 
he was beaten. This is something we need to think about 
in order to understand Soviet Russia s position with re 
spect to all the other countries. 

When the Bolsheviks started the revolution they said 
that it could and must be started, but at the same time we 
did not forget that the only way in which we could success 
fully end it and bring it to a completely victorious conclu 
sion would be not to restrict ourselves to Russia alone, but, 
in alliance with a whole number of countries, to defeat in 
ternational capital. Russian capital is linked with interna 
tional capital. And when our enemies say to us: even if 
you were to win in Russia your cause will nevertheless 
perish, because the other capitalist states will crush you, 
we now have an answer the highly important experience 
of the war with Poland, which shows how things actually 
turned out. In fact, why did it happen that within six 
months and even less if we regard the start of the attack 
as taking place in April France, Poland and Wrangel, 
more powerful than we are, full of hatred towards Bolshe 
vism and of determination to overthrow Soviet power, were 
defeated, and that the war ended in our favour? How could 
it happen that Soviet Russia, exhausted by the imperialist 
and civil wars, surrounded by enemies, cut off from every 
source of clothing and equipment this Soviet Russia 
turned out to be the victor? We must reflect on this, 
because if we go deep into this question we begin to under 



148 V. I. LENIN 



stand the mechanics not only of the Russian, but of the 
world revolution as well. We see confirmation that the 
Russian revolution is only one link in the chain of the 
world revolution, and that our cause is strong and invin 
cible, because the revolutionary cause is growing through 
out the world; economic conditions are taking shape in 
such a way that they are making our enemies weaker and 
making us stronger with every passing day. That this is 
neither exaggeration, nor boasting nor yet over-enthusiasm 
has once again been proved to you by the Polish war. Three 
allies were fighting against us. You would have thought that 
it would not have been difficult for the three allies to unite, 
but it turned out that, enlightened by the great experience 
of the war of Yudenich, Kolchak and Denikin, they were 
unable to unite against us and at every step they quarrelled 
among themselves. The history of the Polish war which has 
only just ended is particularly instructive in this connec 
tion. Our march on Warsaw, the march of the Red Army in 
which weary, exhausted, poorly-clad soldiers trudged more 
than 600 versts, continuously inflicting one defeat after 
another on the Polish troops, which were excellently trained 
and supplied with hundreds of the best instructors out of 
the French officers this march revealed to us the re 
lations between all our enemies. When the Red Army troops 
were approaching the Polish frontier we recieved a tele 
gram, on July 12, from the British Foreign Secretary, Lord 
Curzon, on behalf of the League of Nations, the notorious 
League of Nations, an alliance which professes to unite 
Britain, France, America, Italy and Japan, countries which 
possess military forces, gigantic forces, which possess all 
the navies of the world, and against which military resist 
ance would seem to be something perfectly impossible and 
absurd. On behalf of this League of Nations Curzon proposes 
that we stop the war and enter into negotiations with the 
Poles in London. According to this telegram, the frontier 
should be a line in the proximity of Grodno, Bialystok, 



SPEECH TO EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE CHAIRMEN 149 

Brest-Litovsk and along the River San in Eastern Galicia. 
We replied to this proposal saying that we do not recog 
nise any League of Nations, because we have seen its 
insignificance, and even its members disregard it. The 
French Government considered our reply impudent, and 
you would have thought that this League of Nations would 
have launched an attack on us. But what happened? The 
League of Nations went to pieces at our very first state 
ment, and Britain and France fell on each other. 

For several years the British War Minister, Churchill, 
has been using all possible means, legitimate and more 
often illegitimate, from the viewpoint of British law, 
to support all the whiteguards against Russia, to sup 
ply them with military equipment. He bitterly hates Soviet 
Russia; yet immediately after our statement Britain fell 
out with France, because France needs the forces of a 
whiteguard Russia to protect her from Germany, while 
Britain needs no such protection. Britain is a naval power, 
she fears no action because she has a very (strong navy. So, 
from the very outset, the League of Nations, which had 
sent such unheard-oif threats to Russia, was itself helpless. 
At every step it is obvious that the interests oif the mem 
bers of the League conflict. France desires the defeat of 
Britain and vice versa. And when Comrade Kamenev was 
negotiating with the British Government in London and 
said to the British Prime Minister, "Suppose you really do 
what you say, but what about France?" the British Prime 
Minister had to reply that France would go her own way. 
"We cannot take the same road as France," he said. It 
became plain that the League of Nations was non-existent, 
that the alliance of the capitalist powers is sheer fraud, and 
that in actual fact it is an alliance of robbers, each one of 
whom tries to snatch something from the other. And when 
we discovered, at the conclusion of peace in Riga, what 
divided Poland, Britain, France and Wrangel, why they 
could not act in unison, we learnt that their interests differ: 



150 V. I. LENIN 



Britain wants to have in her sphere of influence the new, 
small states Finland, Estonia, Latvia and Lithuania and 
has no interest in, and even stands to lose from, the restora 
tion of tsarist, or whiteguard, or even bourgeois, Russia. 
That is why the actions of Britain run counter to those of 
France, and she cannot ally herself with Poland and Wran- 
gel. France s concern is to fight to the last Polish soldier 
for her interests, for her debts. She hopes we shall pay her 
the 20 thousand million debt incurred by the former tsar 
and recognised by the Kerensky government. Every sen 
sible person realises that the French capitalists will not 
see this money again any more than they will ever see 
their ears. The French capitalists realise that the workers 
and peasants of France cannot be sent to war, but that 
they can send as many Polish soldiers as they want; let 
them die so that the French capitalists may get back their 
billions. The Polish workers too, however, can see that 
French, British and other officers in Poland behave as if 
they were in a conquered country. That is why, during the 
Riga negotiations, we saw that the party of the Polish 
workers and peasants undoubtedly patriotic, undoubtedly 
hostile to Bolshevism, like our Right Menshevik and Social 
ist-Revolutionary parties stood for peace and was opposed 
to the government of the Polish landlords and capitalists, 
who up to the last moment tried to wreck the peace, who 
aim at doing so even now, and will long continue to do so. 
I shall have to speak on this point when I broach the ques 
tion of whether the provisional peace we have just 
concluded will last. 

The third ally, Wrangel, who fought for the return of 
Russia to the landlords and capitalists, regards Poland as 
part of Russia. All the Russian tsars, landlords and capital 
ists were accustomed to regard Poland as their prey; they 
never forgot that Poland had been crushed by the Russian 
serfs when they were led to war by the tsar. This meant 
that if Wrangel had been victorious, he would have used 



SPEECH TO EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE CHAIRMEN 151 

his victory in order to restore full power both in Russia 
and in Poland to the landlords. What happened, however, 
was that, when the three allies stood ready to attack us, 
they began to fight among themselves. What France wants, 
neither the Polish peasant nor the Polish worker wants, 
and what Wrangel wants, not even a single Polish landlord 
wants. And now, when we hear Wrangel s radio broadcasts 
or the French Government radio communications from Pa 
ris, we see that France and Wrangel are grinding their teeth 
because they realise the implication of this peace which we 
have concluded with Poland, although they assert that it 
is not a peace, and that Poland cannot sign it. We shall 
see meanwhile peace has been signed. But in point of 
fact, neither Wrangel nor. France really understand what 
this means. They cannot stomach the miracle of devastated 
Soviet Russia defeating civilised countries stronger than 
herself. They do not understand that the whole strength of 
these victories lies in the basic teaching of Communists 
that property divides and labour unites. Private property is 
robbery, and a state based on private property is a state of 
robbers who are fighting for a share of the spoils. And 
although they have not yet finished this war they are already 
fighting among themselves. A year ago fourteen states 
threatened us. But this alliance of fourteen states broke up 
immediately. And why did it break up? Simply because the 
agreement between these states only existed on paper, and 
not one of them went to war. And now, when a war has 
started, when France, Poland and Wrangel have joined 
forces, their alliance too broke up, because they are trying 
to trip each other up. They are trying to divide up the skin 
of the bear which they have not yet killed and never will 
kill. And they are already fighting over this bear. 

The experience of world politics has proved that an 
alliance against Soviet Russia is inevitably doomed to 
failure, because it is an imperialist alliance, an alliance of 
robbers who are not united, and who have no genuine, per- 



152 



V. I. LENIN 



manent interest in common. They lack that which unites 
the working class, they have no common interest, and 
this was again revealed during the Polish war. When our 
Red Army broke the resistance of the Poles, when it cap 
tured Bialystok and Brest-Litovsk and approached the Polish 
frontier, this signified the collapse of the entire internation 
al policy, for it is based on the Treaty of Versailles, which 
is a treaty of robbers and plunderers. When we were forced 
to sign the Brest peace, the burden of which we bore for 
so long, the whole world cried out that it was a robber s 
peace. When Germany was defeated, the League of Nations 
which had been fighting against her proclaimed the war to 
be a liberation war, a democratic war. Peace was forced 
on Germany, but this was a usurer s peace, a strangler s 
peace, a butcher s peace, because they looted and parcelled 
out Germany and Austria. They deprived them of all means 
of existence, and the children were left to starve and die 
of hunger; this was a predatory peace without parallel. 
Therefore, what is the Treaty of Versailles? It is an unpar 
alleled, predatory peace which has made slaves of tens of 
millions including the most civilised human beings. This 
is not a peace; these are terms dictated by robbers with 
knives in their hands to their defenceless victim. Under the 
Treaty of Versailles her enemies have deprived Germany of 
all her colonies. Turkey, Persia and China have been en 
slaved. A situation has arisen where seven-tenths of the 
world s population is in a position of servitude. These slaves 
are scattered all over the world and are at the mercy of a 
group of countries: Britain, France and Japan. That is why 
the entire international system, the order based on the 
Treaty of Versailles, stands on the edge of a volcano, for 
the seven-tenths of the world s population who are en 
slaved are just waiting impatiently for someone to give a 
lead in the struggle which would make all these countries 
begin to shake. France, hoping to be repaid old debts, is 
herself in debt to America whom she cannot repay since 



SPEECH TO EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE CHAIRMEN 153 

she has nothing, and private property there is sacred. 
What is the essence of this sacred, private property? It is 
merely that tsars and capitalists borrow money, and the 
workers and peasants have to repay the debt for them. 
They are on the eve of a crash. They cannot meet their 
debts. And just at that moment the Red Army broke 
through the Polish frontier and approached the German 
frontier. That was when everybody in Germany, even the 
reactionaries and monarchists, was saying that the Bolshe 
viks would save them, it being evident that the Versailles 
peace was falling to pieces, that there was a Red Army 
which had declared war on all capitalists. And what hap 
pened? What happened was that the Versailles peace now 
hinges on Poland. It is true that we were not strong enough 
to bring the war to an end. We have to remember, how 
ever, that our workers and peasants were barefooted and in 
rags, but all the same they marched forward and overcame 
difficulties and fought Under conditions never before 
experienced by any other army in the whole world. We 
lacked the strength, we could not take Warsaw and finish 
off the Polish landlords, whiteguards and capitalists, but 
our army showed the whole world that the Treaty of Ver 
sailles is not the force that it is made out to be, that 
hundreds of millions of people are now condemned for 
many years to repay loans themselves, and to make their 
grandchildren and great-grandchildren to do the same in 
order to enrich the French, British and other imperialists. 
The Red Army proved that the Treaty of Versailles is not 
very firm. After the Treaty of Versailles our army showed 
that in the summer of 1920, the Soviet country, devastated 
as it was, was within a few steps of complete victory 
thanks to the Red Army. The whole world saw that there is 
a force for which the Treaty of Versailles holds no terror, 
and that no Versailles treaties will subdue the power of the 
workers and peasants once they know how to deal with 
the landlords and capitalists. 



154 V. I. LENIN 



So, the very campaign against the Versailles peace, the 
campaign against all the capitalists and landlords of every 
country and against their oppression of others was not in 
vain. Millions upon millions of workers and peasants in 
all countries have been watching this and thinking about it 
and they now see, in the Soviet Republic, their deliverers. 
They say: the Red Army has shown that it can give blow 
for blow, but it was not strong enough for victory in the 
first year or, you might even say, in the first month of its 
peaceful construction. That first month of peaceful con 
struction, however, will be followed by many years, and 
with every year that passes it will become ten times strong 
er. It was thought that the Versailles peace was a peace 
of omnipotent imperialists, but after the summer of 1920 
they proved to be weaker than the workers and peasants 
of even a weak country, when they know how to unite their 
forces and repulse the capitalists. In the summer of 1920 
Soviet Russia emerged as a force which not only defended 
itself against an attack, against the onslaught of the Polish 
whiteguards, but revealed itself in fact as a world force 
able to wreck the Treaty of Versailles and to free hundreds 
of millions of people in the majority of countries of the 
world. This is the significance of the Red Army campaign 
which took place this summer. That is why events took 
place in Britain during this war which marked a turning- 
point in the whole of British policy. When we refused to 
halt our troops Britain replied by a threat: "We are send 
ing our fleet to Petrograd." The order was given to attack 
Petrograd. That is what the British Prime Minister an 
nounced to Comrade Kamenev, and all countries were noti 
fied. But on the day following the dispatch of this telegram 
meetings were held throughout Britain, and Councils of 
Action sprang up like mushrooms. The workers united. All 
the British Mensheviks, who are even more vile than the 
Russian, and who to a far greater degree play the part of 
lackeys to the capitalists, even they had to join in because 



SPEECH TO EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE CHAIRMEN 155 

the workers demanded it, because the British workers said: 
"We shall not permit a war against Russia!" And all over 
Britain Councils of Action were formed, the war plans of 
the British imperialists were frustrated, and once again it 
was proved that in her war against the imperialists of all 
countries Soviet Russia has allies in each of them. When 
the Bolsheviks were saying: "We are not alone in our revolt 
against the landlords and capitalists of Russia, because in 
every country we have an ally, the worker and peasant; 
that ally is to be found in the majority of countries" we 
were ridiculed and asked: "Where are these working people 
to be seen?" Yes, it is true that in Western Europe, where 
the capitalists are much stronger, where they live at the ex 
pense of hundreds of millions in the plundered colonies, it is 
far more difficult to rise in revolt. There the working-class 
revolution is developing incomparably more slowly. Never 
theless it is developing. And when, in July 1920, Britain 
threatened Russia with war, the British workers prevented 
that war from taking place. The British Mensheviks fol 
lowed the British Bolsheviks. They had to follow the British 
Bolsheviks and come out against the Constitution, against 
the law, saying: "We shall not permit this war. If you 
declare war tomorrow, we shall call a strike and not only 
shall we not give coal to you, but we shall not give France 
coal, either." The British workers declared that they want 
ed to shape foreign policy; and they are directing it in the 
same way as the Bolsheviks in Russia and not as the capi 
talists in other countries. 

That is an example of what the Polish war brought to 
light. That is why we emerged as victors within six months. 
That is why devastated, weak, backward Soviet Russia is 
defeating the alliance of incomparably more powerful 
states; this is so because they lack strength at home, be 
cause the workers and the working people in general are 
against them, and this is apparent at every crisis. This is ap 
parent because they are robbers who attack each other and 



156 V. I. LENIN 



cannot unite against us; because, in the final analysis, pri 
vate property divides people and transforms them into 
beasts, whereas labour unites them. And labour has not only 
united the workers and peasants of Russia, it has united 
them with the workers and peasants of all countries; and 
consequently, now in all these countries the people can see 
that Soviet Russia is the force which is wrecking the Ver 
sailles peace. Soviet Russia will become stronger, and the 
Treaty of Versailles will collapse as it all but collapsed at 
the first blow of the Red Army in July 1920. That is why the 
Polish war ended in a manner not bargained for by a single 
imperialist state. And this is a lesson of supreme impor 
tance for us, for it shows by the example and behaviour of 
all the countries taking part in international politics that 
our cause is strong, that no matter what attempts are made 
to invade Russia, what military moves are made against 
us, and in all probability there will be many more such 
attempts, all these attempts will go up in smoke as we 
know from our actual experience, in which we have been 
steeled. After every such attempt by our enemies we 
shall emerge stronger than ever. 

I shall now turn from international politics, where the 
clash with the Versailles peace demonstrated our strength, 
to problems which are more immediate and practical, to the 
situation which arose in connection with the Treaty of 
Versailles. I shall not dwell on the significance of the 
Second Congress of the Communist International which 
took place in Moscow in July, the congress of the Commu 
nists of the whole world, and the Congress of the Peoples 
of the East which took place afterwards in Baku. 39 They 
were international congresses that united the Communists 
and showed that in all the civilised countries, and in all the 
backward Eastern countries, the banner of Bolshevism, the 
programme of Bolshevism, the line of the Bolsheviks 
action, represent for the workers of all the civilised coun 
tries, and for the peasants of all the backward colonial 



SPEECH TO EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE CHAIRMEN 157 

countries, the banner of salvation, the banner of struggle. 
They showed that during the past three years Soviet Russia 
did in fact not only beat off those who threw themselves 
on her in order to throttle her, but earned herself the sym 
pathy of the working people of the whole world; that we 
not only defeated our enemies, but acquired and are still 
acquiring new allies daily and by the hour. It is not pos 
sible to assess immediately what was achieved by the con 
gress of Communists in Moscow and the congress of Com 
munist representatives of the peoples of the East in Baku; 
this does not lend itself to a direct calculation, but it is a 
victory of greater significance than some military victories, 
because it proves to us that the experience of the Bolshe 
viks, their activities and programme, their call to revolu 
tionary struggle against the capitalists and imperialists 
have won world-wide recognition. What was achieved in 
Moscow in July and in Baku in September will for many 
months to come be reflected on and assimilated by the 
workers and peasants of the world. They are a force which 
in any conflict or crisis that may arise will, as we have 
frequently seen, declare itself for Soviet Russia. This is 
the fundamental lesson of the Polish war from the stand 
point of the balance of world forces. 

In dealing with events at home I must say that the chief 
force in the field against us is Wrangel. France, Poland and 
Wrangel went against us together. When our forces were 
wholly engaged in the war on the Western front Wrangel 
gathered his forces together, aided by the French and 
British navies. When Wrangel approached the Kuban he 
was hoping for the support of wealthy Cossack kulaks. 
Who was it that aided Wrangel then? Who gave him fuel 
and a fleet in order to maintain him in the Donets Basin? 
The British and American navies. We know, however, that 
this landing operation failed, for the Kuban Cossack, 
with plenty of grain, could see perfectly well through 
those promises of a constituent assembly, rule of the 



158 V. I. LENIN 



people and other fine things with which the Mensheviks, 
Socialist-Revolutionaries, etc., tried to fool people. Perhaps 
the Kuban peasants had believed them when they spoke so 
eloquently, but in the long run they put their faith in deeds 
not in words, and saw that although the Bolsheviks were 
stern people, things were nevertheless better with them. 
As a result Wrangel fled from the Kuban, and many hun 
dreds and thousands of his troops were shot. Despite this, 
Wrangel assembled more and more of his forces in the 
Crimea; his troops consisted mainly of officers. This was 
done in the hope that at the first favourable moment it 
would be possible to increase these forces provided they 
had the support of the peasants. 

Wrangel s troops are better equipped with guns, tanks, 
aeroplanes than all the other armies that had fought in Rus 
sia. Wrangel was assembling his forces when we were fight 
ing the Poles; that is why I say that the peace with Poland 
is unstable. According to the provisional peace signed on the 
12th, the armistice will come into force only on the 18th, 
and the Poles still have two days in which they can repu 
diate it. The whole French press and the capitalists are 
striving to incite Poland to start a new war against Soviet 
Russia; Wrangel is hastening to use all his connections in 
order to wreck this peace, because he can see that when 
the war with Poland is ended the Bolsheviks will turn 
against him. The only practical conclusion for us, therefore, 
is to direct all our forces against Wrangel. In April this 
year we proposed peace on terms which were unfavour 
able to us only in order to spare tens of thousands of work 
ers and peasants the carnage of a new war. For us fron 
tiers do not matter so much, we do not mind losing some 
territory in the frontier regions; it is far more important 
for us to preserve the lives of tens of thousands of workers 
and peasants, to retain the possibility of peaceful construc 
tion, than to retain a small piece of territory. That is why 
we submitted this peace proposal and now repeat that 



SPEECH TO EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE CHAIRMEN 159 

Wrangel is the main threat, that his troops, which have 
grown in strength enormously in the meantime, are fighting 
desperately, at points have crossed the Dnieper and have 
taken the offensive. Wrangel s front and the Polish front 
are one and the same thing, and the question of the war 
with Wrangel is the question of the war with Poland, and 
in order to turn the provisional peace with Poland into a 
permanent peace we must crush Wrangel in the shortest 
possible space of time. If this is not done we cannot be cer 
tain that the Polish landlords and capitalists, under the 
pressure of the French landlords and capitalists and with 
their help, may not once again try to embroil us in war. 
That is why I am taking advantage of this broadly repre 
sentative meeting to draw your attention to this funda 
mental question and to ask you to make use of your posi 
tion and authority in order to influence the broad mass of 
workers and peasants and ensure that the greatest possible 
efforts are made towards the full achievement of our im 
mediate task at all costs to crush Wrangel in the short 
est space of time, as the possibility of our engaging in the 
work of peaceful construction depends only on this. 

We know that in this devastated country the peasant 
economy has been thoroughly destroyed, that the peasant 
needs goods, not the paper money which is being showered 
on him in such profusion. But in order to supply him with 
goods: paraffin oil, salt, clothing, etc., industry must be 
restored. We are approaching the position when we can 
do this. We know that we now have more grain than we 
had last year, and we have fuel for industry, we have over 
100 million poods of oil from Baku. The Donets Basin, 
which supplies an enormous quantity of fuel, has been 
rehabilitated; and despite the fact that during Wrangel s 
march to the south of the Donets Basin some industrial 
enterprises had to be evacuated, Donets industry may, 
nevertheless, be considered to be completely restored. Tim 
ber felling has improved; whereas last year we laid in seven 



160 V. I. LENIN 



million cubic metres, we now have considerably more. Our 
industry is reviving. In Ivanovo-Voznesensk Gubernia 
where for a number of years the factories were at a stand 
still putting all the workers in low spirits, the factories 
are now being supplied with fuel and are beginning to 
function. Thanks to the victories in Turkestan, they have 
received Turkestan cotton and are beginning to function. 
Before us now lies a vast field of productive work, and we 
must do everything possible to rehabilitate industry, to 
supply clothing, footwear and food to the peasant and so 
commence the fair exchange of grain for town products. 
We must begin to help agriculture. Yesterday, in the Coun 
cil of People s Commissars, we decided to encourage by 
extra rations the workers of the factory that will manu 
facture the first plough proving most suitable to our Rus 
sian conditions, so that we may improve our agriculture 
and raise it to a higher level, despite the lack of cattle. 

The workers and peasants are working together and 
achieving successes without landlords and capitalists, but 
in order to tackle this question in earnest we need one 
thing: we need to firmly remember that tens of thousands of 
workers and peasants are now dying on the Wrangel front, 
that the enemy is better armed than we are, that there, on 
the Wrangel front, the last desperate battle is being fought 
out; that there the question is being decided whether So 
viet Russia will have a chance to strengthen herself for 
peaceful labour, so that not only no Polish whiteguards, but 
no imperialist, world-wide alliance would hold any terror 
for her. It depends on you, comrades. You must exert all 
your efforts and remember that Soviet Russia was able to 
solve all the problems of her struggle, not because decrees 
were being issued from the centre, but because these 
decrees met with the enthusiastic and ardent sympathy of 
the workers and peasants in the localities. Only when the 
workers and peasants saw that they were fighting against 
Kolchak, Denikin and Wrangel for their own land, factories 



SPEECH TO EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE CHAIRMEN ]Q[ 

and workshops, for their own interests against the land 
lords and capitalists, did every one of them give the Red 
Army every possible support and assistance. When the Red 
Army men saw that the people in the rear were doing all 
they could for them, they were filled with that spirit which 
led them to victory. Everything depends on our defeating 
Wrangel, and I call on you to do everything possible in 
your organisations, factories and workshops, in your vil 
lages, voluntarily and in accordance with the interests of 
the workers and peasants of the whole of Russia, to come 
to the aid of the Wrangel front, and then we shall be vic 
torious, both on the Wrangel front and on the international 
front. (Stormy applause.) 

Published in 1920 in the book Vol. 31 pp 293-308 

Verbatim Reports of Plenary 
Meetings of the Moscow Soviet 
of Workers , Peasants and Red 
Army Deputies 



112283 



OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION 
AND THE TASKS OF THE PARTY 

(Speech Delivered to the Moscow Guhernia Conference 
of the R.C.P.(B.), November 21, 1920) 

(Applause.) Comrades, in speaking of the international 
position of the Soviet Republic we naturally have to deal 
mainly with the Polish war and Wrangel s defeat. I think 
that at a meeting of Party workers who, of course, have 
followed the Party press and have frequently heard major 
reports on this question, there is no need and it would be 
superfluous for me to dwell on the details of the whole of 
this period or on every separate turn in the course of the 
Polish war, on the nature of our offensives, or on the sig 
nificance of our defeat at Warsaw. I assume that the 
majority of comrades are so familiar with this aspect that 
I would only have to repeat myself, and this would be 
unsatisfactory to these comrades. I shall, therefore, not 
speak on the various episodes and turns of our Polish war, 
but on the results before us now. 

After the Red Army s brilliant victories in the summer 
and the heavy defeat at Warsaw, after the conclusion of a 
provisional peace with Poland which at this very moment 
in Riga is being, or at least should be, made a final peace, 
the chances that this provisional peace will really become 
a final peace have greatly increased; they have increased 



OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION AND PARTY TASKS 163 

due to the rout of Wrangel, Now that this rout has become 
an established fact the imperialist press of the Entente 
countries is beginning to show its cards and confess what 
it most of all has up to now kept hidden. 

I do not know whether you noticed a small item in the 
papers today or a few days ago reporting that the newspa 
per Times (Temps), the chief organ of the French imperial 
ist bourgeoisie, now says the peace with Poland was con 
cluded against France s advice. There can be no doubt that 
the spokesmen of the French bourgeoisie are here admit 
ting a truth which they would have most of all preferred to 
conceal and which for a very long time they have tried to 
conceal. Despite the unfavourable terms of the Polish 
peace (although they are more favourable than those we 
ourselves offered to the Polish landlords last April in order 
to avoid any war) and they are unfavourable as compared 
to what could have been achieved but for the extremely 
serious situation at Warsaw we succeeded in obtaining 
terms which frustrate the greater part of the general plan 
of the imperialists. The French bourgeoisie now admit that 
they insisted on Poland continuing the war, that they were 
opposed to the conclusion of peace, fearing the rout of 
Wrangel s army and wishing to support a new intervention 
and campaign against the Soviet Republic. Despite the fact 
that the conditions of Polish imperialism impel and have 
impelled it to war against Russia, despite this, the plans of 
the French imperialists were wrecked, and as a result we 
now have gained something more substantial than a mere 
breathing-space. 

Of the small states previously belonging to the Russian 
Empire, Poland was among those which, during the past 
three years, were most of all at odds with the Great Rus 
sian nation, and which most of all laid claim to a large slice 
of territory not inhabited by the Poles. We also concluded 
peace with Finland, Estonia and Latvia against the wishes 
of the imperialist Entente, but it was easier to do this 

11* 



164 V. I. LENIN 



because the bourgeoisie of Finland, Estonia and Latvia had 
no imperialist aims of their own which would call for war 
against the Soviet Republic, whereas the Polish bourgeois 
republic had an eye, not only on Lithuania and Byelorusisia, 
but also on the Ukraine. Furthermore, it was impelled in 
this direction by the age-long struggle of Poland who used 
to be a major power and who is now pitting herself against 
another major power Russia. Even at the present time 
Poland cannot refrain from this age-long struggle. That is 
why Poland was much more bellicose and stubborn in her 
war plans against our Republic and that is why our present 
success in concluding peace against the wishes of the 
Entente is so much more resounding. If there is any power 
retaining a bourgeois system and bordering on Russia on 
whom the Entente can rely in a long-term plan of military 
intervention, it is only Poland, and that is why now, when 
all the bourgeois states hate Soviet power, they are imme 
diately interested in having Eastern Galicia under the con 
trol of the Polish landlords. 

Furthermore, Poland lays claim to the Ukraine and 
Lithuania. This lends the campaign a particularly acute and 
stubborn character. The supply of war materials to Poland 
was, naturally, the main concern of France and other 
powers, and it is quite impossible to estimate just how 
much money has gone into this. Therefore, despite our 
defeat at Warsaw, the importance of the Red Army s ulti 
mate victory is particularly great, for it has placed Poland 
in a position where she no longer has the strength to con 
tinue the war. She has had to agree to a peace the terms of 
which gave her less than those proposed by us in April 
1920, before the Polish offensive, when we, not wishing to 
be torn from our work of economic construction, suggested 
frontiers eminently unfavourable to us. At that time, the 
press of the petty-bourgeois patriots, to whom both our 
Socialist-Revolutionaries and Mensheviks belong, accused 
the Bolsheviks of conciliation and of an almost Tolstoyan 



OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION AND PARTY TASKS 165 

attitude displayed by the Soviet Government. It called a 
Tolstoyan attitude the fact that we agreed to peace on the 
proposed Pilsudski line, the line which left Minsk in Polish 
hands, the frontier in some places being 50 and at others 
100 versts to the east of the present line. Of course, I do 
not have to tell a meeting of Party workers why we agreed 
and had to agree to worse frontiers if indeed our work of 
economic construction was to go on. The result was that 
by her war Poland, retaining a bourgeois system, caused 
extreme economic dislocation of the whole country, pro 
voked a vast growth of discontent and brought about a 
bourgeois reign of terror, not only against the industrial 
workers, but against the poor peasants. The general posi 
tion of Poland as a bourgeois state became so unstable 
that there could be no question of continuing the war. 

The successes of the Soviet government in this respect 
are tremendous. When we raised the question of the tasks 
and conditions needed for the victory of the proletarian 
revolution in Russia three years ago, we always categori 
cally stated that there could be no permanent victory 
unless it was followed up by a proletarian revolution in 
the West, and that a correct appraisal of our revolution 
was only possible from the international point of view. In 
order to achieve a permanent victory we must achieve the 
victory of the proletarian revolution in all, or at any rate 
in several, main capitalist countries. After three years of 
desperate, stubborn struggle, we can see in what sense our 
predictions were or were not justified. They were not 
justified in the sense that there was no swift or simple 
solution of this problem. None of. us, of course, expected 
that such an unequal struggle as the struggle of Russia 
against the whole of the capitalist world could drag on for 
three years. It turned out that neither side, the Russian 
Soviet Republic or the rest of the capitalist world, gained 
victory or suffered defeat, and at the same time it turned 
out that while our forecasts were not fulfilled simply, 



166 v - J * LENIN 



swiftly and directly, they were fulfilled insofar as we 
achieved the main thing the possibility has been preserved 
for the existence of proletarian power and the Soviet 
Republic even in the event of the world socialist revolution 
being delayed. And in this respect it must be said that the 
Republic s international position is now such that it has 
provided the best and most precise confirmation of all our 
plans and all our policy. 

That the military strength of the R.S.F.S.R. does not 
stand comparison with that of all the capitalist powers is 
obvious. In this respect we are very much weaker than 
they, but, nevertheless, after three years of war we forced 
nearly all these states to abandon the idea of further 
intervention. This means that what we conceived as being 
possible three years ago, while the imperialist war was 
still on, namely, a long drawn-out situation, without any 
final decision in favour of either side, has come about. And 
the reasons for this? It has not come about because we 
proved to be militarily stronger, and the Entente weaker, 
but because, throughout this period, the internal disintegra 
tion in the Entente countries intensified, whereas we, on 
the contrary, internally gained in strength. This has been 
confirmed and proved by the war. The Entente was 
unable to fight us with its own forces. The workers and 
peasants of the capitalist countries could not be forced to 
fight us. The bourgeois states managed to retain their bour 
geois status at the end of the imperialist war. They managed 
to hold off and delay the crisis directly threatening them, but 
basically they so undermined their own position that, despite 
all their gigantic military forces, they had to acknowledge 
after three years that they were unable to crush the Soviet 
Republic with its almost non-existent military forces. It 
turned out, therefore, that fundamentally our policy and 
our predictions proved correct in everything and that 
indeed the oppressed people in any capitalist country were 
pur allies, for it was they who stopped the war. We are in 



OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION AND PARTY TASKS 167 

the position of not having gained an international victory, 
which for us is the only sure victory, but of having won 
conditions enabling us to coexist with capitalist powers 
who are now compelled to enter into commercial relations 
with us. In the course of the struggle we have won the 
right to an independent existence. 

When we cast a glance at our international position as 
a whole, we see, therefore, that we have achieved tremen 
dous successes, that we not only have a breathing-space 
but something much more significant. A breathing-space, 
as we understand it, is a brief period during which the 
imperialist powers have many times had an opportunity 
to make an attempt at renewing the war against us with 
greater strength. And today, too, we do not allow our 
attention to be distracted and do not deny the possibility of 
a future military intervention in our affairs by the capitalist 
countries. It is essential for us to maintain a state of mili 
tary preparedness. But if we take a glance at the conditions 
under which we defeated all attempts by Russian counter 
revolution and achieved the formal conclusion of peace 
with all Western states, it will be clear that we have more 
than a breathing-space we have entered a new period in 
which we have won the right to our fundamental interna 
tional existence in the network of capitalist states. Internal 
conditions did not allow a single powerful capitalist state 
to hurl its army against Russia; this was due to the revolu 
tion having matured inside those countries and prevented 
them from conquering us as quickly as they might have 
done. There were British, French and Japanese armies on 
Russian territory for three years. There is no doubt that 
the most insignificant concentration of forces by these 
three powers would have been quite enough to win a victory 
over us in a few months, if not in a few weeks. We were 
able to hold that attack off only on account of disintegra 
tion among the French troops and the ferment that began 
among the British and Japanese. It is this divergence of 



168 V. I. LENIN 



imperialist interests that we have made use of all the time. 
We defeated the intervention only because their own inte 
rests kept them divided but consolidated and strengthened 
us. It was in this way that we obtained a breathing-space 
and made impossible the complete victory of German impe 
rialism at the time of the Brest peace. 

In recent times this discord has become still greater, 
especially in view of the project to conclude an agreement 
on concessions with a group of American capitalist sharks, 
with the most rabid of them, headed by a multimillionaire 
who expects to form a whole group of multimillionaires. 
We know that almost every report coming from the Far 
East bears witness to the extraordinary resentment reigning 
in Japan over the conclusion of this agreement, although 
so far there is no agreement, but only a project. Japanese 
public opinion, however, is already seething, and today I 
read a communication which said that Japan is accusing 
Soviet Russia of wanting to set Japan against America. 

We made a correct appraisal of the tension of the impe 
rialist competition and said to ourselves that we must make 
systematic use of the discord between them to hamper 
their struggle against us. Political dissension is already 
apparent in the relations between Britain and France. 
Today we have to speak, not merely of a breathing-space, 
but of there being a serious chance of a new and lengthy 
period of development. Until now we have actually had no 
basis in the international sense. We noiw have this basis, 
the reason being the attitude of the smaller powers that are 
completely dependent on the great powers both in the mil 
itary and in the economic sense. It now happens that 
Poland, despite the pressure brought to bear by France, has 
concluded peace with us. The Polish capitalists show 
unbelievable hatred for Soviet power; they suppress the 
most ordinary strikes with unparalleled ferocity. More than 
anything else they want war with Soviet Russia never 
theless they prefer to make peace with us rather than fulfil 



OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION AND PARTY TASKS 169 

the conditions set by the Entente. We see that the imperi 
alist powers dominate the whole world although they com 
prise an insignificant part of the world s population. And 
the very fact that a country has appeared that has resisted 
world imperialism for three years, has considerably changed 
the international situation; all the minor powers and 
they make up the majority of the world s population are 
therefore inclined to make peace with us. 

The entry of the socialist country into commercial rela 
tions with capitalist countries is a most powerful factor 
ensuring our existence in such an intricate and absolutely 
exceptional situation. 

I chanced to see how one American social-chauvinist, 
close to our Right Socialist-Revolutionaries and Menshe- 
viks, Spargo, a figure in the Second International, a mem 
ber of the American Socialist Party, a sort of American 
Alexinsky, the author of a pile of books against the Bolshe 
viks, blamed us for, and adduced as evidence of the 
complete collapse of communism, the fact that we speak 
of making deals with the capitalist powers. He wrote that 
he could not imagine a better proof of the complete col 
lapse of communism and the break-down of its programme. 
It seems to me that those who think about it will say the 
opposite. No better proof of the material and moral victory 
of the Russian Soviet Republic over the capitalists of the 
whole world could be found than the fact that the powers 
who made war on us because of our terror and our entire 
system, have been compelled, against their own wishes, to 
enter upon the path of commercial relations, knowing that 
by so doing they are strengthening us. This could be put 
forward as proof of the collapse of communism only if we 
had promised, with the forces of Russia alone, to trans 
form the whole world, or had dreamed of doing so. We 
never descended to such madness and have always said 
that our revolution will be victorious when it is supported 
by the workers of all countries. What actually happened 



170 V. I. LENIN 



was that they went half-way in their support, for they 
weakened the hand raised against us, but in this way they 
still helped us. 

I shall not dwell any further on this question but I shall 
only remark that conditions in the Caucasus at the moment 
are becoming most complicated and extremely difficult to 
sort out, with the likelihood that war may be forced on us 
any day. But with the peace with Poland almost assured 
and Wrangel wiped out, this war cannot be so terrify 
ing and, if forced on us, only promises to strengthen and 
fortify our position even further. Newspaper reports of 
events in Armenia and Turkey give us some idea of 
this. An extremely confused situation has arisen, but 
I am absolutely confident that we shall emerge from 
it, preserving peace on the present basis, which in 
some respects is extremely favourable, on a basis satisfac 
tory to us and which gives us the possibility of economic 
existence. We are doing all we can to ensure this. It is, 
however, quite likely that circumstances may arise which 
will directly force war on us or indirectly lead to it. We 
can view this prospect quite calmly this will be a war in 
a distant region, with the balance of forces fully in our 
favour, probably ensuring a greater victory than that in the 
Polish war. The Polish war was a war on two fronts, with 
a threat from Wrangel, a war that could not be called a war 
in an outlying region, because the Pilsudski line ran not 
all that far away from Moscow. With this I conclude my 
review of the international situation. 

I now turn to the state of affairs at home. As a result of 
the failure of a number of attempts at military interven 
tion, our position, economically, has considerably improved. 
The basic reason for our former desperate position 
was that we Central Russia, industrial Russia, proletarian 
Russia, Petrograd, Moscow, Ivanovo-Voznesensk were 
cut off from all the main grain-producing areas Siberia, 
the south, south-east; were cut off from one of the main 



OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION AND PARTY TASKS 171 

sources of fuelthe Donets Basin, cut off from the sources 
of oil, and it seemed absolutely impossible that the repub 
lic could actually hold out. You know what desperate 
misfortunes, what colossal privation, what a need for grain 
and what hunger befell us because we were cut off from 
the most important grain-producing and economic regions. 
The return of these regions is to a considerable extent re 
sponsible for the improvement to be observed. Thanks to 
the possibility of drawing in Siberia and the Caucasus, and 
thanks to the developing social change in our favour in the 
Ukraine, there is promise that with the state food procure 
ments in the forthcoming food campaign we shall not only 
emerge without an actual hole in the sack as we did this 
year, but we shall have sufficient food for all industrial 
workers. This is the first campaign when we can hope that, 
thanks to the indisputable growing improvement in trans 
port, the government s food stocks will be so great -250- 
300 million poods of grain that we shall not merely talk 
about socialist construction and do precious little, as at 
present, but we shall actually operate with real armies of 
labour, we shall be able to transfer hundreds of thousands 
of industrial workers, or workers now engaged in provision 
ing for industry, to really urgent, vital work, and to im 
prove this work just as the improved fuel situation made it 
possible to restore the textile industry. The factories in 
Ivanovo-Voznesensk Gubernia have started to work. At 
first, not more than a quarter of a million spindles were 
operating, now there are already half a million, up to 
600,000 by the end of the year we reckon there will be a 
million working, and think that we shall reach four million 
spindles next year. From a situation where we managed, 
with the greatest difficulty, to make both ends meet by 
using up old stocks, we are only just starting to change to 
a situation where we are rehabilitating Russia s ruined 
industry and are being able, while collecting grain from the 
village, to supply the peasant, in return, with salt and 



172 V. I. LENIN 



paraffin oil, and, although in small quantities, with textiles. 
Until this is done it is useless to talk of socialist construc 
tion. 

While in the international sense we have gained a foot 
ing by putting an end to a whole number of military 
campaigns and wresting peace treaties from several states, 
it has only now become economically possible for us to 
supply grain to the workers engaged in industry, to supply 
food for industry, namely fuel, on a scale large enough to 
commence the building of socialism. This is our main task, 
this is the root of the problem, this is the transition which 
we have tried to make several times. I remember that 
in April 1918, at a meeting of the All-Russian Central 
Executive Committee, I said that our military tasks ap 
peared to be ending and that we had not only convinced 
Russia, we had not only won her from the exploiters for 
the working peo,ple, but that we must proceed to other 
tasks in order to govern Russia in the interests of economic 
construction. Our breathing-space at that time proved to 
be quite insignificant. The war which was forced on us, 
starting with the Czechoslovak revolt in the summer of 
1918, 40 was extremely ferocious. But we made this attempt 
several times, both in the spring of 1918, and, on a broader 
scale, in the spring of this year when we tackled in practice 
the question of labour armies. Now, we must once again 
regard this transition as a question of paramount impor 
tance and exert all efforts to accomplish it. This is the task 
of the entire socialist revolution which is of the utmost 
importance from the international point of view, from the 
point of view of victory over capitalism in general. In order 
to defeat capitalism altogether it is necessary, in the first 
place, to defeat the exploiters and to uphold the power of 
the exploited, namely, to solve the task of overthrowing 
the exploiters by revolutionary forces; in the second place, 
to solve a constructive task of building new economic 
relations, of setting an example of how this should be 



OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION AND PARTY TASKS 173 

done. These two aspects of accomplishing a socialist revo 
lution are indissolubly connected and distinguish our rev 
olution from all previous ones which never went beyond 
destruction. 

If we do not solve this second task then nothing will 
have been achieved by our successes, by our victories in 
overthrowing the exploiters, by the military rebuff to 
international imperialism, and a return to the old state of 
affairs will be inevitable. In the theoretical sense there can 
be no two opinions about this. The transition in this in 
stance is particularly abrupt and difficult, demanding other 
methods, a different distribution and use of forces, a differ 
ent emphasis, psychological approach and so on. In place 
of methods of the revolutionary overthrow of the exploit 
ers, and of repelling the tyrants, we must employ methods 
of organisation and construction; we must prove to the 
whole world that we are a force, not only capable of resist 
ing military suppression, but a force capable of setting an 
example. In all the writings of the greatest socialists there 
could always be found guidance on these two aspects of 
the socialist revolution s task which (as two aspects of this 
task) relate both to the outside world, the states 
remaining in capitalist hands, and to the non-proletarians 
of one s own country. We have convinced the peasants that 
the proletariat provides them with better living conditions 
than the bourgeoisie did; we have convinced them of this 
in practice. When the peasants, although dissatisfied with 
the Bolshevik regime, compared it in practice with the rule 
of the Constituent Assembly, 41 Kolchak and others they, 
nevertheless, drew the conclusion that the Bolsheviks 
guaranteed them a better existence and defended them mil 
itarily from the violence of world imperialism. Yet, under 
conditions of bourgeois rule, half the peasants lived in a 
bourgeois way, and it could not have been otherwise. The 
proletariat must now solve the second problem: it must 
prove to the peasant that the proletariat can provide him 



174 V. I. LENIN 



with the example and practice of economic relations of a 
higher level than those under which every peasant family 
farms on its own. The peasant still believes only in this old 
system, he still considers this to be the normal state of 
affairs. There can be no doubt of this. That the peasant 
should alter his attitude to life s problems, to economics, 
as a result of our propaganda that s absurd. His is an 
attitude of wait and see. From being neutrally hostile, he 
has become neutrally sympathetic. He prefers us to any 
other form of government because he sees that the work 
ers , proletarian state, the proletarian dictatorship, is 
not a crude force or usurpation, as it has been described, 
but is a better protector of the peasants than Kolchak, 
Denikin, etc. 

But this is not enough; we have not accomplished the 
main thing to show that the proletariat will restore large- 
scale industry and social economy so that the peasants 
can be transferred to. a higher economic system. Having 
proved that by revolutionary organisation we can repulse the 
force used against the exploited, we must prove the same 
thing in another field by setting an example which would con 
vince the whole vast mass of peasants and petty-bourgeois 
elements, and other countries, not by words, but in prac 
tice, that a communist system, way of life, can be created 
by a proletariat which has won a war. This is a task of 
world-wide significance. In order to achieve the second 
half of the victory in the international sense, we must 
resolve the second half of the task, that in the sphere of 
economic construction. We spoke about this at the last 
Party conference so that there seems to be no need or 
possibility to go into detail on the various aspects; this task 
covers every aspect of economic construction. I have brief 
ly indicated the conditions guaranteeing grain to the in 
dustrial workers and guaranteeing fuel to industry. These 
conditions are the foundation ensuring the possibility of 
further construction. I should add that, as you have seen 



OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION AND PARTY TASKS 175 

from the agenda published in the newspapers, the central 
question to be discussed at the forthcoming Congress of 
Soviets must be the question of economic construction. The 
whole agenda is designed so that all the attention and con 
cern of the delegates attending and of the whole mass of 
Soviet and Party workers in the entire republic will be con 
centrated on the economic aspect, on the restoration of 
transport and industry, on what is cautiously termed "aid 
to the peasant economy" but which implies far more, 
which implies a whole system of well thought-out measures 
to raise the peasant economy, which will continue to exist 
for some time to come, to the appropriate level. 

The Congress of Soviets, therefore, will discuss a report 
on the electrification of Russia so that a single economic 
plan for the rehabilitation of the national economy, of 
which we have spoken, can be laid down from the techno 
logical side. There can be no question of rehabilitating the 
national economy or of communism unless Russia is put 
on to a different, a higher technical basis than that which 
has existed up to now. Communism is Soviet power plus 
the electrification of the whole country, for it is impossible 
to develop industry without electrification. This is a long- 
term task which will take at least ten years provided that 
very many technical experts are drawn into the work. A 
number of printed documents in which this project has 
been worked out in detail by technical experts will be 
presented to the Congress. We cannot accomplish the fun 
damentals of this plan create 30 large areas of electric 
power stations which would enable our industry to be mod 
ernised in less than ten years. Naturally, without this 
reconstruction of the whole of industry from the standpoint 
of the conditions of large-scale machine industry, socialist 
construction will remain only a set of decrees, will remain 
a political link of the working class with the peasants, will 
remain the means of saving the peasants from Kolchak and 
Denikin rule, will remain an example to all powers of the 



176 V. I. LENIN 



world, but will not have its own basis. Communism implies 
Soviet power as a political organ, enabling the mass of the 
oppressed to run all state affairs without this communism 
is unthinkable. And throughout the world we see proof of 
this because the idea of Soviet power and its programme 
are undoubtedly becoming victorious throughout the 
world. We see this in every phase of the struggle against 
the Second International which survives with the support 
of the police, the church and the old bourgeois officials of 
the labour movement. 

This ensures the political side of the matter, but the 
economic side can be assured only iwhen the Russian prole 
tarian state really holds all the strands of a large industrial 
machine based on modern technique; and this means 
electrification. For this, we must appreciate the basic con 
ditions required for the application of electricity and under 
stand both industry and agriculture accordingly. This is an 
enormous task, and a far greater period of time is required 
for its realisation than was needed to defend our right to 
exist against military invasion. But we do not fear this 
period, and we regard it as a victory that we have been 
able to attract tens and hundreds of engineers and scien 
tists imbued with bourgeois ideas, whom we have given 
the task of reorganising the entire economy, industry and 
agriculture, in whom we have aroused interest and from 
whom we have received a great deal of information sum 
marised in a number of pamphlets. Every area down for 
electrification is dealt with in a separate pamphlet. The 
plan for the electrification of the northern area is ready, 
and those interested may receive it. Pamphlets dealing 
with each area and giving the full plans for reorganisation 
are to be published by the time the Congress of Soviets 
meets. Our task is to carry on systematic work all over 
the country, in all Party cells, in every Soviet institution, 
according to this single plan covering many years, so that 
in the near future we may have a clear picture of how we 



OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION AND PARTY TASKS 



are progressing and how far, neither deceiving ourselves 
nor concealing the difficulties before us. The entire republic 
is confronted by the task of accomplishing this single 
economic plan by all means. All the Communist Party s 
activities, propaganda and agitation must be centred 
around this task. In theory, it has been dealt with on more 
than one occasion; no one argues against it, but scarcely a 
hundredth part of what needs to be done has been accom 
plished. 

It is natural that we have become accustomed to a pe 
riod of political warfare, we have all been steeled in polit 
ico-military struggle and, therefore, what has been accom 
plished by the present Soviet government is only an 
approach to the task demanding that the train be switched 
to other rails now; and this train has to carry tens of mil 
lions of people. The switching of this heavy load onto other 
rails, when in places there are none at all, demands con 
centrated attention, knowledge and very great persistence. 
Because the cultural level of the peasants and the workers 
was not adequate for this task and, at the same time, 
because we are almost 99 per cent accustomed to politico- 
military tasks, there has been a revival of bureaucracy. 
Everyone admits this. The task of the Soviet government 
is to destroy the old apparatus completely, as it was 
destroyed in October, and to transfer power to the Soviets. 
However, we recognise it in our programme that there is 
a revival of bureaucracy and that at present there is not 
yet an economic foundation for a genuine socialist so 
ciety. The mass of workers and peasants have no cultured 
background, literacy and in general a higher cultural level. 
This is because the best proletarians have been occu 
pied with military tasks. The proletariat bore tremendous 
sacrifices for the military tasks, and tens of millions of 
peasants had to be sacrificed to these tasks, and people 
imbued with bourgeois ideas had to be drawn into the 
work, because there were no others available. We had, 



122283 



178 V. I. LENIN 



therefore, to state in the programme, in a document like 
the Party programme, that there has been a revival of 
bureaucracy against which a systematic struggle has to be 
waged. It is natural that the bureaucracy, which has re 
appeared in the Soviet institutions, was bound to have a 
pernicious effect even among the Party organisations, since 
the Party leadership is also the leadership of the Soviet 
apparatus; they are one and the same thing. Therefore, 
since we recognise the evil to be the old bureaucracy which 
has been able to appear in the Party apparatus, it is obvi 
ous and natural that all the signs of this evil have been 
found in the Party organisations. And since this is so, the 
question has been placed on the agenda of the Congress of 
Soviets and has received a great deal of the attention of 
this Conference, and justly so, because a Party disease, 
which has been admitted in the resolutions of the general 
Party Conference, 42 exists not only in Moscow, but also 
throughout the whole republic. It is connected with the 
meed to carry out politico-military work, when we had to 
draw in the mass of peasants and when we were unable to 
strengthen our demands for a broader plan connected with 
the development of the level of the peasant economy, the 
level of development of the mass of peasants. 

Allow me in conclusion to say a few words about the 
situation within the Party, about the struggle and the ap 
pearance of an opposition, of which all those present are 
fully aware and which took up a great deal of energy and 
attention at the Moscow City and Gubernia Conference, 
perhaps considerably more than we all would have liked. 
It is quite natural that the great transition being made 
now, at a time when all the forces taken by the republic 
from the proletariat and the Party during three years of 
struggle have been exhausted, has placed us in a difficult 
position when confronted with a task which it was beyond 
our powers to assess accurately. We have to acknowledge 
that we do not know the exact dimensions of the evil, that 



OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION AND PARTY TASKS \J 

we are unable to determine the relationships and the exact 
groupings. The main task of the Party conference is to raise 
the question, not to hide the existing evil, but to draw the 
Party s attention to it, and to call on all Party members to 
consider how to rid ourselves of this evil. It is quite 
natural, and there can be no doubt, both from the point 
of view of the Central Committee and, I think, from that 
of the great majority of Party comrades (as far as I am 
aware of the views, which nobody has repudiated), that in 
connection with the inner-Party crisis there is very much 
in the opposition, which is to be found not only in Moscow 
but throughout Russia, that is completely healthy, essential 
and inevitable at a time of the Party s natural growth and 
the transition from a situation where all attention was con 
centrated on political and military tasks to one of construc 
tion and organisation, when we have to cover many bu 
reaucratic institutions and when the cultural level of the 
majority of the proletariat and peasants is unequal to the 
task. After all, the Workers and Peasants Inspection exists 
more as a pious wish; it was impossible to set it in motion 
because the best workers were sent to the front, and be 
cause the cultural level of the peasants was such that it 
was unable to bring forward a sufficient number of officials. 
It is natural that the opposition, whose slogan urges a 
more speedy transition, the drawing in of the greatest 
number of fresh and young forces and placing local work 
ers in more responsible positions, has an extremely sound 
aim, tendency and programme. As far as can be judged by 
their statements, neither in the Central Committee, nor in 
circles of comrades who are in any degree responsible, are 
there two ideas about this. There is also no doubt, how 
ever, that there are other elements alongside these sound 
elements united around the platform of fulfilment of the 
Conference decisions. At all meetings, including also the 
preliminary meetings which were attended by more than the 
usual numbers at this Conference, you could not hear two 

12* 



180 V. I. LENIN 



ideas about this. Our general programme must be realised 
this is indisputable, and difficult work now faces us. Of 
course, here the essence of the matter is not to limit one- 
selif to overthrowing the opponent and repulsing the oppo 
nent. For here we -are faced by the petty-bourgeois 
elements surrounding us in tens oif millions; we are fewer, 
there are very few of us compared with this petty-bour 
geois mass. We must educate this mass and prepare it, but 
it so happened that all those organised forces doing the 
preparation had to be thrown into another affair, a very 
interesting, difficult and very risky, into another affair, 
connected with great sacrifices, into the affair of war. The 
affair of war is like that, and you cannot get away from it. 
In this connection, therefore, we must ask ourselves 
has the Party completely recovered, have we a complete 
victory over bureaucracy, for putting the economic con 
struction on more correct lines, for setting in motion the 
Workers and Peasants Inspection, not only in the sense 
of issuing decrees, but by actually attracting working 
people? This is a difficult matter, and our main task, if we 
are speaking of Party tasks, must be to accomplish the 
speediest possible elimination of the so-called line of oppo 
sition. When we speak of differing views, different inter 
pretations of events, different programmes, even for future 
activities, the Central Committee must pay the utmost 
attention to this question at all meetings of the Political 
Bureau and at plenary meetings where different shades 
of opinion are expressed. Harmonious work by the entire 
Party will guarantee the accomplishment of this task. We 
regard this as extremely important. We mow face economic 
work that is more difficult than the military work which we 
accomplished thanks to the enthusiasm of the peasants, for 
undoubtedly the peasants preferred the workers state to 
that of Kolchak. It is quite another thing now, when it is 
necessary to transfer the peasants to construction quite 
foreign to them, which they do not understand aind in 



OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION AND PARTY TASKS 181 

which they cannot have any faith. This task demands much 
systematic work, great perseverance, great organisational 
abilities, and so far as organising ability is concerned, the 
Russian is possibly one of the worst. This is our weakest 
side, and so we must endeavour to remove quickly any 
thing interfering with the work. The opposition, which in 
itself represents the transition, indubitably contains sound 
elements, but when it becomes an opposition for the sake 
of opposition, we should certainly put an end to it. We have 
wasted a great deal of time on skirmishes, wrangles and 
squabbles and we must say to ourselves "enough", and try 
to come to some agreement to work more effectively. Make 
some sort of concessions, better more than less, to those 
who are dissatisfied, who call themselves the opposition, 
but succeed in making our work harmonious, for without 
this it is impossible to exist in conditions when we are 
surrounded by enemies at home and abroad. 

There can be no doubt that old petty-bourgeois elements, 
small property owners, are to be found in far greater num 
bers than we are. They are stronger than the socialist sec 
tor of the economy geared to meet the demands of the 
workers. Everyone who has had anything to do with the 
countryside and has seen the speculation that goes on in 
the towns, understands perfectly well that this social 
sector based on small economic units is far larger than we 
are; that is why absolutely harmonious work is needed. 
We must develop it at all costs. When I had occasion to 
note the controversies and the struggle in the Moscow or 
ganisations, when I had occasion to note what a great deal 
of debate took place at the meetings, how many skirmishes 
and wrangles there were, I came to the conclusion that 
it was high time to finish with all this and that everyone 
should unite around the Conference platform. It is neces 
sary to say that we have paid a heavy price for this. It 
was sad to watch, for example, how hours were wasted at 
Party meetings on squabbles as to whether someone had 



jg2 V. I. LENIN 



arrived at the meeting punctually, whether a particular 
individual had made his position clear in one way or 
another. Is it really for this sort of thing that people attend 
meetings? There is a special commission which discusses 
whether or not an individual on the list of delegates has 
made his position clear either in one way or another. Here, 
however, it is a question of the content of the meeting. For 
instance, take an experienced Party comrade like Bubnov. 
I heard his speech on the platform put forward by the 
Conference. This platform amounts to greater freedom of 
criticism. But the Conference was held in September and 
it is now November. Freedom of criticism is a splendid 
thing but after we have all put our names to it, it would 
be no sin to concern ourselves with the content of the 
criticism. For a long time the Mensheviks, Socialist-Revo 
lutionaries and others tried to scare us with freedom of 
criticism, but we were not afraid of it. If freedom of 
criticism means freedom to defend capitalism then we 
shall suppress it. We have moved on. Freedom of criticism 
has been proclaimed, but it is necessary to think about the 
content of the criticism. 

And here you have to admit something extremely sad 
the criticism is devoid of content. You visit a district and 
ask yourself what is the content of the criticism. The Party 
organisations cannot overcome ignorance by using old 
bureaucratic methods. What methods of defeating bureauc 
racy are there other than drawing in the workers and 
peasants? And at district meetings criticism is concerned 
with trifles, and not a word or a sound did I hear about 
the Workers and Peasants Inspection. I did not hear that 
a single district had encouraged workers and peasants to 
take part in this work. Genuine construction means apply 
ing criticism which must be constructive. And in Moscow 
the management of every small block of flats, every large 
plant, every factory must have its own experience. If we 
wish to combat bureaucracy we must draw the people 



OUR FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC POSITION AND PARTY TASKS 183 

from below into this work. We must acquaint ourselves 
with the experience of certain factories, learn what steps 
they took to chase out their bureaucrats, learn the experi 
ence of a house management or of a consumers society. 
A most rapid handling of the whole economic mechanism 
is needed, but in the meantime you do not hear a sound 
about this, although you can hear plenty of squabbling tak 
ing place. Of course, such a gigantic upheaval could not 
take place without some dirt and some, far from clean, 
scum coming to the surface. It is high time that we dis 
cussed, not only freedom of criticism, but also the content 
of it. It is high time we said that in view of our experience, 
a number of concessions are necessary, but that in future 
we shall not permit the slightest tendency to squabble. 
We must make a break with the past, undertake genuine 
economic construction and make a complete overhaul of 
all Party work to enable it to guide Soviet economic con 
struction and ensure practical successes to do more by ex 
ample than by precept. Nowadays, neither the worker nor 
the peasant can be convinced by words, but only by ex 
ample. They must be convinced that they can improve their 
economy without capitalists, that conflicts can be abol 
ished without the policeman s truncheon, or capitalist star 
vation, but that they need Party leadership to achieve that. 
This is the attitude we must adopt, and then we shall 
achieve successes in future economic construction which 
will lead to our complete victory in the international field. 

Published in 1920 in the Vol. 31, pp. 380-99 

pamphlet Current Questions of 

the Party s Present Work. 

Publishers: Moscow Committee, 

R.C.P.(B.) 



SPEECH AT A PLENARY MEETING 

OF THE MOSCOW SOVIET OF WORKERS 

AND PEASANTS DEPUTIES 

FEBRUARY 28, 1921 

(Prolonged applause.) Before passing to the domestic 
situation a subject which, quite naturally, arouses great 
interest and much concern I should like to discuss briefly 
the chief new developments in the international situa 
tion. To be brief I shall deal with only three. The first is 
the conference we have begun with Turkish delegates here 
in Moscow. This is an especially welcome fact, because 
there were many obstacles to direct negotiations with a 
delegation of the Turkish Government, and we feel sure that 
now, when there is an opportunity to reach understanding 
here in Moscow, the firm foundation will be laid for closer 
relations and for friendship. Of course, this will be 
achieved not through diplomatic subterfuge (in which, we 
do not fear to admit, our enemies are much stronger), but 
owing to the fact that both nations suffered incredibly at 
the hands of the imperialist powers in these past few 
years. A previous speaker referred here to the harm of 
isolation from the imperialist countries. But when a wolf 
attacks a sheep, there is hardly any point in advising the 
sheep to avoid isolation from the wolf. (Laughter, ap 
plause). And if the Eastern nations have up to now been 
only sheep confronted by the imperialist wolf, Soviet Rus 
sia was the first to demonstrate that, despite her unparal 
leled weakness militarily, it is not so easy for the wolf to 



SPEECH AT A PLENARY MEETING OF MOSCOW SOVIET 185 

get his claws and teeth into her. And this example of So 
viet Russia has proved a contagious one for many nations, 
regardless of whether or not they sympathise with the 
"Bolshevik rumour-mongers". A great deal is being said 
in the world about these "rumour-mongers". We are even 
being described as malicious rumour-mongers in relation 
to Turkey. And though, of course, we have so far done 
nothing in this respect, all the same, it has been demon 
strated to the Turkish workers and peasants that the re 
sistance of modern nations to robbery is a thing that has to 
be reckoned with. The robbery to which the imperialist 
governments subjected Turkey met with such resistance 
that even the strongest of these imperialist powers had to 
keep their hands off. It is this that makes one regard the 
present negotiations with the Turkish Government as a 
very big achievement. We pursue no underhand objects. 
We know that these negotiations will proceed within a 
very modest framework, but they are important because of 
the fact that the workers and peasants of all nations are 
steadily coming closer together, despite all the formidable 
obstacles. And this should not be overlooked in gauging 
our present difficulties. 

The second thing worth recalling when talking of the 
international situation is the state of the peace talks in 
Riga. You know that in order to conclude a peace which 
is in any degree stable we are making the greatest possible 
concessions to all states formerly belonging to the Russian 
Empire. This is only natural because one of the main fac 
tors which arouses hatred for the imperialists and unites 
the peoples against them is the oppression of a nationality, 
and there are few states in the world which have sinned 
so much in this respect as the old Russian Empire and the 
bourgeois republic of Kerensky, the Mensheviks and So 
cialist-Revolutionaries in alliance with the bourgeoisie. 
That is why precisely in relation to these states we show 
the greatest willingness to make concessions and readiness 



186 V. I. LENIN 



to accept such peace terms for which some Socialist-Rev 
olutionaries have called us Tolstoyans. We are indifferent 
to these reproaches because, in relation to these states, 
we need to display the greatest willingness to compromise, 
so as to dispel the age-old suspicion gene-rated by the op 
pression of former days, and lay the foundation for a union 
between the workers and peasants of various nations who 
at one time suffered together at the hands of tsarism and 
the Russian landlords, and who now suffer at the hands 
of imperialism. This policy has been most of all frustrated 
in relation to Poland by the Russian whiteguards, Socialist- 
Revolutionaries and Mensheviks who enjoy "freedom of 
the press", "freedom of speech" and other wonderful 
"freedoms", alongside the extraordinary freedom of the 
French and other capitalists who freely bought themselves 
a larger part of Poland and developed their propaganda 
there with the utmost freedom striving to drag Poland into 
a war against us. Now the capitalists are doing their ut 
most to frustrate the peace that has been concluded. One 
of the reasons why we cannot demobilise our army, as we 
should like to do, is that we must reckon with war on a 
much larger scale than some people think. Those who say 
that we could allocate fewer forces to the war are wrong. 
They are mistaken because our enemies are resorting to 
all sorts of machinations and intrigues to break the final 
peace with Poland, the provisional terms of which have 
already been concluded. These negotiations have latterly 
been dragging on, and although a few weeks ( ago a stage 
was reached when a serious crisis was to be feared, we re 
cently decided to make further concessions, not because 
we considered them to be just, but because we regarded 
it as important to thwart the intrigues of the Russian 
whiteguards, Socialist-Revolutionaries and Mensheviks in 
Warsaw, and of the Entente imperialists who above all are 
striving to prevent peace. Peace has not yet been signed, 
but I can state that we have grounds to be very optimistic 



SPEECH AT A PLENARY MEETING OF MOSCOW SOVIET 187 

that in the near future peace will be signed, and we 
shall succeed in thwarting the intrigues against its con 
clusion. I think we shall all be glad of this, although this 
is only guess-work. But we must not count our chickens 
before they are hatched. And that is why we shall not 
slacken or weaken our military efforts for a minute or even 
slightly, while not fearing to make some more concessions 
to bourgeois Poland so as to wrest the workers and peas 
ants of Poland from the Entente and prove to them that 
the workers and peasants government does not engage in 
national strife. We shall defend this peace even at the 
price of considerable sacrifice. 

The third international question concerns the events in 
the Caucasus. There have been large-scale developments 
there recently, and though we do not yet know the details 
their implication is that we are on the brink of a major 
war. We are, of course, disturbed at the clash between 
Armenia and Georgia, and the events transformed the 
Armenian-Georgian war into an insurrection in which a 
section of the Russian troops have taken part. The result 
has been that the designs of the Armenian bourgeoisie 
against us have turned against them so far at least and 
in such a way that, according to the latest but still uncon 
firmed reports, Soviet power has been established in Tiflis. 
(Applause.) We know that the insurrection began in the 
neutral zone, the area between Georgia and Armenia, which 
Georgia occupied with the consent of the imperialist En 
tente. The Mensheviks, and particularly the Georgian Men- 
sheviks, when they speak of the harm of isolation from 
the Western Powers, usually understand this to mean the 
trust in the Entente imperialists since they are stronger 
than anyone else. But that the advanced capitalists are 
more given to deceit than anyone else is often forgotten by 
some whiteguards who say to themselves: can Armenia, 
the Armenian peasants, etc., can the ravaged Soviet Re 
public be compared to the united imperialist powers of the 



188 V. I. LENIN 



world? The advanced capitalists represent the cultural 
forces of the whole world, so let us turn to them. That 
is how the Georgian Mensheviks seek to justify their un 
seemly defence of the capitalists. The Georgian Menshe 
viks had control of the only railway line, the key to the 
food supply of the Armenian peasants. 

No one will have the patience to read all the telegrams, 
statements and protests we exchanged with Georgia on 
this question. If there had been a peace treaty with Geor 
gia, our policy would have been to procrastinate as long 
as possible. You must understand, however, that the Arme 
nian peasants did not regard the question of a treaty in 
that light, and things culminated in the terrible insurrec 
tion which broke out early in February and has spread with 
astonishing rapidity, involving not only the Armenian, but 
also the Georgian population. It has been difficult to ob 
tain information on the situation, but the latest available 
reports bear out our assumptions. We know perfectly well 
that the Georgian bourgeoisie and the Georgian Menshe 
viks do not rely for support on the working people, but 
on the capitalists of their country who are only looking 
for a pretext to start hostilities. We, on the other hand, 
have for three years placed our stake on the working peo 
ple, even in a backward and oppressed country, and we 
shall continue to do this to the last. In the final analysis, 
no matter how circumspect we are, no matter what efforts 
we exert to strengthen the Red Army, we shall do every 
thing possible to extinguish the conflagration that has 
flared up in the Caucasus. We shall demonstrate also in 
the East what we have been able to demonstrate in the 
West that where there is Soviet power there is no place 
for national oppression. On this, in the final analysis, de 
pends the outcome of our struggle, and the might of the 
workers and peasants will ultimately prove stronger and 
superior to capitalist might, because there are far more 
workers and peasants than capitalists, 



SPEECH AT A PLENARY MEETING OF MOSCOW SOVIET IgQ 

After these remarks on foreign policy I now turn to 
home affairs. I was, unfortunately, unable to listen to the 
entire report made here by Comrade Bryukhanov. He has 
given you all the details and exact information, and there 
is, therefore, no need for me to repeat them. I want to 
deal with the main thing which may possibly show us the 
reasons for our terrible crisis. We shall have to set our 
selves a task and find a way to solve it. There is a path, 
we have found it, but we are not yet strong enough to fol 
low it with the persistence and the regularity made imper 
ative by the difficult circumstances of the war s aftermath. 
We are in every respect poverty-stricken, and yet we are 
no more destitute than the workers of Vienna. The Vien 
nese workers are dying and starving, their children are 
also dying and starving; but they have not the main thing 
that we have: they have no hope. They are dying, crushed 
by capitalism; they are in such a position that they endure 
sacrifices, but not as we do. We endure sacrifices for the 
war which we have declared on the whole capitalist world. 
This is the difference in the position of the workers of 
Petrograd and Moscow as compared with that of the work 
ers of Vienna. Now, in the spring, our sufferings due to 
the dearth of food supplies have intensified, although a 
little earlier on we saw an improvement in the food situa 
tion. What happened was that we miscalculated. When the 
plan for surplus food requisitioning was drawn up, we 
thought we could improve on our success. The people had 
starved so much that their condition had to be improved at 
all costs. It was essential not only to help, but to improve 
things. We had not taken into account that if we did im 
prove things now it would be difficult later on, and it is 
due to this mistake that we now face a food crisis. We 
made the same mistake in another sphere too. We made 
the same mistake in the Polish war and the same mistake 
in regard to fuel. The procurement of food, fuel, coal, oil, 
firewood are all different, but in all three spheres we 



190 V. I. LENIN 



made the same mistakes. At the time of the severest hard 
ships, we overestimated our resources and did not take 
them into account properly. We did not take into account 
that our resources had been instantly spent, we failed to 
estimate the resources held in reserve and we put nothing 
by for a rainy day. This is, generally speaking, a simple 
rule that any peasant understands in his simple, everyday 
economy. All the time, on a state scale, we were in a situa 
tion when we did not care about the reserves so long as 
we had enough for today, and then the first time that we 
were faced with the question of reserves from the prac 
tical point of view, we were unable to arrange matters so 
that we could put this reserve by for a rainy day. 

During the Polish war we had a vigorous, daring Red 
Army, but we advanced farther than was necessary to 
the gates of Warsaw, and then rolled back, almost to 
Minsk. The same thing happened with the food supplies. 
True, we emerged from the war as victors. In 1920, we of 
fered the Polish landlords and bourgeoisie peace on terms 
more advantageous to them than the present terms. They 
were taught a lesson, and the whole world was taught a 
lesson, which nobody had previously bargained for. When 
we speak about our position we tell the truth; to a cer 
tain extent we exaggerate the worst feature. In April 1921, 
we said: transport is falling to pieces, there is no food. We 
said this frankly in our newspapers, spoke about it openly 
at meetings in the best halls of Moscow and Petrograd at 
tended by thousands. The European spies hurried to tele 
graph this news, and over there some rubbed their hands 
with glee and said: "Get on with the job, Poles, you see 
how badly things are going with them, we shall soon crush 
them." But we told the truth, sometimes exaggerating the 
worst features. Let the workers and peasants know that 
our difficulties are not over. And when the Polish army, 
under the direction of French, British and other military 
instructors and supplied with Entente money and arms, 



SPEECH AT A PLENARY MEETING OF MOSCOW SOVIET 191 

went into battle, it was defeated. And now, when we say 
that our affairs are in poor shape, when our ambassadors 
report that the whole of the bourgeois press says: "The End 
of Soviet Power", when even Chernov said that it will un 
doubtedly fall, we say: You can shout your heads off, 
that s what freedom of the press on capitalist money is 
for, you have as much of this freedom as you want, but 
we are still not in the least afraid to tell the sad truth." 
Yes, the situation this spring has again worsened, and our 
papers are full of admissions about this bad situation. But 
just try, you capitalists over there, you Mensheviks, S.R.s, 
Semyonovites, or whatever they are called over there, try 
to gain anything by this and you will find yourselves in a 
far deeper hole. (Applause.) Obviously it is a difficult tran 
sition from our state of utter destitution in 1918-19 when 
it was very hard to think about reserves or a year s 
allocation, and we could only think ahead for two or 
three weeks and say "we ll see" about the third week. 
Obviously it is difficult to change from this situation to 
that of 1920 when we saw that our army was bigger than 
that of the Poles, when we had twice as much grain as 
during the previous year, when we had fuel, and when 
there was one and a half times more Donets and Siberian 
coal. We were unable to distribute this on a country-wide 
scale. You must remember that calculations on a yearly 
basis require a special approach, special conditions. We 
knew that the spring would be worse than the autumn, 
but we could not know how much worse it would turn out 
to be. It is not a matter of figures or distribution but a mat 
ter of the degree to which the workers and peasants have 
starved, and the extent of the sacrifice they are now able 
to make for the common cause of all workers and peas 
ants. Who can calculate this? Let whoever blames us, and 
justly so for this is our mistake, and no one wishes to 
hide this, just as no one did in the case oif the Polish war 
let whoever points to this error submit to us an estimate on 



192 V. I. LENIN 



the basis of which it is possible to determine in advance on 
a national scale what amount needs to be set aside from 
the first six months grain reserves so that something 
should be left for a rainy day during the second six months. 
No such estimates were made. We made them first in 1920 
and miscalculated. In certain respect a revolution is a 
miracle. Had we been told in 1917 that we would hold out 
in three years of war against the whole world and that, as 
a result of the war, two million Russian landlords, capital 
ists and their children would find themselves abroad, and 
that we would turn out to be the victors, not one of us 
would have believed it. A miracle took place because the 
workers and peasants rose against the attack of the land 
lords and capitalists with such force that danger threatened 
even powerful capitalism. And it is exactly because the 
miracle did occur that we lost the habit of calculating 
well in advance. That is why all of us are very much 
limping along. The forthcoming Party Congress is to be 
called earlier, because we need to sum up this new ex 
perience in earnest. The defence of the workers and peas 
ants power was achieved by a miracle, not a heavenly 
miracle, not something that fell from the skies, but a mir 
acle in the sense that, no matter how oppressed, humiliat 
ed, ruined and exhausted the workers and peasants were, 
precisely because the revolution went along with the work 
ers, it found a hundred times more forces than any rich, en 
lightened and advanced state could have mustered. Such 
a habit, however, cannot be applied to economic activities. 
What is needed for economic activities perhaps the word 
is not altogether appropriate is a certain "miserliness". 
We have not yet learned how to be "miserly". We have to 
remember that we have defeated the bourgeoisie, but that 
they are still with us and so the struggle remains. And 
one of their methods of struggle against us is to sow panic. 
We must not forget that they are past masters at this. 
They have newspapers, although not printed ones, but 



SPEECH AT A PLENARY MEETING OF MOSCOW SOVIET 



splendidly distributed, and they are doing much more 

than making mountains out of molehills But under no 

circumstances must we succumb to panic. The situation 
has become aggravated because we made a mistake in 
all fields of work. We shall not be afraid of these mistakes, 
we shall not be afraid to admit them, we shall not 
indulge in mutual recrimination; but, in order to be able 
to make use of all our forces, and that there be the 
greatest intensification of effort in all fields of work, we 
must know how to calculate. We must calculate, so as to 
become the master of our whole republic, for we can only 
assess the large amount of available grain and fuel by such 
calculations. For a healthy individual there will not be 
enough bread, but the -amount cannot be increased imme 
diately. There will be insufficient bread only if we do not 
lay in stocks, but we shall have enough if we calculate 
correctly and give to the most needy, and take from those 
who have big surpluses rather than from those who, dur 
ing the past three years, perhaps gave their last crust. 
Have the peasants of the Ukraine and Siberia understood 
this calculation? Not yet. Their present and past grain sur 
pluses have never been known in Central Russia, nor have 
they ever experienced such a plight. The peasants of the 
Ukraine, Siberia and Northern Caucasus have never known 
such destitution and hunger as the peasants of Moscow 
and Petrograd gubernias have endured for three years (and 
they received far less than the Ukrainian peasant). Their 
surpluses usually ran into hundreds of poods, and they 
were accustomed to reckon on receiving goods at once for 
this surplus. There is nowhere to get them when factories 
are at a standstill. To set them going it takes time, prepara 
tion, it takes workers. We do not bear tremendous sacri 
fices in desperation, but in the fight which wins victory 
after victory. This distinction determines everything. 

This is the main thing that I wished to emphasise here, 
not from the point of view of the exact figures presented 

132283 



194 V. I. LENIN 



to you by the comrade responsible for food supplies and by 
the comrade responsible for fuel, but from the economic 
cam political point of view, in order to help understand how 
the mistakes of recent years differ from those of previous 
years, and although they are of a different kind, they still 
have this in common, that having the possibility of climb 
ing one rung, we tried to jump up two. Nevertheless, we 
are now at a higher stage. This is good. This year we shall 
have a much better fuel balance than last year. And in re 
gard to food supplies I shall cite one final thing a tele 
gram received from the Deputy Chief Commander of all 
the Republican forces in Siberia. He telegraphs that com 
munications have been restored and that seven train-loads 
of grain are on their way to Moscow. At one time there 
were disturbances and kulak revolts. Of course, it is pos 
sible to joke about rumour-mongers, but it is necessary to 
appreciate that after all we have learned a thing or two 
in the course of the class struggle. We know that the tsar 
ist government called us rumour-mongers, but when we 
speak of the Socialist-Revolutionary and Menshevik ru 
mour-mongers, we are speaking of another class, of peo 
ple who support the bourgeoisie, of people who take ad 
vantage of every difficult situation, issue leaflets and say: 
"Look, 300 poods of grain surpluses are confiscated from 
you; you give everything, but receive in return nothing 
but coloured bits of paper." Don t we know these rumour- 
mongers? The class they come from? No matter what they 
call themselves, Socialist-Revolutionaries, supporters of 
freedom, people s power, constituent assemblies, and so 
on, they are those selfsame landlords. We have listened 
to all their words and learned to understand their true 
meaning. These revolts indicate that there are people 
among the peasants who do not wish to reconcile them 
selves either to surplus food requisitioning or to the tax. 
Someone here mentioned the tax. Much of what he said 
was common sense, but he should not have forgotten to add 



SPEECH AT A PLENARY MEETING OF MOSCOW SOVIET 195 



that before we said anything about it from this platform, 
the newspaper Pravda, which is the Central Organ of the 
Russian Communist Party, carried proposals about the 
tax signed not only by temporary staff members, but 
by responsible editors. When the non-Party peasant, says 
to us: "Make your calculations conform to the needs of 
the small peasant; he needs confidence: I shall give so much 
and then I shall look after my own affairs," we say: "Yes, 
that is businesslike, that is common sense and in keeping 
with local conditions." So long as we have no machines, so 
long as the peasant himself has no wish to change from 
small-scale to large-scale farming, we are inclined to take 
this idea into account and we shall place this question be 
fore the Party Congress due to be held in a week s time, 
sort it out and take a decision satisfactory to the non-Party 
peasant and to the mass of the people. In our apparatus 
there is, of course, much that is imperfect and inexcusable, 
because a great deal, a very, very great deal of bureauc 
racy has seeped in. But weren t there the same kind of 
mistakes and imperfections in our Red Army? We could 
not rid ourselves of them right away, but thanks to the 
help of the workers and peasants, the Army was, never 
theless, victorious. What took place in the Red Army is 
happening in another form in all spheres, and we shall be 
cured of these bureaucratic distortions which everybody 
shouts about on all sides and condemns because they are 
evidence of our mistakes and misfortunes by persistent 
work, not succumbing to panic and not turning a blind 
eye to those who, taking advantage of these mistakes, are 
trying to repeat the Kolchak and Denikin events. Any 
amount of scandalous practices in the way of the pilfer 
ing of coal is taking place in the Ukraine, while here we 
are suffering from a great shortage. There they have had 
120 governments, and the rich peasants have been cor 
rupted. They cannot understand that there is a workers 
and peasants government and that, if it confiscates grain, 

13* 



196 V. I. LENIN 



it does so in order to ease the position of the workers and 
peasants. Until we are able to achieve full clarity on all 
these questions in that area, we shall continue to receive 
news of disturbances, gangs, revolts. This is inevitable be 
cause the ignorance and isolation of the peasants, and 
the resentment of individual peasants, our legacy from 
capitalism, are inevitable, and it will take us years to re 
educate them. We see this every spring, and we shall con 
tinue to see it every spring for some time yet. 

The south-eastern railways are quite another matter. 
This year, in the main, we existed on the resources sup 
plied us by Siberia and the Northern Caucasus. Here is a 
five-day report. From February 1st, eight cars a day. The 
second five-day report gives 32 a day, the third 60 a day, 
the fourth 109; but we should receive 200 cars a day, 
and only for the last five days, from February 20 to 24, we 
have received 120 cars a day. This is three train-loads. 
Today Comrade Fomin reports that during the past two 
days we have already received four train-loads. As one 
comrade has indicated, the position in the Donets Basin 
is that there is no grain because there is no coal, and there 
is no coal because there is no grain. We must break this 
vicious circle at some point by the energy, pressure and 
heroism of the working people, so that all the wheels start 
turning. We are beginning to emerge from the enormous 
difficulties that we have experienced in this respect. A 
ray of light has appeared. I do not at all wish, comrades, 
to soothe you with promises and I have no intention of an 
nouncing that this difficult period has ended. Nothing of 
the sort! There are signs of improvement, but the period 
has remained incredibly difficult, and, in comparison with 
last autumn, it need not have been as difficult as it is now 
despi-te the fact that we are cut off from Western Europe. 
In order not to be cut off we have had to grant conces 
sions: you get 500 per cent profit, and we get an increase 
in grain, paraffin oil, etc. We grant and shall grant these 



SPEECH AT A PLENARY MEETING OF MOSCOW SOVIET JQ7 

concessions. This will mean a new struggle because we 
shall not .give them 500 per cent, or perhaps even more, 
without bargaining, and to switch to this struggle is equiv 
alent to switching the train onto new rails. 

For this it is essential to convince the capitalists that 
they cannot butt in on us with a war. We have decisively 
accepted the policy of granting concessions. You know that 
we have had many arguments with the peasants and work 
ers about this, you know that the workers have said: 
"We ve got rid of our own bourgeoisie and now we are 
going to let in others." And we have explained to them 
that we cannot immediately change from a position where 
we had nothing to one where there will be everything, and 
in order to ease this transition, in order to obtain the ne 
cessary amount of grain and textiles, we must be able to 
make every necessary sacrifice. Let the capitalists benefit 
from their own avarice, so long as we are able to improve 
the position of the workers and peasants. It is a difficult 
thing, however, to make this concession business work. We 
published a decree about this in November, but so far 
not a single concession has been made. Of course, this is 
due to the influence of the whiteguard and Menshevik 
press. There are now Russian newspapers in every coun 
try in the world, and in all of them the Mensheviks are cry 
ing out against concessions, pointing out that things are 
not going well in Moscow, and that therefore Soviet power 
will soon fall, and that you, gentlemen capitalists, should 
not believe them or come to terms with them. But we do 
not ispurn this battle; we have defeated the capitalists, but 
we have not destroyed them, they have now changed 
chairs and are sitting in Warsaw, which at one time was 
the centre of the struggle against Russian autocracy, and 
which now unites the whiteguards against Soviet Russia; 
and we shall fight them everywhere, both on the foreign 
and on the home front. 

I have here a telegram from Comrade Zinoviev in Petro- 



198 v - I- LENIN 



grad which says that, in connection with the arrests there, 
a leaflet was found in the possession of one of those ar 
rested from which it is clear that he is a spy of foreign 
capitalists. There is another leaflet with the heading "To 
the Faithful", which is counter-revolutionary in content. 
Further, Comrade Zinoviev informs us that Menshevik 
leaflets have been posted up in Petrograd calling for 
strikes, and here in Moscow they have exaggerated it into a 
rumour about some demonstration or other. In actual fact 
one Communist was killed by a provocative shot. That is 
the only victim of these unhappy days. When Denikin was 
at Orel the whiteguard papers wrote that he leaped for 
ward nearly 100 versts an hour. These papers do not sur 
prise us. We look at things soberly; we must rally closer, 
comrades. Otherwise, what are we to do? Once again try 
a "coalition" government of Kerensky and Kolchak? There 
is no longer any Kolchak, but if there is no Kolchak, an 
other will take hiis place. There are any number of Rus 
sian generals, enough for a large army. We must speak 
frankly and not be afraid of the newspapers which are 
being published in all the cities of the world. These are 
all trifles, and we shall not keep silent about our difficult 
position because of them. But we shall say this: we, 
comrades, are conducting this entire difficult and bloody 
struggle, and if at the moment they cannot attack us with 
a gun in their hands, they attack us with the weapon 
of lies and slander, taking advantage of all instances of 
need and poverty in order to help our enemies. I repeat, 
we have experienced and survived all this. We have lived 
through far greater difficulties; we know this enemy ex 
tremely well, and we shall defeat this enemy this spring, 
we shall defeat him by working more successfully, and 
by calculating more carefully. (AppZause.) 

Pravda No. 46, March 2, 1921 Vol. 32, pp. 124-36 



REPORT ON THE POLITICAL WORK OF THE 

CENTRAL COMMITTEE TO THE 

TENTH CONGRESS OF THE R.C.P.(B.) 

MARCH 8, 1921 

Comrades, the question of the political work of the Cen 
tral Committee, as you are, of course, aware, is so close 
ly bound up with the whole of Party work, with the entire 
work of Soviet institutions, and with the whole course of 
the revolution, that in my view at any rate there can be 
no talk of a report in the exact, literal, meaning of the 
word. And I understand my task to be to try to single out 
some of the more important events which I think rep 
resent the cardinal points of our work and of Soviet pol 
icy for this year, which are most typical of what we have 
gone through and which provide most food for thought 
on the reasons for the course of the revolution, on the sig 
nificance of the mistakes made and there have been 
many mistakes and on the lessons for the future. For no 
matter how natural it is for a report to be given on events 
of the past year, no matter how essential this is for the 
Central Committee, and no matter how interesting such 
a report is, in itself, for the Party the tasks of the strug 
gle, both in the future and unfolding before us now, are 
so urgent, grave and difficult, and press so hard upon us 
that unwittingly all our attention is concentrated on how 
to draw the appropriate conclusions from past experience 



200 V. I. LENIN 



and how best to solve present and future problems on 
which all our attention is focused. 

Of all the key problems of our work for the past year, 
which chiefly hold our attention and with which, in my 
opinion, our mistakes are mainly connected, the most im 
portant is the transition from war to peace. Probably all 
of you or, at any rate, the majority of you, remember that 
we have attempted this transition several times during 
the past three and a half years without once having com 
pleted it; and apparently we shall not accomplish it this 
time because international capitalism is too vitally inter 
ested in preventing this transition. I recall that even in 
April 1918, i.e., three years ago, I had occasion to speak to 
the Ail-Russian Central Executive Committee about our 
tasks, 43 which were formulated at that time as if the main 
stage of the Civil War had ended, when in actual fact the 
war had only just begun. You all remember that at the 
previous Party Congress we based all our calculations 
on the transition to peaceful construction, on the assump 
tion that the enormous concessions then made to Poland 
would ensure peace for us. As early as April, however, 
the Polish bourgeoisie, which, with the imperialists of the 
capitalist countries, interpreted our peaceful stand as our 
weakness, started an offensive for which they paid dearly 
by having to conclude a far more unfavourable peace. But 
we were unable to make a transition to peaceful construc 
tion and once again had to devote our main attention to 
the war with Poland and subsequently to wiping out Wran- 
gel. It is this that determined the substance of our work 
for the year under review. Once again all our work turned 
to military problems. 

Then followed the transition from war to peace when 
we succeeded in ensuring that not a single soldier of the 
enemy armies remained on the territory of the R.S.F.S.R. 

This transition involved upheavals which we had cer 
tainly never foreseen. This is undoubtedly one of the main 



REPORT ON POLITICAL WORK OF C.C. 201 

causes of all the mistakes in policy that we made during 
the period under review and from which we now suffer. 
The demobilisation of the army, which had to be created 
in a country that had suffered unparalleled strains and 
stresses, which had to be created after several years of 
imperialist war the demobilisation of this army which, in 
view of our facilities, was incredibly difficult to transport, 
at a time when in addition there was famine due to the crop 
failure and a fuel shortage which to a great extent halted 
transport, this demobilisation, as we can now see, con 
fronted us with tasks which we had grossly underestim 
ated. Here to a large extent lie the sources of a whole 
number of crises: economic, social and political. Even at 
the end of last year I had to point out that one of the main 
difficulties of the coming spring would be the difficulties 
connected with the demobilisation of the army. I also 
pointed this out at a big discussion on December 30 44 in 
which most probably many of you took part. I must say 
that at the time we had scarcely any idea of the scale 
of these difficulties. We had not yet seen then the 
extent to which there would be not only technical difficul 
ties, but also the extent to which all the misfortunes which 
befell the Soviet Republic, exhausted by the previous 
imperialist war and the new civil war, would intensify dur 
ing demobilisation. To some extent it will be correct to say 
that demobilisation itself exposes these difficulties to an 
even greater degree. For a number of years the country has 
devoted itself exclusively to the war, given it all it pos 
sessed, ungrudgingly sacrificed its last mite, its miserable 
reserves and resources and only at the conclusion of the 
war we were able to see the full extent of the devastation 
and poverty which for a long time condemn us to simply 
healing our wounds. But we cannot even devote ourselves 
entirely to healing these wounds. The technical difficulties 
of army demobilisation to a considerable degree reveal the 



202 V. I. LENIN 



whole depth of the devastation that inevitably leads, apart 
from other things, to a series of economic and social crises. 

There is no doubt that the Central Committee s mistake 
was that it did not take into account the scale of the dif 
ficulties connected with demobilisation. It must, of course, 
be said that we could have nothing on which to base this 
appraisal, for the Civil War was so arduous that there was 
only one guiding principle: everything for victory on 
the civil war front, and nothing else. It was only by ob 
serving this principle and by the unparalleled efforts of 
the Red Army in the struggle against Kolchak, Yudenich 
and others, that we could achieve victory over the im 
perialists who had invaded Soviet Russia. 

From this main circumstance which was responsible for 
a whole series of mistakes and for the intensification of 
the crisis, I should like to turn to the question of how the 
work of the Party and the struggle of the entire proletariat 
brought to light a whole number of even more profound 
contradictions, erroneous calculations, or plans and not 
only mistakes in planning, but mistakes in determining the 
balance of forces between our class and those classes in 
collaboration with which, and sometimes in struggle 
against which, our class must decide the fate of the re 
public. Taking this as our starting-point we must pay 
attention to the results of past experience, to political ex 
perience, to what the Central Committee, as the po 
licy-directing body, must appreciate and endeavour to 
explain to the whole Party. These are such diverse mat 
ters as the course of our war with Poland and questions 
of food and fuel supplies. Our offensive, our too swift ad 
vance almost as far as Warsaw, was undoubtedly a mis 
take. I shall not now analyse whether it was a strategic or 
a political error, as this would take me too far away from 
the matter in hand. I think that this will be the concern 
of future historians, and those of us who have to continue 
to repulse the enemy in difficult struggle, have no time to 



REPORT ON POLITICAL V/ORK OF C.C. 203 



indulge in historical research. But at any rate the mistake 
is there for all to see, and it was due to the fact that we 
overestimated the superiority of our forces. The extent to 
which this superiority of forces depended on economic 
conditions, to which it depended on the fact that the war 
with Poland aroused patriotic feelings even among petty- 
bourgeois elements, by no means proletarian and by no 
means sympathetic to communism, who did not give un 
conditional support to the dictatorship of the proletariat 
and sometimes, one must say, did not support it at all 
it would be too complicated to decide that. But the fact 
remains: we made a definite error in the war with Poland. 
If we take a field of work such as food procurements, we 
shall see a similar error. With regard to surplus food requi 
sitioning and its fulfilment there can be no doubt that the 
year under review was more favourable than the previous 
one. This year the amount of grain collected is over 250 mil 
lion poods. By February 1 it was calculated that 235 million 
poods had been collected, whereas for the whole of the 
previous year 210 million poods were collected; that is to 
say, more was collected in a much shorter period than 
for the whole of the previous year. However, it turned 
out that of these 235 millions collected by February 1 we 
expended 155 million poods in the first six months, that 
is, an average of 25 million poods a month or even more. 
Of course, it has to be admitted in general that we were 
unable to allocate our reserves properly, even when they 
were better than last year s. We were unable correctly to 
assess the full danger of the crisis approaching with the 
spring, and succumbed to the natural desire to increase the 
ration of the starving workers. Of course, it must be said 
that here too we had no basis for making such estimates. 
In all capitalist states, in spite of the anarchy, in spite 
of the chaos inherent in capitalism, the basis for economic 
planning lies in the experience of many decades, an ex 
perience enabling capitalist states, which have the same 



204 V. I. LENIN 



economic system and differ only in details, to make com 
parisons. From these comparisons it is possible to deduce 
a genuinely scientific law, a certain regularity and uniform 
ity. We had nothing like this experience for such calcu 
lations and cannot have, and it was quite natural that at 
the end of the war, as soon as the possibility arose at last 
of giving the starving population a little more, we were 
unable immediately to establish the correct proportion. 
It is obvious that we should have limited the increase in 
the ration, and in this way create a certain reserve fund 
for a rainy day which was to come in the spring and 
which has now arrived. We did not do this. Here again is 
a mistake typical of all our work, a mistake which shows 
that the transition from war to peace presented us with 
a wholie number of such problems and difficulties, to over 
come which we had neither experience, nor training, nor 
the requisite material, and therefore the crisis was extra 
ordinarily intensified, aggravated and worsened. 

There was undoubtedly a somewhat analogous position 
in regard to fuel. This is the main issue in economic con 
struction. The entire transition from war to peace, the en 
tire transition to economic construction, which was spoken 
about at the previous Party Congress and which was the main 
concern and the focal point of all our policy during the year 
under review, had, of course, to be based on an estimation 
of the output of fuel and its proper distribution. It is no 
use talking of overcoming difficulties or of rehabilitating 
industry without this. It is clear that, in this respect, we 
are in a better position now than we were last year. Pre 
viously we were cut off from the coal and oil districts. 
After the victories of the Red Army we obtained coal and 
oil. At any rate the amount of fuel resources increased. 
We know that those fuel resources with which we en 
tered the year under review were greater than previously. 
And because of this increase in our fuel resources we made 
the mistake of immediately permitting such a wide distri- 



REPORT ON POLITICAL WORK OF C.C. 205 

bution of fuel that -these resources were exhausted and we 
were faced with a fuel crisis biefore we had put everything 
in proper working order. Special reports on all these prob 
lems will be presented to you, and at present I cannot 
even give you any approximate figures. But in any 
case, bearing in mind the experience of the past we must 
say that this mistake is bound up with a wrong under 
standing of the state of affairs and with the pace of the 
transition from war to peace. It turned out that this tran 
sition could only be made at a much slower pace than we 
had imagined. A far more lengthy period of preparation is 
required, a much slower tempo that is the lesson of this 
year, a lesson which the whole Party will need particularly 
to learn in order to determine our main tasks for next 
year, and in order to avoid such mistakes in the future. 

It is undoubtedly necessary to point out that these mis 
takes and particularly the crises to which they led were 
aggravated by the failure of the harvest. I have pointed 
out that the food procurements during the year under 
review gave us incomparably better food reserves, but 
this was one of the main reasons for the crises, because 
as a result of the failure of the harvest which led to a 
colossal dearth of fodder, loss of cattle and the ruin of 
peasant households, these grain procurements were con 
centrated in places where the grain surplus was not very 
big. There are far greater surpluses in various outlying 
regions of the republic, in Siberia and in the Northern 
Caucasus, but it is there that the Soviet government appa 
ratus was least powerful, that Soviet power was less 
stable, and transportation very difficult. That is why it tur 
ned out that we collected the increased food reserves from 
less grain-producing gubernias, and consequently the crisis 
in the peasant economy intensified considerably. 

Here again we clearly see that our estimate was not as 
accurate as it should have been. On the other hand, how 
ever, we were in such a tight corner that we had no other 



206 V. I. LENIN 



choice. A country which, after a devastating imperialist 
war, survived such a thing as a long civil war, could not 
of course exist without giving up everything to the front. 
And of course, being ruined, the country could do nothing 
but confiscate the peasants surpluses even though they 
were not compensated by any other means. This was 
vital in order to save the country, the army, and the work 
ers and peasants government. We said to the peasants: 
"Of course, you are lending your grain to the workers 
and peasants state, but if you don t you cannot save 
your country from the landlords and capitalists." We 
could act in no other way in circumstances forced upon us 
by the imperialists and the capitalists through their war. 
We had no other choice. But these circumstances led to 
the peasant economy being so weakened after such a long 
war that there was a crop failure due to the smaller sown 
area, a deterioration in equipment, a fall in the crop yield, 
and lack of workers, etc. The crop failure was colossal, 
and the collection of surplus grain which, nevertheless, was 
still better than we had expected, was accompanied by 
such an aggravation of the crisis that it will possibly 
bring us still further difficulties and misfortunes in the 
months to come. This fact must be carefully taken into 
account when analysing our political experience of the 
past year, and the political tasks we must set ourselves 
for the new year. The year under review has left the 
same urgent problems for the following year. 

I shall now deal with another point from a totally dif 
ferent sphere the discussion on trade unions which has 
taken up so much of the Party s time. I have mentioned it 
already today and naturally I could only cautiously re 
mark that there will hardly be many of you who would 
not regard this discussion as too great a luxury. I cannot 
help but add that in my view this was a really impermis 
sible luxury, and that in allowing such a discussion we un 
doubtedly committed an error, not realising that we had 



REPORT ON POLITICAL WORK OF C.C. 207 

pushed into the forefront a question which objectively 
cannot be in the forefront. We allowed ourselves to in 
dulge in this luxury, not realising the extent to which we 
distracted attention from the vital and threatening ques 
tion so close to us, namely, the question of that selfsame 
crisis. What are the actual results of this discussion which 
lasted so many months and with which most of you are 
undoubtedly bored? Special reports will be given you about 
this, but in my report I should like to draw attention to 
one aspect of the question that here the proverb "every 
cloud has a silver lining" has undoubtedly justified itself. 

Unfortunately, there was rather a lot of cloud, and very 
little silver lining. (Laughter.) But still, there was a silver 
lining, for although we lost a great deal of time and di 
verted the attention of our Party comrades from urgent 
tasks of struggle against the petty-bourgeois elements 
which surround us, we, nevertheless, learned to distin 
guish certain interrelationships which we had not seen 
before. The good thing was that the Party was bound to 
learn something from this struggle. Although we all knew 
that, being the ruling party, we had inevitably to merge 
the party and government leadership they have been 
merged and will remain so the Party nevertheless learned 
a certain lesson in this discussion which cannot be ignored. 
For some policy statements mainly the leadership of the 
Party voted. The policy statements which were some 
times called "policy statements of the workers opposi 
tion ", sometimes something different, clearly proved to 
represent a syndicalist trend. And this is not merely my 
personal opinion, but the opinion of the vast majority of 
those present. (Voices: Correct.) 

In this discussion the Party proved itself to have 
matured to such an extent that, aware of a certain waver 
ing of the leadership, aware that the leadership says: 
"We cannot agree sort us out," it mobilised rapidly for 
this task and the vast majority of the more important 



208 V. I. LENIN 



Party organisations answered straight away: "We have 
an opinion and we shall give it to you." 

During this discussion we have received a number of 
policy statements. They were so many that although in 
view of my position I should have read them, I am afraid 
I sinned and did not read them all. (Laughter.) I do not 
know whether all those present had so much leisure that 
they found time to read them, but in any case it should 
be said that this syndicalist, and to a certain degree even 
semi-anarchist, trend that was revealed provides much 
food for thought. For several months we allowed ourselves 
the luxury of studying shades of opinion. In the meantime 
the demobilisation of the army led to banditry and aggra 
vated the economic crisis. This discussion should have 
helped us to understand that our Party, as a party which 
now has approximately half a million members and per 
haps even more than half a million, has become, first, a 
mass party, and, secondly, the government party, and that 
as a mass party it to some extent reflects what takes place 
outside its ranks. It is extremely important to understand 
this. 

There would be nothing to fear in a slight syndicalist or 
semi-anarchist trend; the Party would swiftly and decisive 
ly recognise it, and would set about correcting it. But 
when it is bound up with the gigantic preponderance of 
the peasants in the country, when the dissatisfaction of 
the peasants with proletarian dictatorship is increasing, 
when the crisis in peasant farming is coming to a head, 
when the demobilisation of the peasant army throws out 
hundreds and thousands of broken men, who cannot find a 
place for themselves, who are only accustomed to war as 
an occupation, and who breed banditry, then it is not 
the time to argue about theoretical trends. And at the 
Congress we must frankly state that we shall not permit 
arguments about trends, we must put a stop to this. The 
Party Congress can and must do this; it must draw the 



REPORT ON POLITICAL WORK OF C.C. 209 

appropriate lesson and embody it in the Central Commit 
tee s Political Report, consolidate, confirm it and make it a 
duty and law for the Party. The atmosphere of the contro 
versy is becoming dangerous to the extreme and constitute 
a direct threat to the dictatorship of the proletariat. 

Several months ago, when I had occasion to meet and 
argue with some comrades in these discussions and said, 
"Beware, this constitutes a threat to working-class rule 
and the dictatorship of the proletariat", they replied, This 
is intimidation, you are browbeating us". On several occa 
sions I have had to listen to my remarks being labelled 
in this manner, that I indulge in browbeating, and I have 
replied that it would be absurd of me to browbeat old rev 
olutionaries who have gone through all kinds of ordeals. 
But when you see the difficulties developing around demo 
bilisation, there can now be no disputing not only that 
this was not browbeating, nor even an unavoidable pre 
occupation with the controversy, but was a completely exact 
indication of the situation, of our need for unity, restraint 
and discipline, not only because, otherwise, a proletarian 
party cannot work harmoniously, but because spring has 
brought and will bring even more difficult conditions in 
which we cannot function without maximum unity. These 
two main lessons, I think, we shall nevertheless be able to 
learn from the discussion. I think it necessary to say 
therefore that whilst we indulged in luxury and presented 
the world with a remarkable example of a party, placed 
in the most difficult conditions of desperate struggle, 
permitting itself the luxury of devoting unprecedented 
attention to the detailed elucidation of separate points of 
policy statements, at a time when it was faced with a crop 
failure and a crisis, devastation and demobilisation, we 
shall now draw from these lessons a political conclu 
sion, not only a conclusion regarding particular errors 
made, but a political conclusion concerning the relations 
between classes, between the working class and the peas- 

142283 



210 V. I. LENIN 



ants. These relations are not what we thought them to be. 
These relations require a far greater unity and concentra 
tion of forces by the proletariat. Under the dictatorship of 
the proletariat they represent a danger far greater than 
all the Denikins, Kolchaks and Yudeniches taken together. 
It would be fatal for anyone to harbour any illusions on 
this score! The difficulties stemming from the petty-bour 
geois elements are enormous, and in order to overcome 
them great unity is needed, not only a formal unity, but 
joint harmonious work, a single will, as it is only with 
this single will of the mass of proletarians that the proletar 
iat, in a peasant country, can accomplish the immense 
tasks of its dictatorship and government. 

Aid is coming from West-European countries but not 
quickly enough. It is coming and it is increasing. 

I have already pointed out during the morning session 
that one of the most Important factors of the period under 
review, one closely related to the work of the Central Com 
mittee, is the organisation of the Second Congress of the 
Comintern. Of course, compared with last year the world 
revolution has considerably advanced. Of course, the 
Communist International which at the time of last year s 
Congress existed only as a body that issued proclamations 
has now begun to function as an independent party in 
each country, and not merely as an advanced party 
communism has become the central problem of the entire 
working-class movement. In Germany, France and Italy 
the Communist International has not only become the 
centre of the working-class movement, but is the focus of 
attention of the whole political life of these countries. Last 
autumn you could not pick up a German or French news 
paper without seeing how they abused Moscow and the 
Bolsheviks, what adjectives they heaped on us, and how 
the Bolsheviks and the 21 conditions for admission to the 
Third International 45 were made the central issue of their 
own entire political life. This is our achievement, and no 



REPORT ON POLITICAL WORK OF C.C. 211 

one can take it away from us! This shows how the world 
revolution is growing and how, parallel with it, the eco 
nomic crisis in Europe is being aggravated. But in any case 
if we were to assume from this that in a short space of 
time help from Europe would come in the shape of a lasting 
proletarian revolution, we could simply be lunatics, and 
I am certain there are none in this hall. In these three 
years we have learned to understand that our stake on the 
world revolution does not mean that we rely on a definite 
date, or that the accelerated rate of development may or 
may not lead to a revolution in the spring. Therefore, we 
must be able to bring our work in line with the class 
relations within our country and other countries so as to 
be able to maintain the dictatorship of the proletariat for 
a long time, and, however gradually, to remedy all those 
misfortunes and crises which rain down on us. This is the 
only correct and sober presentation of the question. 

I shall now turn to an item concerning the work of the 
Central Committee during the present year, which is closely 
related to the tasks facing us. This is the question of our 
relations with foreign countries. 

Until the Ninth Party Congress our attention and all our 
endeavours were aimed at achieving the transition from 
the relations of war with capitalist countries to peaceful 
and trade relations. We made a whole number of diplo 
matic moves in this direction and gained the upper hand 
over undoubtedly skilled diplomats. When, for instance, 
representatives of America or of the League of Nations 
proposed that we halt hostilities against Denikin and Kol- 
chak on specific terms, they thought that we would find 
ourselves in difficulties. In actual fact, it was they who 
found themselves in difficulties and we who achieved a great 
diplomatic victory. They were made to look fools, had to 
withdraw their terms, and subsequently this was exposed 
in all the diplomatic literature and press of the world. But 



1 1- 



212 V. I. LENIN 



we cannot rest content with a diplomatic victory. We need 
genuine trade relations and not only diplomatic victories. 
It is only this year, however, that there is some develop 
ment in trade relations. The question has arisen of trade 
relations with Britain. Since the summer of last year this 
has become the main question. In this connection the war 
with Poland put us back considerably. Britain was ready to 
sign a trade agreement. The British bourgeoisie wanted this 
agreement, court circles in Britain were against it and 
interfered with it, while the war with Poland delayed the 
agreement. And so up to the present moment this matter 
has not been settled. 

It seems that today the newspapers have reported that 
Krassin has in London informed the press that he expects 
the trade agreement to be signed shortly. 46 I do not know 
whether these hopes are fully justified. I cannot be certain 
that this will actually take place, but for my part I must 
say that we in the Central Committee have devoted a great 
deal of attention to this question and consider it correct 
for us to compromise in order to achieve a trade agreement 
with Britain. 

The granting of concessions is bound up with this. 
We have devoted far more attention to this question this 
year than previously. A decree of the Council of People s 
Commissars issued on November 23 outlined the problem 
of granting concessions in a form most acceptable to 
foreign capitalists. When certain misinterpretations or 
insufficient understanding of this problem arose in Party 
circles, a number of meetings were held where it was dis 
cussed by leading Party workers. In general there was not 
a great deal of disagreement, although we heard a great 
many protests from workers and peasants. They said: 
"We ve got rid of our capitalists and now they want to 
call in foreign capitalists." How much these protests were 
due to ignorance, or how much they were a reflection of 
the calculations of the kulak or outright capitalist section 



REPORT ON POLITICAL WORK OF C.C. 213 

of non-Party people who consider that they have the legit 
imate right to be capitalists in Russia, and what is more, 
capitalists with power, and not so that foreign capital 
is introduced without power how big was the role played 
by these factors, the Central Committee, of course, had no 
statistics at its disposal to decide, and indeed it is most 
unlikely that such statistics exist anywhere in the world to 
appreciate and ascertain this. But by this decree at any 
rate we made a step towards establishing relations with a 
view to granting concessions. It is necessary to point out 
that in practice and this must never be forgotten v/e 
have not secured a single concession. Our argument is about 
whether we should try to get them at all costs. Whether 
we get concessions does not depend on our arguments or 
decisions, but on international capital. On February 1 of 
this year the Council of People s Commissars took another 
decision on concessions. The first clause of this decision 
says: "To approve in principle the granting of all conces 
sions in Grozny and Baku and at other operating oilfields 
and to commence negotiations, conducting them speedily." 

This question was not settled without a certain amount 
of dispute. The granting of concessions in Grozny and Baku 
seemed to comrades to be wrong, and likely to arouse op 
position among the workers. The majority on the Central 
Committee, and I personally, held the view that perhaps 
there were no grounds for complaints. 

The majority on the Central Committee, and I personally, 
supported the view that it was essential to grant these con 
cessions, and we shall ask you to back it up with your 
authority. This alliance with the state trusts of the ad 
vanced countries is absolutely essential because our eco 
nomic crisis is so deep that we cannot, on our own, reha 
bilitate our ruined economy without machinery and techni 
cal aid from abroad. It is not enough simply to bring the 
equipment here. We may perhaps grant concessions to the 
biggest imperialist trusts on a wider basis: a quarter of 



214 V. I. LENIN 



Baku, a quarter of Grozny, a quarter of our best forest re 
serves so as ito ensure an essential basis by the installation 
of the most modern machinery; on the other hand, in return 
for this we shall obtain the machinery we lack for the 
remaining part. In this manner we shall be able, even if 
only by a quarter or a half, to catch up with the modern, 
advanced trusts of other countries. No one who to any 
degree takes a sober view of the present situation can 
doubt that without this we should be in a very difficult 
position and we should be unable to overtake them without 
the most colossal strain on all our resources. Negotiations 
with some of the largest world trusts have already begun. 
Naturally, for their part they are not simply doing us a 
good turn, they are doing it only for the sake of unlimited 
profits. Modern capitalism speaking in the language of 
peace diplomacy is a robber, a rapacious trust, it is not 
the former capitalism of the era of normal times: it makes 
hundreds of per cent in profit, taking advantage of its 
monopoly position on the world market. 

On February 1, 1921, the Council of People s Commissars 
decided to purchase 18,500,000 poods of coal abroad, as 
our coal crisis was already approaching. It had already be 
come clear then that we would have to expend our gold 
reserves not only on buying machinery. In the latter case 
our coal output would have increased and we would have 
advanced production if we had bought machines abroad 
for the development of our coal industry rather than pur 
chase coal, but the crisis was so acute that we had to 
reject this better economic step for a worse one, and had 
to expend our resources on coail which we could have pro 
duced here. We shall have to compromise still further in 
order to purchase consumer goods for the peasants and 
workers. 

Now I want to deal with the Kronstadt events. 47 I have 
not yet received the latest news from Kronstadt, but I have 
no doubt that this mutiny, which very quickly revealed to 



REPORT ON POLITICAL WORK OF C.C. 215 

us the familiar figures of whiteguard generals, will be put 
down in the next few days, possibly within the next few 
hours. There can be no doubt about this. But it is essential 
that we make a thorough appraisal of the political and 
economic lessons of this event. 

What does it mean? It means the transfer of political 
power from the Bolsheviks to an undefined conglomeration 
or alliance of ill-assorted elements, seemingly a little to the 
right of the Bolsheviks, and perhaps even more "left" than 
the Bolsheviks so amorphous was the combination of 
political groupings which tried to take power at Kronstadt. 
There is no doubt, as you all know, that at the same time 
White generals were very active there. This has been 
amply proved. Two weeks before the Kronstadt events 
took place, the Paris newspapers wrote that there was a 
mutiny at Kronstadt. It is quite clear that this is the work 
of Socialist-Revolutionaries and whiteguard emigres, and 
at the same time this movement was reduced to a petty- 
bourgeois counter-revolution, to petty-bourgeois anarch 
ism. This is already something new. This circumstance, 
seen in relation to all the crises, must be given careful 
political consideration and must be very thoroughly anal 
ysed. Here we have evidence of petty-bourgeois elements, 
anarchist elements, with slogans of free trade, always 
against the dictatorship of the proletariat. This mood has 
affected the proletariat very widely. It has affected the 
Moscow factories, and factories in a number of provincial 
centres. This petty-bourgeois counter-revolution is un 
doubtedly more dangerous than Denikin, Yudenich and 
Kolchak put together, because here we are dealing with 
a country where the proletariat is in the minority, we 
are dealing with a country where peasant property was 
ruined, and where besides there is also demobilisation 
which has released mutinous elements in great numbers. 
No matter how big or small at the beginning was what 
might be called the shift in power, which the Kronstadt 



216 



V. I. LENIN 



sailors and workers supported they wanted to correct the 
Bolsheviks in regard to freedom of trade which seems a 
small shift, leaving the same slogans of "Soviet power" 
with a slight change or only corrected, yet in reality the 
non-Party elements here served only as a footstool, a step 
or a bridge for the whiteguards to step in. This is politic 
ally inevitable. We have seen petty-bourgeois, anarchist 
elements in the Russian revolution and we have fought 
against them for decades. Since February 1917 we have 
seen these petty-bourgeois elements in action, we saw 
them in action during the great revolution, and we have 
seen the attempts of the petty-bourgeois parties to state 
that in their programme they little differ from the Bolshe 
viks, it is only their methods in carrying it through that 
are different. We know this from the experience not only 
of the October Revolution, but from the experience in the 
outlying regions and various areas included in the former 
Russian Empire where representatives of a different pow 
er replaced Soviet power. We may recall the Democratic 
Committee in Samara. 48 All of them came in with slogans 
of equality, freedom, constituent assembly, and not once, 
but many times, they proved to be simply steps, a bridge 
for the shift to whiteguard power. 

The experience of the whale of Europe shows what, in 
practice, the policy of sitting between two stools leads to. 
That is why in this respect we must say that political con 
flicts here are the greatest danger. We must take a careful 
look at this petty-bourgeois counter-revolution, which puts 
forward slogans about freedom of trade. 

This danger shows us what I spoke about when dealing 
with our arguments about different policy statements. Face 
to face with this danger we have to understand that we 
must not only put an end to Party squabbles in the formal 
sense; we shall of course do this, but it is not enough. We 
need to remember that we must have a far more serious 
approach to this question. 



REPORT ON POLITICAL WORK OF C.C. 217 

We have to understand that in a situation where there 
is a crisis in the peasant economy we can only exist by 
appealing to the peasants to give aid to the town and 
village. We must remember that the bourgeoisie try to pit 
the peasants against the workers, try to pit petty-bourgeois 
anarchist elements against the workers, using workers 
slogans, which will lead directly to the overthrow of the 
dictatorship of the proletariat and therefore to the restora 
tion of capitalism, of the old landlord-capitalist power. The 
political danger here is obvious. A number of revolutions 
have traversed this path in the most obvious way; we have 
always pointed to it, we saw it clearly before us. It de 
mands from the ruling party of Communists, from the lead 
ing revolutionary proletarian elements an undoubtedly 
different attitude from the one which we displayed over 
and over again during this year. This danger calls for 
undoubtedly greater unity, undoubtedly greater discipline, 
undoubtedly more harmonious work, without which we 
shall not be able to cope with the dangers that fate has 
brought us. 

Further there are the economic problems. What is the 
meaning of the slogan "freedom of trade" advocated by 
the petty-bourgeois elements? It means that in the relations 
of the proletariat and the small farmers there are such dif 
ficult problems, there are such tasks, which we have not 
yet solved. I am speaking of the relations of the victorious 
proletariat to the small proprietors when the proletarian 
revolution unfolds in a country where the proletariat is in 
the minority, and the petty bourgeoisie is in the majority. 
The proletariat s role in such a country consists in guiding 
the transition of these small proprietors to socialised, col 
lective, communal work. In theory this is beyond dispute. 
We have dealt with this transition in a whole number of 
legislative acts, but we know that it is not a matter of 
legislative acts, but of practical realisation, and we know 
that this can be guaranteed when you have a very power- 



218 V. I. LENIN 



ful, large-scale industry that is able to provide the petty 
producer with such benefits that he will see in practice the 
advantage of this large-scale economy. 

Marxists and ail .socialists who have thought about the 
social revolution and its tasks have always presented the 
question theoretically in this way. But our main specific 
feature about which I have spoken and which is character 
istic of Russia to the greatest degree is that we have, on 
the one hand, not only a minority, but a considerable minor 
ity of proletarians, and, on the other, a vast majority of 
peasants. And the conditions in which we had to defend 
the revolution made the solution of our problems incredibly 
difficult. We have not been able to prove all the advantages 
of large-scale production in practice, for this production 
lies in ruins, drags out a miserable existence, and can only 
be rehabilitated by demanding sacrifices from these very 
same small farmers. Industry needs to be developed and 
for this fuel is needed, and once fuel is needed, firewood 
has to be relied on, and to rely on firewood means to rely on 
the peasant and his horse. In conditions of crisis, dearth 
of fodder, and loss of cattle, the peasant must give his prod 
uce on credit to the Soviet government for the sake of 
large-scale industry, from which so far he receives nothing. 
This is the economic situation which gives rise to enormous 
difficulties; this is the economic situation which demands 
a deeper analysis of the conditions of transition from war 
to peace. We cannot manage our economy during a war 
other than by saying to the peasants: "You must let the 
workers and peasants state have things on loan to enable 
it to overcome its grave difficulties". When we direct all 
our attention to the rehabilitation of the economy, we 
must understand that, until large-scale production tri 
umphs, until it is rehabilitated, we shall be faced with the 
small farmer, the small proprietor, the small producer 
working for commodity circulation. And this rehabilitation 
is impossible on the old basis; it will take many years, not 



REPORT ON POLITICAL WORK OF C.C. 219 

less than decades, and in view of the havoc in the country, 
possibly longer. Until that happens we shall have to deal for 
many long years with that small producer as such, and the 
slogan "freedom of trade" will be inevitable. This slogan is 
dangerous, not because it hides the aspirations of white- 
guards and Mensheviks, but because it may become wide 
spread in spite of the hatred of the peasants for the 
whiteguards. It will become widespread because it con 
forms to the economic conditions of the small producer s 
existence. Bearing all this in mind the Central Committee 
has adopted a decision and initiated a discussion on the 
substitution of surplus food requisitioning by a tax, and 
has placed this question squarely before the Congress 
today. The resolution you have passed today approves this 
measure. The problem of the tax and requisitioning was 
legally raised long ago, at the end of 1918. The tax law 
was dated October 30, 1918. A tax in kind on the farmer 
became law, but was never carried out. Several months 
after it had been announced a number of instructions ap 
peared, and it was never applied. On the other hand, the 
confiscation of surpluses from the peasants was a measure 
forced on us through sheer necessity owing to war condi 
tions, but which no longer applies when the circumstances 
of the peasant s economy approximate to peace-time con 
ditions. He needs the assurance that, while he has to give 
a certain amount, he can have a certain amount for his own 
local exchange. 

The whole of our economy taken both in its entirety and 
by individual branches was affected throughout by war 
time conditions. Bearing this in mind, our task was to col 
lect a specific amount of food, completely disregarding its 
role in the social turnover. Now, when we are turning from 
problems of war to those of peace, we are beginning to 
regard the tax in kind in a different light; we view it not 
only from the standpoint of guaranteeing the needs of the 
state, but also of those of the small farms. We must 



220 V. I. LENIN 



understand those economic forms of indignation of the 
small farmers against the proletariat that have appeared 
and are becoming more acute in the present crisis. We 
must try to do the maximum possible in this connection. 
This is a matter of vital importance for us. We must enable 
the peasant to have a certain amount of freedom in the 
local exchange of goods, and turn surplus food requisition 
ing into a tax, so that the small proprietor may be in a 
better position to calculate his own production and deter 
mine the scale of his production in accordance with the 
tax. Obviously we know quite well that in the conditions 
around us this is a very difficult thing to achieve. The 
amount of sown area, the crop yield, the farm implements 
have all been reduced, the surpluses have undoubtedly 
decreased, and in very many cases there are none at all. 
These circumstances must be regarded as a fact. The 
peasant has to go hungry for a while in order to save the 
factories and the towns from absolute famine. This is some 
thing easily understood on a country-wide scale, but we 
do not expect this to be understood by the poverty-strick 
en, scattered, peasant-proprietor. And we know that we 
shall not be able to avoid the use of coercion to which the 
impoverished peasants react very strongly. We must not 
imagine, either, that this measure will relieve us of the crisis. 
At the same time, however, we regard it our task to make 
the maximum concessions, so that the small producer may 
have the best conditions to come into his own. Up to now, 
we adapted ourselves to the tasks of war; now we must 
adapt ourselves to peace-time conditions. The Central 
Committee faces this task the task of transition to the 
tax in kind in conditions of proletarian power, and this is 
closely connected with granting concessions. You will be 
having a special discussion on this problem, and it must 
receive your special attention. By granting concessions 
proletarian power can secure agreement with advanced 
capitalist states. We cannot advance farther along the path 



REPORT ON POLITICAL WORK OF C.C. 221 

to communist system without strengthening our industry 
which depends on this agreement. On the other hand, at the 
moment of transition in a country where the peasants 
predominate, we must be able to apply measures which 
safeguard the peasants economically, we must be able to 
apply the maximum measures for easing their economic 
situation. Until we have altered the peasant s outlook, until 
large-scale machinery has remade him, we must guarantee 
him the possibility of running his economy freely. We are 
now passing through a transitional phase; our revolution is 
surrounded by capitalist countries. As long as we are in 
this transitional phase, we are forced to seek extraordinar 
ily complex forms of relationships. Oppressed by war, 
we were unable to concentrate our attention on how to 
establish economic relations between proletarian state 
power, which controls incredibly devastated large-scale 
production, and small farmers, and on how to find forms 
of coexistence with them, who as long as they remain 
small farmers, cannot exist without the guarantee of a 
certain system of exchange for their small economy. I 
consider this the most important question in the sphere of 
economics and politics for the Soviet government at the 
present time. I consider that this question sums up the 
political results of our work now that we have completed 
the war period and have begum, in the year under review, 
to make the transition to a peace-time situation. 

This transition is bound up with such difficulties and has 
so clearly delineated this petty-bourgeois element, that 
we must consider it soberly. We look at this seri es of 
events from the point of view of the class struggle, and we 
have never held any illusions as to that the (relations 
between the proletariat and the petty bourgeoisie are a dif 
ficult problem, demanding complicated measures or, to be 
more accurate, a whole range of complicated, transitional 
measures, so that the victory of proletarian power may 
be assured. The fact that we issued a decree on the tax in 



222 V. I. LENIN 



kind at the end of 1918 proves that the Communists were 
aware of this problem, but owing to war conditions, were 
unable to solve it. In the civil war conditions we were 
obliged to adopt war-time measures. It would be a very 
great mistake, however, if we concluded from this that 
these are the only measures and relations possible. This 
would certainly mean the collapse of Soviet power and of 
the dictatorship of the proletariat. When the transition to 
peace takes place during a period of economic crisis, one 
must remember that it is easier to build up a proletarian 
state in a country with large-scale production than in a 
country where small-scale production predominates. This 
problem has to be approached in a whole number of ways, 
and we in no way close our eyes to these difficulties, nor 
do we forget that the proletariat is one thing, and small- 
scale production another. We do not forget that there are 
different classes, that petty-bourgeois, anarchist counter 
revolution is a political .step to whiteguard rule. We must 
face this squarely and soberly, recognising that what is 
needed here is, on the one hand, maximum unity, restraint 
and discipline within the proletarian party, and on the 
other hand, a whole number of economic measures which, 
owing to war conditions, we have so far been unable to 
carry out. We must recognise the need for granting conces 
sions, for purchasing machinery and equipment to satisfy 
agriculture, so that by exchanging them for grain we 
are able to re-establish relations between the proleta 
riat and the peasants which will guarantee their exist 
ence in peace-time conditions. I trust that we shall return 
again to this problem and I repeat that in my view we are 
dealing here with an important matter, and that the past 
year, which must be characterised as the period of transi 
tion from war to peace, places us before extremely difficult 
tasks. 

In conclusion, I shall say a few words about the question 
which has taken up so much of our time, the struggle 



REPORT ON POLITICAL WORK OF C.C. 223 



against bureaucracy. This question came up before the 
Central Committee in the summer of last year, and in 
August the Central Committee sent a letter to all organisa 
tions on the subject, -and it was placed before a Party con 
ference in September. Finally, at the December Congress 
olf Soviets it was dealt with on a wider scale. There can be 
no doubt that a bureaucratic ulcer exists; it is recognised, 
and a real struggle against it is essential. Of course in the 
discussion that we have had this question, to s&lt;ay the least, 
was dealt with frivolously in some policy statements, and 
by and large was dealt with from a petty-bourgeois view 
point. There is no doubt that there had recently been dis 
content and ferment among non-Party workers. At non- 
Party meetings in Moscow it has been clear that the words 
democracy and freedom have been used as slogans for the 
overthrow of Soviet power. Many, or at any rate, some 
representatives of the "workers opposition" have battled 
against this evil, against this petty-bourgeois, counter-rev 
olutionary evil and have said: "We shall unite against 
this." And in actual fact they have been able to display the 
maximum unity. I do not know whether all the supporters 
of the "workers opposition" group and other groups with 
semi-syndicalist platforms are like them. We need to learn 
more about this at the Congress, we need to understand 
that the struggle against bureaucracy is absolutely indis 
pensable, and that it is just as complicated as the problem 
of fighting petty-bourgeois elements. Bureaucracy in our 
state isystern has become such a serious ailment that it is 
dealt with in our Party Programme, because it is connected 
with these petty-bourgeois elements and their widely scat 
tered nature. These ailments can only be cured by the unity 
of the working people, so that they will be able not only 
to welcome the decrees of the Workers and Peasants In 
spection (do we not issue plenty of decrees that are wel 
comed?) but will be able, through the Workers and Peas 
ants Inspection, to exercise their right, something which 



224 v. i. LENIN 



is not to be found, not only in the villages, but even in the 
towns and even in the capital cities. Very frequently people 
who shout loudest against bureaucracy do not know 
how to exercise this right. Very great attention needs to 
be paid to this fact. 

In this instance we frequently observe that some peo 
ple who battle with this evil may sincerely wish to help 
the proletarian party, the proletarian dictatorship, the pro 
letarian movement, but in reality help the petty-bourgeois 
anarchist elements, which on more than one occasion dur 
ing the revolution have shown themselves to be the most 
dangerous enemy of the proletarian dictatorship. And now 
and this is the main conclusion and lesson of the current 
year they have once again shown themselves to be the 
most dangerous enemy, most likely to have followers and 
support in a country like ours, able to change the mood of 
the broad mass of people, and to affect even a section of 
non-Party workers. In that case the proletarian state finds 
itself in a very difficult position. If we do not understand 
this, if we do not learn a lesson from it and do not make 
this Congress a turning-point both in economic policy and 
in the sense of maximum unity of the proletariat we shall 
have to sadly say of ourselves that we have forgotten noth 
ing of that which, at times small and trifling, ought to be 
forgotten, and have learned nothing from those serious 
things which this year of the revolution should have taught 
us. I hope this will not be the case! (Stormy applause.) 

First published in full in 1921 Vol. 32, pp. 146-68 

in Tenth Congress of the 

Russian Communist Party. 

Verbatim Report 

(March 8-16, 1921), Moscow 




THE HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY 
OF THE REPUBLIC 

Report of the All-Russian Central Executive Committee 

and the Council of People s Commissars to the 

Ninth All-Russian Congress of Soviets 49 

December 23, 1921 

(Stormy applause. Cries of "Hurrah!", "Long live our 
leader, Comrade Lenin!", "Long live the leader of the world 
proletariat, Comrade Lenin!" Loud and prolonged applause.) 
Comrades, I have to make a report on the foreign and 
domestic position of the republic. This is the first time I 
have been able to make such a report when a whole year 
has passed without one, at any rate, large-scale attack 
against our Soviet power by Russian or foreign capitalists. 
This is the first year that we have been able to enjoy 
a relative respite from intervention, even though to a limit 
ed extent, and that we have been able in some measure 
to apply our energies to our chief and fundamental tasks, 
namely, the rehabilitation of our war-devastated economy, 
to healing the wounds inflicted on Russia by the exploit 
ing classes that had been in power, and to laying the foun 
dations for socialist construction. 

Firstly, in touching upon the question of the international 
position of our republic, I must repeat what I have already 
said, namely, that a certain equilibrium has been created 
in international relations, although it is highly unstable. 

15-2283 



226 V. I. LENIN 



This is now evident. It is very strange for those of us who 
have lived through the revolution from its inception, who 
have experienced and observed our incredible difficulties 
in breaching the imperialist fronts, to see now the way in 
which things have developed. Probably, at that time none 
of us expected or could have expected that things would 
take isuch a turn. 

We imagined (and it is perhaps well worth remembering 
this now because it will help us in our practical conclusions 
on the main economic problems) that future development 
would take a more simple, a more direct form, than the 
one it took. We told ourselves, we told the working class 
and the working people both of Russia and of other coun 
tries that there was no way out of (the terrible and criminal 
imperialist slaughter except through revolution and that 
by breaking off the imperialist war by revolution we were 
opening up the only possible way out of this criminal 
slaughter for all peoples. It seemed to us then, and it could 
not seem otherwise, that this was the obvious, direct and 
easiest path to take. This direct path, which alone had 
enabled us to break free of imperialist ties, of imperialist 
crimes and of the imperialist war continuing to threaten 
the rest of the world, proved to be one which other nations 
were unable to take at least as quickly as we had thought 
they would. When, despite this, we now see what has taken 
place, when we see that there is only one Socialist Soviet 
Republic and that it is surrounded by a whole array of 
frenziedly hostile imperialist powers, we ask ourselves 
how was it possible for this to happen? 

One may reply without any exaggeration: this happened 
because basically our understanding of events was correct, 
because basically our appraisal of the imperialist slaughter 
and the confusion in the relations between the imperialist 
powers was correct. It is only due to this that such a 
strange situation has arisen, that we witness such an 
unstable, inexplicable, and yet to a certain extent, indis- 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 227 

putable equilibrium. The fact of the matter is that, although 
completely surrounded by countries economically and mil 
itarily immensely more powerful than ourselves, whose 
open hostility to us quite often borders on frenzy, we 
nevertheless see that they were unable to bring about the 
actual and instant destruction of Soviet Russia on which 
for three yeans they had spent so much of their resources 
and their strength. When we ask ourselves how this could 
happen, how it could be that one of the most backward 
and very weak states succeeded in resisting the attacks 
of the openly hostile, most powerful countries in the world, 
when we try to examine this question, we isee clearly that 
it was because we proved to be correct on the most funda 
mental issues. Our forecasts and calculations proved to be 
correct. It turned out that although the support of the 
working people of the world was not the swift and direct 
support that we had counted on, and which we had regard 
ed as the basis of the whole of our policy, we did receive 
considerable support of another kind, not a direct support, 
not a swift support. It was precisely this support, precisely 
this sympathy both of the workers and peasants, the farm 
workers, throughout the world, even in countries most 
hostile to us, that were the final and most decisive sources, 
the decisive reasons for the complete failure of all the 
attacks directed againist us. It was due to this that the 
alliance of the working people of all countries, which we 
had proclaimed, strengthened and which had been realised 
within the borders of our republic, that had an effect on all 
countries. No matter how precarious this support may be, as 
long as capitalism exists in other countries (this we must 
of course see clearly and frankly acknowledge), we may say 
that this support can already be relied on. Because of this 
sympathy and support that we now command, the inter 
vention, which we endured during the past three years, 
which caused us so much incredible destruction and suffer 
ing, is, I will not say impossible one has to be very cau- 

15* 



1&gt;28 V. I. LENIN 



tious and circumspect here but, at any rate, it has to a 
great extent been made far more difficult for our enemies 
to carry out. And it is this that, in the final analysis, is 
responsible for the situation that we see now and which 
at first glance appears so strange and incomprehensible. 

When we quite calmly weigh up the sympathy felt for 
Bolshevism and the socialist revolution, when we survey 
the international situation from the point of view of the 
balance of forces, irrespective of whether these forces fa 
vour a just or an unjust cause, whether they favour the 
exploiting class or the working people we shall ignore 
this aspect and attempt an appraisal of how these forces 
are grouped on an international scale then we shall see 
that they are grouped in a manner that basically confirms 
our predictions and calculations. These were: that capital 
ism is disintegrating and that after the war, which ended 
first with the Brest-Litovsk peace and subsequently the 
Versailles peace and I don t know which is worse even 
in the countries which emerged as victors the hatred 
and loathing for the war increases as time passes. And the 
further we get from the war, the clearer it becomes, not 
only to the working people, but to a very large extent also 
to the bourgeoisie of the victorious countries, that capital 
ism is disintegrating, that the world economic crisis has 
created an intolerable situation from which there is no es 
cape, despite the victories achieved. That is why we, very 
much weaker than all the other powers, economically, 
politically and militarily, are at the same time stronger, 
because we are aware of, and correctly assess, all that 
emerges and must emerge from this imperialist confusion, 
from this bloody tangle and from those contradictions (to 
take only the currency contradictions, I will not mention the 
others) in which they have become enmeshed and are becom 
ing enmeshed still more deeply, unable to see a way out. 
Today we see how the representatives of the most moder 
ate bourgeoisie, who are definitely and without doubt far 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 229 

removed from socialist ideas, to say nothing of "that awful 
Bolshevism", change their tune; we see how even such 
people change their tune as the famous writer Keynes, 
whose book has been translated into all languages, who 
himself took part in the Versailles negotiations, and who 
devoted himself heart and soul to helping his governments 
even he, subsequently, has had to abandon this path, to 
give it up, while continuing to curse socialism. I repeat, he 
does not mention, nor does he wish to think about Bolshe 
vism but he tells the capitalist world: "What you 
are doing will lead you into a hopeless situation", and 
he even proposes something like annulment of all 
debts. 

Excellent, gentlemen! You should have followed our 
example long ago. 

Only a few days ago we read in the newspapers a short 
report to the effect that one of the most experienced, 
exceedingly skilful and astute leaders of a capitalist govern 
ment, Lloyd George, is, it appears, beginning to propose a 
similar step; and that seemingly America wishes to reply 
by saying: "Sorry, but we want to be repaid in full." That 
being so, we say to ourselves: the affairs of these advanced 
and mighty states which are discussing such a simple 
measure so many years after the war are not too good. 
This was one of the easiest things we did it was nothing 
to some of the other difficulties we overcame. (Applause.) 
When we see the growing confusion on this question we 
say that we are not afraid of their propaganda; although 
we by no means forget either the dangers surrounding us 
or our weakness, economically and militarily, compared to 
any one of these states who, jointly, quite openly and 
incessantly express their hatred for us. Whenever we 
express somewhat different views as to whether the exist 
ence of landlords and capitalists is justified they do not like 
it, and these views are declared to be criminal propaganda. I 
simply cannot understand this, for the same sort of propa- 



230 V. I. LENIN 



ganda is conducted legally by all states that do not share 
our economic views and opinions. But propaganda which 
calls Bolshevism a monstrous, criminal, usurpatory thing 
this monster defies description this propaganda is con 
ducted openly in all these countries. Recently, I had 
a meeting with Christensen who is a candidate for 
the U.S. Presidency on behalf of the Workers and Peas 
ants Party there. Do not be misled by this name, com 
rades. It does not in the least resemble the workers and 
peasants party in Russia. It is a purely bourgeois party, 
openly and resolutely hostile to any kind of socialism, and 
is recognised as being perfectly respectable by all bourgeois 
parties. This Danish-born American, who received almost 
a million votes at the presidential elections (this is, after 
all, something in the United States), told me how in Den 
mark, when he tried to say among people "dressed like I 
am", and he was well-dressed, like a bourgeois, that the 
Bolsheviks were not criminals, "they nearly killed me". 
They told him that the Bolsheviks were monsters, usurpers, 
and that they were surprised that anyone could mention 
such people in decent society. This is the type of atmos 
phere of propaganda surrounding us. 

We see, nevertheless, that some kind of equilibrium has 
been created. This is the objective political situation which 
is quite independent of our victories, which proves that 
we fathomed the depth of the contradictions connected 
with the imperialist war, and that we are gauging them 
more correctly than ever before, than other powers, who 
despite all their victories, despite all their strength, have 
not yet found a way out, nor see any. That is the substance 
of the international situation which accounts for what we 
now see. We have before us a highly unstable but, never 
theless, a certain, obvious, indisputable equilibrium. I do 
not know whether this is for long, and I do not think that 
anyone can know. That is why we, for our part, must 
display the utmost caution. And the first precept of our 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 231 

policy, the first lesson that emerges from our governmental 
activities for the past year, the lesson which must be 
learned by all workers and peasants, is to be on the 
alert, to remember that we are surrounded by people, 
classes, governments which openly express the utmost 
hatred for us. We must remember that we are always 
a hair s breadth away from intervention. We shall do all 
that lies within our power to prevent this misfortune. 
We experienced such a burden of the imperialist war 
which is unlikely to have been experienced by any 
other nation. Then we bore the burden of the civil war 
forced on us by the ruling classes, who fought for the 
Russia of the emigrants, the Russia of the landlords, the 
Russia of the capitalists. We know, we know only too well, 
the incredible misfortunes that war brings to the workers 
and peasants. For this reason our attitude to this question 
must be most cautious and circumspect. We are ready to 
make the utmost concessions and sacrifices in order to pre 
serve peace for which we have paid a high price. We are 
ready to make big concessions and sacrifices, but we are 
not prepared to make any kind of concessions or sacri 
fices, or do this forever. Let those, fortunately not numer 
ous, representatives of the war parties and aggressive 
cliques of Finland, Poland, and Rumania who make great 
play of this, let them mark this well. (Applause.) 

Anyone who has any political sense or acumen at all, 
will say that there has not been nor can there be a gov 
ernment in Russia, other than the Soviet Government, pre 
pared to make such concessions and sacrifices in relation 
to nationalities which had been within our state, and also 
those which joined the Russian Empire. There is not, and 
cannot be, another government which would recognise as 
clearly as we do and declare so distinctly to one and all 
that the relation of old Russia, tsarist Russia, Russia of the 
war parties, that her relation to the nationalities populat 
ing Russia was criminal, that these relations were imper- 



232 V. I. LENIN 



missible, that they aroused rightful and indignant protest 
and discontent of the oppressed nationalities. There is 
not, and cannot be, another government which would so 
openly admit this position, which would conduct this prop 
aganda, propaganda against chauvinism, propaganda which 
recognises the guilt of old Russia, tsarist Russia, Kerensky 
Russia; a government which would conduct propaganda 
against the forcible incorporation of other nationalities in 
Russia. This is not mere words this is a simple political 
fact, absolutely indisputable and plain for all to see. As long 
as there are no intrigues against us on the part of any 
nationality which would bind these nationalities to the 
imperialists, so long as they do not throw out a bridge in 
order to suppress us, we shall not be deterred by formali 
ties. We shall not forget that we are revolutionaries. 
(Applause.) But there are facts incontrovertibly and indis 
putably showing that the smallest, completely unarmed 
nationality, however weak it may be, in Russia that has 
defeated the Mensheviks and Socialist-Revolutionaries, this 
nationality may and must absolutely rest assured that we 
have nothing but peaceful intentions towards it, that our 
propaganda about the criminality of the old policy of the 
old governments is not weakening, and that we are as firm as 
ever in our desire at all costs, and at the price of enormous 
sacrifices and concessions, to maintain peace with all na 
tionalities that belonged to the former Russian Empire, but 
who did not wish to remain with us. We have proved this. 
No matter how great the curses rained on us from all sides 
we shall prove this. It seems to us that we have given 
excellent proof of this, and we declare to the meeting of 
representatives of workers and peasants of Russia, to the 
many millions of workers and peasants, that we shall pre 
serve peace in the future with all our might; we shall not 
shrink from great sacrifices and concessions in order to 
uphold this peace. 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 233 

There are, however, limits beyond which one cannot go. 
We shall not permit peace treaties to be flouted. We shall 
not permit attempts to interfere in our peaceful work. 
On no account shall we permit this, and we shall rise to a 
man to defend our existence. (Applause.) 

Comrades, what I have just said is perfectly clear and 
comprehensible to you, and you could not expect anything 
else from anyone reporting to you on our policy. You know 
that such, and no other, is our policy. But, unfortunately, 
there are now two worlds: the old world of capitalism that 
is in a state of confusion, but which will never surrender 
voluntarily, and the rising new world, which is still very 
weak, but which will grow, for it is invincible. This old 
world has its old diplomacy, which cannot believe that it is 
possible to speak frankly and straightforwardly. This old 
diplomacy thinks to itself there must be a trap of some 
sort here. (Applause, laughter.) When a representative of 
this economically and militarily all-powerful old world was 
sent to us that was some time ago I have in mind Bul- 
litt, the representative of the United States Government 
who was sent to us with the proposal that we should con 
clude peace with Kolchak and Denikin on terms that were 
most unfavourable to us we said that we hold so dear the 
blood of the workers and peasants, shed for so long in 
Russia, that although the terms were extremely unfavour 
able we were prepared to accept them, because we were 
convinced that the forces of Kolchak and Denikin would 
collapse from within. We said this quite frankly, with 
the minimum of diplomatic subtlety, and so they concluded 
that we must be trying to dupe them. And as soon as Bul- 
litt, who had held these friendly, round-table conversations 
with us, reached home he was met with reproach and 
compelled to resign. I am surprised that he has not yet been 
thrown into gaol, in keeping with the imperialist custom, 
for secretly sympathising with the Bolsheviks. (Laughter, 
applause.) But the upshot was that we, who at that time 



234 V. I. LENIN 



had proposed a peace that was to our disadvantage 
obtained a peace on much more favourable terms That was 
something of a lesson. I know that we can no more learn 
the old diplomacy than we can remould ourselves- but the 
lessons in diplomacy that we have given since then and 
that have been learned by the other powers must have had 
some effect; they must have remained in the memory of 
some people. (Laughter.) Hence, our straightforward state 
ment that our workers and peasants prized above all the 
blessings of peace, but that there were limits to the conces 
sions they were prepared to make to obtain it, was taken to 
mean that they had not for a moment, not for a second, 
forgotten the hardships they had suffered in the imperial 
ist war and civil war. This reminder, which I am sure this 
whole congress, and the whole mass of workers and peas 
ants, all Russia, will endorse and express this reminder 
will surely have some effect and play a certain role, no 
matter how the powers take it, no matter what diplomatic 
ruse they, from old diplomatic habit, may suspect. 

This, comrades, is what I think it necessary to say about 
our international situation. A certain unstable equilibrium 
has been reached. Materially-^economically and militarily 
we are extremely weak; but morally by which, of 
course, I mean not abstract morals, but the alignment of 
the real forces of all classes in all countries we are the 
strongest of all. This has been proved by practice, it has 
been proved not merely by words but by deeds; it has been 
proved once and, if history takes a certain turn, it will, 
perhaps, be proved many times again. That is why we say: 
having started on our work of peaceful construction we 
shall exert all efforts to continue it without interruption. 
At the same time, comrades, be vigilant, safeguard the de 
fence potential of our country, protect our Red Army like 
the apple of your eye, and remember that we have no right 
to permit an instant s slackening where our workers and 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 235 

peasants and their achievements are concerned. (Ap 
plause.) 

Comrades, having thus briefly outlined the most essen 
tial features of our international position, I shall now deal 
with the manner in which economic relations are develop 
ing in our country and in Western Europe, in the capitalist 
countries. The great difficulty here has been the absence of 
definite relations with the capitalist countries, which has 
made it impossible for us to establish stable economic re 
lations. Events show very clearly that it is also impossible 
for the capitalist countries to do so. But today we are not 
in an altruistic mood, and our minds are more taken up 
with the problem of how to continue in existence in spite 
of the hostility of other countries. 

But is the existence of a socialist republic in a capital 
ist environment at all conceivable? It seemed incon 
ceivable from the political and military aspects. That it is 
possible both politically and militarily has now been 
proved; it is a fact. But what about trade? What about eco 
nomic relations? Intercourse, assistance, the exchange 
of services between backward, ruined agricultural Rus 
sia and the advanced, industrially-developed group of cap 
italist countries is that possible? Did they not threaten to 
surround us with a barbed wire fence so as to prevent any 
economic relations with us whatever? "War did not scare 
them, so we will reduce them by means of a blockade." 

Comrades, during the past four years we have heard so 
many threats, and such terrible ones, that none of them 
can frighten us any more. As for the blockade, experience 
has shown that it is an open question as to who suffers 
from it most, the blockaded or the blockaders. Experience 
has shown undoubtedly that for the first year on which I 
am able to report as a period of relative, elementary respite 
from direct brute force, we have not been recognised, we 
have been rejected, relations with us have been declared 
non-existent (let them be recognised as non-existent by the 



236 V. I. LENIN 



bourgeois courts), but they nevertheless exist. I deem it 
my right to report to you what is, without the slightest 
exaggeration, one of the main results achieved in 1921, the 
year under discussion. 

I do not know whether the report of the People s Com 
missariat for Foreign Affairs to the Ninth Congress of So 
viets has been, or will be, distributed to you today. In 
my opinion, the defect in this rep ort is that it is too bulky 
and is difficult to read to the end. But, perhaps, this is my 
own failing, and I have no doubt that the overwhelming 
majority of you, as well as all those who are interested 
in politics, will read it, even if not immediately. Even if 
you do not read it in its entirety, but only glance through 
its pages, you will see that Russia has sprouted, if one 
may so express it, a number of fairly regular and per 
manent commercial relations, representations, treaties, 
etc. True, we are not yet recognised de jure. This is still 
important, because the danger of the unstable equilibrium 
being upset, the danger of new attempts at invasion has, 
as I have said, increased; the relations, however, are a 
fact. 

In 1921 the first year of trade with foreign countries 
we made considerable progress. This was partly due to the 
improvement in our transport system, perhaps the most 
important, or one of the most important bases of our 
economy. It is due also to our imports and exports. Permit 
me to quote very brief figures. All our difficulties, the most 
incredible, the burden, the pivot of our difficulties lie in 
fuel and food, in the peasant economy, in the famine and 
calamities that have afflicted us. We know very well that 
all this is connected with the question of transport. We 
must discuss this, and all comrades "from the localities 
must know and repeat it over and over again to. all their 
comrades in the localities that we must strain every nerve 
to overcome the food and fuel crisis. It is from this that 
our transport system suffers and transport is the material 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 237 

instrument of our intercourse with foreign countries. 

The organisational improvements in our transport sys 
tem during the past year are beyond doubt. In 1921 we 
transported by river much more than in 1920. The average 
run per vessel in 1921 was 1,000 pood-versts as compared 
with 800 pood-versts in 1920. Undoubtedly, we have made 
some progress in organisation. I must say that for the 
first time we are beginning to obtain assistance from 
abroad. We have ordered thousands of locomotives, and 
we have already received the first thirteen from Sweden 
and thirty-seven from Germany. It is a very small begin 
ning, but a beginning, nevertheless. After all, we have 
ordered hundreds of tank cars, about 500 of which arrived 
here in the course of 1921. We are paying a high, an ex 
orbitant price for these things, but still, it shows that we 
are receiving the assistance of the large-scale industry of 
the advanced countries; it shows that the large-scale in 
dustry of the capitalist countries is helping us to restore 
our economy, despite all these countries being governed by 
capitalists who hate us heart and soul. All of these capital 
ists are united by governments which continue to make 
statements in their press about how matters stand with 
the de jure recognition of Soviet Russia, and about whether 
or not the Bolshevik Government is a legitimate govern 
ment. Lengthy research revealed that it is a legitimate gov 
ernment, but it cannot be recognised. I have no right to 
conceal the sad truth that we are not yet recognised, but 
I must tell you that commercial relations are nevertheless 
developing. 

All these capitalist countries are in a position to make 
us pay through the nose, we pay more than the goods 
are worth, but for all that, they are helping our economy. 
Why is this? Why are they acting against their own 
inclinations and in contradiction to what they are con 
stantly asserting in their press and this press is more 



238 V. I. LENIN 



than a match for ours in respect of circulation, and the 
force and venom with which it attacks us. They call us 
criminals, and all the same they help us. It turns out, 
therefore, that economically, they are bound up with us. 
It turns out, as I have already said, that our calculations, 
made on a grand scale, are more correct than theirs. This 
is not because they lack people capable of making correct 
calculations they have far more than we have; it is 
because it is impossible to make proper calculations when 
one is heading for destruction. That is why I would like 
to supplement my remarks with a few figures to show how 
our foreign trade is developing. I shall quote only very 
brief figures that are easy to remember. If we take the 
three years 1918, 1919 and 1920, our total imports 
amounted to a little over 17,000,000 poods; in 1921 they 
amounted to 50,000,000 poods, that is to say, three times 
the amount imported in the three preceding years com 
bined. Our exports in the first three years totalled 
2,500,000 poods; for 1921 alone, they amounted to 
11,500,000 p oods. These figures are infinitesimally, miser 
ably, ridiculously small; any well-informed person will at 
once say that they are indicative of poverty. And that is 
what they do indicate. But for all that, it is a beginning. 
And we, who have experienced attempts to strangle us 
outright, who for years have been hearing threats to the 
effect that all measures will be taken to prevent inter 
course with us as long as we remain what we are, never 
theless see that something has proved more potent than 
these threats. We see that their forecast of economic 
development was wrong and ours was right. We have made 
a start, and we must now devote all our attention, exert 
all our efforts to continue this development without inter 
ruption. 

I shall give you another small illustration of the progress 
we made in 1921. In the first quarter of 1921 imports 
amounted to about 3,000,000 poods, in the second quarter 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 239 

to 8,000,000 poods, in the third quarter to 24,000,000 poods. 
So we are making progress. These figures are infinite- 
simally small, but they show a gradual increase. We see 
how they grew in 1921, which was a year of unprecedented 
difficulties. You know what that calamity, the famine, 
cost us, what incredible difficulties it is still causing in 
agriculture, industry and in our life generally. Neverthe 
less, in spite of the fact that our country has been de 
vastated by war, has suffered tremendous hardship as a 
result of all the wars and of the rule of tsars and capital 
ists, we are now on the road that opens up a prospect of 
improvement, in spite of the unceasing hostility towards 
us. This is the main factor. That is why, when we read 
recently about the Washington Conference,^ when we 
heard the news that the countries hostile to us will be 
obliged to convene a second conference next summer and 
to invite Germany and Russia to discuss the terms of a 
genuine peace, we said: Our terms are clear and definite; 
we have formulated them, we have published them. How 
much hostility shall we encounter? We have no illusions 
about that; but we know that the economic positron of 
those who blockaded us has proved to be vulnerable. There 
is a force that is more potent than the wishes, the will and 
the decisions of any of the governments or classes that 
are hostile to us. That force is general, economic world 
relations, which compel them to establish intercourse with 
us. The farther they proceed along this path the wider and 
more rapid will be the development of what in today s re 
port for 1921 I have been able to indicate to you only by 
some miserable figures. 

I must now pass to our domestic economic situation. 
And here the important question that first needs to be 
dealt with is that of our economic policy. Our main task 
for 1921, the year under review, was to change to the 
New Economic Policy, to take the first steps along this 
path, to learn how to make them, to adjust our legislation 



240 v - I- LENIN 



and administrative apparatus to it. The press has given 
you a mass of facts and information showing how the work 
has developed in this direction. You will not, of course, 
expect me to quote here additional facts or to give 
various figures. It is only necessary to determine what was 
the main thing that united us most of all, that is more vital 
from the point of view of the most important and radical 
question of the whole of our revolution and of all future 
socialist revolutions (if viewed generally on a world scale). 

The most basic, most vital question is that of the atti 
tude of the working class to the peasants; the alliance of 
the working class and the peasants; the ability of the ad 
vanced workers who have passed through a lengthy, dif 
ficult but rewarding school of experience in a large fac 
tory to organise matters so that they succeed in attract 
ing to their side the mass of peasants, who have been 
ground down by capitalism, ground down by the landlords, 
ground down by their old poverty-stricken, paltry econ 
omy; to prove to them that only in alliance with the work 
ers, no matter what the difficulties to be encountered and 
endured on this path, and they are many, and we can 
not close our eyes to this only through this alliance 
can the peasants do away with the age-old oppres 
sion by the landlords and capitalists. Only by strengthening 
the alliance of the workers and peasants can mankind be 
saved from events such as the recent imperialist slaughter, 
from the barbarous contradictions to be seen in the cap 
italist world today, where a miserable handful of the rich 
est powers are being choked by their wealth, while the vast 
population of the globe suffers privations, being unable 
to benefit from the culture and the rich resources that lay 
before them, but cannot be made use of because of insuf 
ficient exchange. 

Unemployment is the chief calamity in the advanced 
countries. There is no way out of this situation other than 
through the firm alliance of the peasants with the working 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 241 

class that has passed through the difficult, but the only 
reliable and important school, the school of factory life, 
factory exploitation, factory solidarity-^there is no other 
solution. We tested this alliance in political and military 
fields during the most difficult years of our republic. In 
1921 for the first (time, we test this alliance in the economic 
field. So far we have handled things very, very badly in the 
economic field, and this must be frankly admitted. We 
must recognise this shortcoming and not gloss it over. We 
must do everything possible to eliminate this shortcoming 
and to understand that the foundation of our New Eco 
nomic Policy lies in this alliance. There are only two 
ways in which proper relations between the working 
class and the peasants can be established. If large-scale 
industry is flourishing, if it can immediately supply the 
small peasants with a sufficient amount of goods, or more 
than previously, and in this way establish proper relations 
between the supply of surplus agricultural goods coming 
from the peasants and manufactured goods, then the peas 
ants will be fully satisfied, then the mass of peasants, the 
non-Party peasants, will acknowledge, by virtue of ex 
perience, that this new system is better than the capitalist 
system. If we are to speak of a flourishing large-scale in 
dustry, which is able to supply all the goods the peasants 
need instantly, this condition is present; if we look at the 
question on a world scale, then a flourishing large-scale 
industry capable of supplying the world with all kinds of 
goods exists, only it is not used for any other purpose 
than the manufacture of guns, shells and other arma 
ments, employed with such success from 1914 to 1918. 
Then industry was geared to war and supplied mankind 
with its products so abundantly that 10 million people 
were killed and no less than 20 million maimed. This is 
something we have all seen, and, moreover, the war in the 
twentieth century is not like previous wars. 

162283 



242 V. I. LENIN 



After this war, even among the victor countries, among 
people most hostile to any kind of socialism, who ruth 
lessly oppose the slightest socialist idea, a large num 
ber have been heard to say quite definitely that even if 
there were no wicked Bolsheviks in the world, it is hardly 
likely that another war of this kind could be permitted. 
This is said by the representatives of the most wealthy 
countries. This is what this rich, advanced, large-scale in 
dustry was used for. It served to maim people, and it had 
no time to supply the peasants with its goods. All the 
same we have a right to say that such an industry exists 
on a world scale. There are countries whose large-scale in 
dustry is so advanced that it could instantly satisfy the 
needs of hundreds of millions of backward peasants. We 
make this the basis of our calculations. From your daily 
observations you know, better than anyone else, what has 
been left of our large-scale industry which in any case was 
weak. In the Donets Basin, for example, which is the main 
centre of our large-scale industry, there was so much de 
struction in the Civil War, and so many imperialist govern 
ments established their rule there (how many of them did 
the Ukraine see!) that the only result could be that practic 
ally nothing remained of our large-scale industry. When, 
added to this, there is the misfortune of the 1921 crop fail 
ure, it becomes clear that the attempt to supply the peasants 
with goods from large-scale industry which had corne under 
state control was unsuccessful. Once this attempt has 
failed, the only economic relation possible between the 
peasants and the workers, that is, between agriculture 
and industry, is exchange, trade. This is the heart of the 
matter. The replacement of requisitioning by the tax in kind 
that, very simply, is the substance of our economic policy. 
When there is no flourishing large-scale industry which 
can be organised in such a way as to supply the peasants 
with goods immediately, then there is no other way for the 
gradual development of a powerful alliance of the workers 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 243 

and peasants than through trade and the gradual advance 
of agriculture and industry above their present level, under 
the guidance and control of the workers state. Sheer 
necessity has driven us to this path. And this is the sole 
basis and substance of our New Economic Policy. 

At a time when the main attention and the main forces 
were diverted to political and military problems, we simply 
had to press forward with great speed along with the van 
guard, knowing that it would have support. The alliance of 
the peasants and workers in the fight for great political 
changes, for our great achievements of the past three 
years which put us at war with the dominant world pow 
ers, was made possible by the mere political and military 
burst because every peasant realised, felt and sensed that 
he was confronted by his age-old enemy, the landlord, who 
in one way or another was being aided by representatives 
of other parties. That is why this alliance was so solid and 
invincible. 

In the economic field, the basis of this alliance has to be 
different. A change in the substance and form of the al 
liance is essential. If anyone from the Communist Party, 
from the trade unions, or merely anyone sympathetic to 
Soviet power has overlooked the necessity of change in the 
form and substance of this alliance, then so much the 
worse for him. Such oversights in a revolution are im 
permissible. The need for a change in the form of the al 
liance is demanded because the political and military al 
liance could not continue intact in the realm of econom 
ics when we have as yet no large-scale industry, when it 
has been ruined by a war never before known by any other 
country. Even in countries infinitely more wealthy than 
ours, in countries that had won, not lost in the war, the 
level of industry has not yet risen. A change in the form 
and substance of the alliance of the workers and peas 
ants has become essential. We went much further for 
ward in the political and military period than the purely 

16* 



244 



V. I. LENIN 



economic aspect of the alliance of the workers and peas 
ants permitted us to do. We had to do this in order to 
defeat the enemy, and we had the right to do this. We 
were successful because we defeated our enemies in the 
field that existed at that time, in the political and military 
field, but we suffered a whole number of defeats in the 
economic field. There is no need to be afraid to admit this; 
on the contrary, we shall only learn how to be victorious 
when we do not fear to acknowledge our defeats and 
shortcomings, when we look truth, even the saddest truth, 
straight in the face. We have a right to be proud of our 
achievements in the first field, in the political and military 
field. They have gone down in history as a world victory, 
whose overall influence is yet to be felt. But economically, 
in the year under review, we only started the New Eco 
nomic Policy and we are making a step forward in this 
regard. At the same time we are only just beginning to 
learn and are making very many more mistakes, looking 
back, being carried away by our past experience splend 
id, lofty, magnificent, of world-wide significance, but 
which could not solve the economic problems now im 
posed on us in the conditions of a country where large- 
scale industry has been devastated; in conditions which 
demand that we learn, in the first place, to establish the 
economic link now necessary and inevitable. This link is 
trade. This is a very unpleasant discovery for Communists. 
It is quite likely that this discovery is extremely unpleas 
ant, in fact it is certain that it is unpleasant, but if we 
are swayed by ideas of pleasantness or unpleasantness, 
we shall fall to the level of those would-be socialists of 
whom we saw plenty at the time of the Kerensky Pro 
visional Government. It is hardly likely that "socialists" 
of this type still have any authority in our republic. 
And our strength has always been our ability to take 
the actual balance of forces into consideration and not 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 245 

to be afraid of it no matter how unpleasant it might be 
for us. 

Since large-scale industry is present on a world scale, 
there can be no doubt that a direct transition to socialism 
is possible and nobody will deny this fact, just as no 
body will deny that this large-scale industry either comes 
to a standstill and creates unemployment among the most 
flourishing and wealthy victors, or only manufactures 
shells for the extermination of people. And if, owing to 
the backwardness with which we came to the revolution, 
we have not reached the industrial development we need, 
are we going to give up, are we going to despair? No. We 
shall get on with the hard work because the path that we 
have taken is the right one. There is no doubt that the 
path of the alliance of the mass of the people is the sole 
path which will ensure that the peasants and workers 
work for themselves and not for the exploiters. In order 
to bring this about in our conditions we must have the 
only possible economic link, the link through the economy. 

That is why we have retreated, that is why we have 
had to retreat to state capitalism, retreat to concessions, 
retreat to trade. Without this, proper relations with the 
peasants cannot be restored in conditions of devastation 
in which we have found ourselves. Without this we are 
threatened with the danger of the revolution s vanguard 
progressing swiftly so far ahead that it would lose touch 
with the peasants. There would be no union between it and 
the peasants and that would mean the ruin of the revolu 
tion. Our approach to this must be particularly careful be 
cause from this follows, first and foremost, what we call 
our New Economic Policy. That is why we have unanimous 
ly declared that we shall carry out this policy in earnest 
and for a long time, but, of course, as has already been 
correctly noted, not for ever. The New Economic Policy re 
sults from our poverty and devastation and the tremen 
dous weakening of our large-scale industry. 



246 V. I. LENIN 



I should now like to quote a few figures in order to 
prove that despite the difficulties and the many mistakes 
we made (and we have made a great number) neverthe 
less we are moving ahead. Comrades, I have not got the 
overall figures on the development of internal trade; I 
only wish to deal with information on the turnover of Cen- 
trosoyuz for three months. For September, Centrosoyuz s 
turnover amounted to 1 million gold rubles, for October 
3 million and for November 6 million. Again, if taken as ab 
solute, the figures are miserable, small; this must be 
frankly recognised, because it will be more harmful to har 
bour any illusions on this score. These are paltry figures, 
but in these conditions of devastation they undoubtedly 
show that there is a movement forward, and that we can 
fasten on to this economic basis. No matter how numerous 
the mistakes that are made by the trade unions, the Com 
munist Party and the administrative bodies, we are becom 
ing convinced that we can rid ourselves of them, and are 
gradually doing so, and that we are taking the path that 
is sure to lead to the restoration of relations between agri 
culture and industry. The growth of the productive forces 
can and must be achieved even on the level of petty-peas 
ant economy and, for the time being, on the basis of small- 
scale industry, since it is so difficult to rehabilitate large- 
scale industry. We must achieve successes, and we are 
beginning to achieve them, but we need to remember that 
a different rate and different conditions of work obtain 
here; that here victory is more difficult. Here we cannot 
achieve our aims as quickly as we were able to in the 
political and military fields. Here we cannot proceed by 
bursts and bounds, and the periods involved are different 
they are counted in decades. These are the periods in which 
we shall have to achieve successes in the economic war, 
in conditions of hostility instead of assistance from our 
neighbours. 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 247 

This path of ours is the right one, for this is the path 
which, sooner or later, all other countries will inevitably 
come to follow. We have begun to follow this correct path. 
What we must do is to judge even the smallest step, take 
into account our slightest mistakes, and then we shall 
reach our goal along this path. 

I ought now, comrades, to say a few words about our 
main preoccupation, agriculture, but I believe that you are 
to hear a far more detailed and fuller report on this ques 
tion than I could make, and also on the famine to be made 
by Comrade Kalinin. 

You are fully aware, comrades, of the incredible hard 
ships of the 1921 famine. It was inevitable that the mis 
fortunes of old Russia should have been carried over to our 
times, because the only solution of this problem is the 
rehabilitation of the productive forces, but not on the old, 
paltry, petty basis, but on a new basis, the basis of large- 
scale industry and electrification. Only in this way shall we 
be rid of our poverty and of endless famines. And it can 
instantly be seen that the periods by which we were able 
to measure our political and military victories, do not ap 
ply here. Surrounded by hostile countries, we have, 
nevertheless, pierced the blockade: no matter how meagre 
the help, we did get something. In all it amounts to 
2,500,000 poods. This is all the help that we have re 
ceived from abroad, that the foreign countries graciously 
presented to starving Russia. We were able to collect 
about 600,000 gold rubles in donations. It is a far too piti 
ful sum, and shows the mercenary attitude of the Euro 
pean bourgeoisie toward our famine. No doubt you have all 
read how, at the news of the famine, influential statesmen 
grandiloquently and solemnly declared that to take ad 
vantage of the famine in order to raise the question of old 
debts would be a devilish thing to do. I am not so sure 
that the devil is worse than modern imperialism. What I 
do know is that in actual fact, despite the famine, they 



248 V. I. LENIN 



did try to recover their old debts on particularly severe 
conditions. We do not refuse to pay, and solemnly declare 
that we are prepared to discuss things in a business-like 
fashion. But you all understand, and there can be no doubt 
about this, that we shall never under any circumstances 
allow ourselves to be tied hand and foot in this matter 
without considering all its aspects, without taking into ac 
count reciprocal claims, without a business-like discussion. 

I have to inform you that during recent days we have 
had considerable success in the struggle against the fam 
ine. You have no doubt read in the newspapers that Amer 
ica has allocated 20 million dollars for the relief of the 
starving in Russia, probably on the same conditions as 
A.R.A. the American famine relief organisation. Krassin 
sent us a telegram a few days ago saying that the Amer 
ican Government is formally proposing to guarantee the 
dispatch to us over a period of three months of foodstuffs 
and seeds worth 20 million dollars, provided we, on our 
part, can agree to the expenditure of 10 million dollars 
(20 million gold rubles) for the same purpose. We imme 
diately agreed to this and have telegraphed accordingly. 
And I think we may say that, during the first three months, 
we shall be able to supply the starving with seeds and food 
worth 30 million dollars, that is, 60 million gold rubles. 
This is, of course, very little; it is by no means sufficient 
for the terrible misfortune that has struck us. You all 
understand this perfectly well. But at any rate this is aid 
which will undoubtedly help to relieve our desperate need 
and desperate famine. And if in the autumn we were able 
to achieve certain successes in providing the starving areas 
with seeds, in extending the sown areas in general, then 
we now have hopes for far greater success in the spring. 

In the autumn, approximately 75 per cent of winter 
crops were sown in the famine gubernias, 102 per cent in 
the gubernias partially hit by the crop failure, in the pro 
ducing gubernias 123 per cent, and 126 per cent in the con- 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 249 

sumlng gubernias. This, at any rate, proves that no matter 
how fantastically difficult our conditions were, neverthe 
less, we were able to give the peasants some help in ex 
tending the sown area and in the fight against the famine. 
Under present conditions we have every right to expect, 
without any exaggeration or fear of error, that we shall 
be able to give substantial aid to the peasants in seeds 
for the spring crop area. This aid, I repeat, will by no 
means be adequate. Under no circumstances shall we have 
enough for all our needs. This must be stated quite frank 
ly. All the more reason, therefore, to do everything pos 
sible to extend this aid. 

In this connection here are the final figures concerning 
our work to solve the food problem. Generally speaking, 
the tax in kind made things much easier for the peasants as 
a whole. This needs no proof. It is not simply a question 
of how much grain has been taken from the peasants, but 
that the peasant feels better provided for under the tax 
in kind, and his incentive to produce has increased. With 
increased productive forces the tax in kind has opened up 
wider horizons for an industrious peasant. Generally speak 
ing, the results of the collection of the tax in kind for the 
year under review are such that we have to say: we must 
strain all efforts to avert failure. 

Here are the general, most concise results that I can 
give you based on the latest information supplied by the 
People s Commissariat for Food. We need at least 230 mil 
lion poods. Of these, 12 million are needed for the starv 
ing, 37 million for seed, and 15 million for the reserve 
fund. We can obtain 109 million through the tax in kind, 
15 million from the milling tax, 12 V 2 million from the 
repayment of the seed loan, 13V2 million from trade, 
27 million from the Ukraine and 38 million poods from 
abroad 38 million, reckoning the 30 million from the 
source I have already mentioned to you, and in ad 
dition the 8 million poods we shall buy. This makes 



250 V. I. LENIN 



a total of 215 million poods. So we still have a deficit, 
with not a single pood in reserve, nor is it certain 
that we shall be able to buy more from abroad. Our food 
plan has been calculated to the narrowest margin so that 
the least possible burden falls on the peasants who have 
been victims of the famine. If in 1920 we estimated that 
the state maintained 38 million people, now we have re 
duced this figure to 8 million. This can lead to only one 
conclusion: there must be 100 per cent collection of the 
tax in kind, i.e., it must at all costs be collected in full. For 
the peasants that have suffered so much, this represents 
a great burden and we do not forget this. I am perfectly 
well aware that the comrades in the localities who have 
themselves experienced all the difficulties of solving the 
food campaign problem, know better than I do what it 
means to collect the tax in kind in full just at this moment. 
But, as a result of our work during 1921, I must say on 
behalf of the government that this task, comrades, has to 
be carried out; this difficulty will have to be faced, this 
problem will have to be overcome. Otherwise we cannot 
meet the most basic, most elementary requirements of 
our transport and industry, we cannot ensure the very 
minimum, absolutely essential budget without which we 
cannot exist in our present condition of hostile encir 
clement and the highly unstable international balance of 
forces. 

Without the most tremendous efforts, there is and can 
be no way out of the situation in which we find ourselves 
after being tortured by the imperialist and civil wars and 
after being persecuted by the ruling classes of all coun 
tries. Therefore, not shunning the bitter truth, we must 
state quite definitely, and bring this home to the work 
ers in the localities on behalf of the Congress: "Com 
rades, the entire existence of the Soviet Republic and 
our very modest plan for rehabilitating transport and in 
dustry are based on the assumption that we shall fulfil our 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 251 

general food procurement programme. It is vitally neces 
sary, therefore, to collect the tax in kind in full." 

Speaking of the plan I shall now deal with the present 
position of the state plan. I shall begin with fuel, which 
is the staple of industry and the basis of all our industrial 
work. Probably you have already received today, or will do 
so in a few days, a report on the work of our Gosplan, the 
State Planning Commission. You will receive a report on 
the Congress of Electrical Engineers which made a valu 
able contribution of most important material and an 
examination by Russia s best technical and scientific per 
sonnel of the plan that provides the only scientifically 
calculated short-cut to the rehabilitation of our large-scale 
industry, a plan that will take at least ten to fifteen years 
to fulfil. I have already said, and I shall not tire of re 
peating, that the periods we have to reckon with in our 
practical work today are different from those that we saw 
in the political and military sphere. Very many leading 
workers of the Communist Party and trade unions have 
understood this, but it is vital that everyone should do so. 
Incidentally, in Comrade Krzhizhanovsky s pamphlet the 
report on the work of the Gosplan which will be dis 
tributed to you tomorrow, you will see how the technical 
experts and agronomists together regard the question of 
the state plan in general. You will see that their approach 
is not our usual one of viewing things from a general po 
litical or economic point of view, but of regarding matters 
in the light of their joint experience as technical experts 
and agronomists and, incidentally, showing the limit to 
our retreat. In this pamphlet you will find an answer to 
this question from the point of view of the technical ex 
perts and agronomists; its contents are all the more valu 
able because you will find there how our general state 
planning organisation tackles the question of transport and 
industry as a result of its work during the year under re 
view. Naturally, I cannot deal with this report here. 



252 V. I. LENIN 



I should like to dwell only briefly on the state of the 
fuel plan, as in this instance, at the beginning of the 1921 
review year, we suffered the most grave setback. It was 
precisely here, basing ourselves on the improved situation 
at the end of 1920, that we made the great error which led 
to the colossal crisis in transport in the spring of 1921, 
a crisis caused not only by a shortage of material re 
sources, but by a miscalculation of the rate of dev 
elopment. The mistake of transferring our experience 
gained during the political and war periods to economic 
problems was already apparent then; it was an important, 
a fundamental mistake which, comrades, we still repeat at 
every step. Many mistakes are being made just now, 
and it must be said that if we do not thoroughly real 
ise and rectify them, no matter how difficult it may be 
to do this, there can be no stable economic improve 
ment. After the lesson we have had we are working out the 
fuel plan for the second half of 1921 with far greater care, 
regarding as impermissible the slightest exaggeration, and 
doing all we can to prevent it. The figures by the end of 
December, although still incomplete, given me by Comrade 
Smilga, who is in charge of all our fuel collection institu 
tions, show that there is a deficit, but it is insignificant 
and indicates an improvement in the internal structure 
of our fuel budget, or its mineralisation, as the tech 
nical experts put it, that is, considerable success in sup 
plying Russia with mineral fuel; after all a firm foundation 
for large-scale industry capable of serving as the basis 
for socialist society can only be built on mineral fuel. 

This is how our fuel plan was calculated at the beginning 
of the second half of 1921. Converting firewood, 2,700,000 
cubic sagene, into a conventional 7,000 calorific fuel, as 
we have always done, and as has been done on page 40 of 
Krzhizhanovsky s pamphlet, which will be destributed to 
you, we hope to obtain 297 million poods. The figures 
show that at the moment we have received nearly 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 253 

234 million poods. This is an enormous deficiency 
to which I must draw your attention. During the year 
under review we have paid very careful attention to 
the work of our fuel institutions in the matter of firewood. 
It is precisely this work, however, that is mainly connected 
with the state of the peasant economy. It is precisely the 
peasant and his horse that bear the burden. Insufficient fuel 
and fodder, etc., greatly affect their work. That is why there 
is a shortage. That is why now, when we stand on the thresh 
old of the winter fuel campaign, I must say once again: Com 
rades, you must take to the localities the slogan that the 
greatest concentration of effort is needed in this field of 
work. Our fuel budget has been based on the absolute 
minimum required to raise the level of industrial produc 
tion, but it is vitally necessary that this absolute minimum 
be achieved, no matter how difficult the conditions. 

Further. We estimated that we would receive 143 mil 
lion poods of coal; we received 184 million poods. This is 
progress, the progress of the mineralisation of our fuel, 
the progress of the Donets Basin and other enterprises, 
where a whole number of comrades have worked selflessly 
and achieved practical results in improving large-scale 
industry. I shall give you a couple of figures concerning 
the Donets Basin, because this is the basis, the main centre 
of all our industry. Oil, we reckoned on receiving 80 mil 
lion, which if converted into conventional fuel would be 
120 million. Peat, we calculated at 40 million (19 million 
conventional fuel) and we received 50. So we had reckoned 
on receiving 579 million poods, but apparently we shall 
succeed in getting no more than 562 million poods. In 
general, there is a fuel shortage. True, it is not such a 
great shortage, possibly 3-4 per cent, but nevertheless it 
is a shortage. In any case, it has to be admitted that all 
this constitutes a direct threat to large-scale industry as 
some part of the minimum requirements will not be met. 
I think I have proved to you by this example, firstly, that 



254 v. i. LENIN 



our planning bodies have not wasted their time, and that 
our plans will begin to be carried out very shortly, and at 
the same time that we are beginning to make just a 
little progress, and that in this respect the hardship 
and difficulty of our economic situation is still extreme 
ly great. Therefore the main slogan, the main battle- 
cry, the main appeal with which this Congress must pro 
ceed in its work and with which it must conclude its work, 
which the delegates must carry to the localities is: an 
all-out effort is still needed, no matter how difficult this 
may be, both in the industrial and in the agricultural 
field. An all-out effort is the only hope for the republic, 
the only way in which workers and peasants power can 
be maintained, preserved and stabilised. That we achieved 
no mean successes has been particularly shown, for in 
stance, in the Donets Basin, where such comrades as Pya- 
takov in large-scale industry, and Rukhimovich in small- 
scale industry, worked with great devotion and great suc 
cess, and for the first time the small-scale industry was in 
a position to produce something. In large-scale industry 
output per coal-hewer reached the pre-war level, which 
had not been the case earlier. The total output of the 
Donets Basin for 1920 was 272 million poods, and in 1921 
it is estimated at 350 million poods. This is a very, very 
small figure compared to the maximum figure of pre-war 
times 1,700 million. But still this is something. It proves 
that there is an important advance. It is, after all, a step 
forward in the rehabilitation of large-scale industry, and 
we should not grudge any sacrifice to this end. 

Now a couple of words about metallurgy. Here our sit 
uation is particularly difficult. We are producing possibly 
something like 6 per cent of pre-war production. That is 
the extent of the havoc and poverty to which the imperial 
ist and civil wars have reduced Russia. But we are, of 
course, progressing. We are building centres like Yugostal, 
where Comrade Mezhlauk is also working with the utmost 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 255 

devotion. Although our position is exceedingly difficult 
we can see here tremendous successes. In the first half of 
1921, 70,000 poods of pig-iron were smelted monthly; in 
October, 130,000; in November, 270,000, that is, almost 
four times as much. We can see that there are no grounds 
for panic. We by no means close our eyes to the fact that 
the figures I have given represent a miserable, paltry level, 
but all the same they prove that no matter how exception 
ally grave things were in 1921, no matter what extra 
ordinary burdens fell on the working class and peasants, 
all the same we are progressing, we are on the right path, 
and by straining every nerve we can hope that there will 
be even greater improvement. 

I should also like to give some figures on our progress 
in electrification. Unfortunately, so far, we have not been 
very successful. I have thought that I would be able to 
congratulate the Ninth Congress on the opening of the 
second big electric power station built by the Soviet gov 
ernment; the first was Shatura, and the second the Kashira 
station, which we had hoped to open in December.^ It 
would have produced, and can produce, 6,000 kw at first, 
which, with the 18,000 kw we have in Moscow, would have 
been a substantial help. But a number of obstacles pre 
vented us from opening the station in December 1921; it 
will be opened very soon, in not more than a few weeks. 
You have probably seen the report published in Ekonomi- 
cheskaya Zhizn^ a few days ago and signed by engineer 
Levi, one of the most important participants at the Eighth 
All-Russian Electrical Engineering Congress, who is, in gen 
eral, one of our most important workers. I shall give you a 
few figures from this report. Taking 1918 and 1919 together, 
51 stations with a 3,500 kw capacity were opened. If we 
take 1920 and 1921 together, 221 stations with a 12,000 kw 
capacity were opened. When these figures are compared 
with Western Europe they of course seem extremely small 
and paltry. But they show how progress can be made even 



256 V. I. LENIN 



in difficult conditions unprecedented in any country. A by 
no means unimportant role was played by the distribution 
of small power stations throughout the countryside. It 
must be frankly admitted that very often they were scat 
tered. But there was some good in it, too. Thanks to 
these small stations new centres of modern large-scale 
industry were set up in the countryside. Although they 
may be of trifling significance they do show the peas 
ants that Russia will not remain a country of manual la 
bour, or of the primitive wooden plough, but will go 
forward to different times. And the mass of the peas 
ants is gradually coming to understand that we must and 
can shift Russia to a different basis. The periods involved, 
as I have already pointed out, are measured in decades, 
but the work has already commenced, and the realisation 
of this is spreading among the mass of the peasants, part 
ly just because the small stations grow faster than the 
larger ones. But if in 1921 there was a delay in the open 
ing of one large electric power station, at the beginning 
of 1922 there will be two stations: the Kashira outside Mos 
cow and the Utkina Zavod near Petrograd. 53 In this re 
spect, at any rate, we have taken the path that ensures 
our progress, provided we approach the fulfilment of our 
tasks with our former zeal. 

A couple of words about our other success connected 
with peat. The 1920 peat yield reached 93 million poods, 
in 1921, it was 139 million poods, possibly the only sphere 
in which we have far surpassed the pre-war level. Our re 
sources of peat are inexhaustible, greater than those of 
any other country. But there have always been gigantic 
difficulties, and to some extent they still remain, in the 
sense that this work, which is arduous in general, was 
especially arduous in Russia. The hydraulic method of peat- 
cutting recommended by Comrades Radchenko, Menshi- 
kov and Morozov, of the Central Peat Board, has made the 
work easier. There have been great achievements in this 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 257 

field. In 1921 there were only two peat pumps working 
machines for the hydraulic extraction of peat, which re 
lieve the workers of the back-breaking toil still involved 
in peat-cutting. Twenty of these machines have been 
ordered from Germany and will be received in 1922. Co 
operation with an advanced European country has begun. 
We cannot ignore the possibilities for the development of 
peat-cutting which now open out before us. There is a 
greater abundance of bogs and peat reserves in Russia 
than anywhere else, and it is now possible to transform 
the back-breaking labour which only a few workers were 
prepared to undertake, into more normal work. Practical 
co-operation with a modern, advanced state, Germany, has 
been achieved because her factories are already work 
ing on machines designed to lighten this labour, machines 
which will most certainly start to operate in 1922. We must 
take this fact into account. We can do a great deal in this 
sphere if we all understand and all spread the idea that, 
given intensified efforts and mechanised labour, we in 
Russia have better opportunity than any other country to 
emerge from the economic crisis. 

I want to emphasise another aspect of our economic pol 
icy. In assessing our New Economic Policy it is not enough 
to pay attention to what may be of particular importance. 
Of course, the essence of our New Economic Policy is the 
alliance of the proletariat and the peasants, its essence is 
the union of the vanguard of the proletariat with the broad 
mass of the peasants. Thanks to the New Economic Policy 

the development of the productive forces has begun at 

all costs, and without delay. Gaining knowledge is an 
other aspect of the New Economic Policy. The New Eco 
nomic Policy is a form that will enable us to gain 
knowledge of how to manage our economy in real earn 
est; up to now we have worked extraordinarily badly 
in this respect. Of course, it is difficult for a Communist 
leader, for a trade union leader of the working people 

172283 



258 



V. I. LENIN 



to realise that for us at the moment trade is the touch 
stone of our economic life, the only possible basis for 
union of the vanguard of the proletariat with the peas 
ants, the only possible link which will permit us to begin 
economic development in a united front. If we take any 
merchant trading under state and legal control (our court 
is a proletarian one, and it can watch each private busi 
nessman in order to see that the laws are not interpreted 
for them as in bourgeois states; recently there was an ex 
ample of this in Moscow, 54 and you all know that we shall 
multiply these examples, severely punishing any attempts 
of these private businessmen to violate our laws), we 
shall see that all the same, this merchant, this private 
businessman, eager for his 100 per cent profit, will do busi 
ness for example, he will acquire raw material for in 
dustry, in a way that Communists or trade union workers 
would never be able to do. That is the significance of the 
New Economic Policy. There is your lesson. It is a very 
serious one, and we must all learn it. It is an extremely 
harsh school. It is not like listening to lectures or passing 
examinations. It is a difficult problem, a stern economic 
struggle, in circumstances of poverty, in circumstances of 
unparalleled difficulties, shortage of bread, famine and 
cold; this is the real school we must pass through. Every 
attempt to brush this task aside, every attempt to turn 
a blind eye to it, to stand aside, will be the most criminal 
and most dangerous presumption on the part of Commu 
nists and trade unionists. All of us, comrades, who are 
ruling Soviet Russia, are apt to sin in this way, and we 
must admit this quite frankly in order to rid ourselves of 
this shortcoming. 

We are undertaking our economic construction on the 
basis of yesterday s experience, and it is here that we make 
our main mistake. I shall quote you a French proverb 
which says that people s shortcomings are usually tied up 
with their merits. A man s shortcomings are, as it were, 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 259 

an extension of his merits. But if the merits persist longer 
than they are needed, are displayed when and where they 
are no longer needed, they become shortcomings. Very 
likely almost all of you have observed this in private and 
public life, and we now note in the whole development of 
our revolution, of our Party and our traide unions, which 
are the mainstay of our Party, in the entire government 
machinery ruling Russia, we see this shortcoming, which, 
as it were, is the extension of our merits. Our great merit 
was that in the political and military field we took a step 
of historic importance, that has gone down in world his 
tory as the turning-point of two epochs. Whatever suffer 
ings lie ahead this cannot be taken away from us. Thanks 
only to the proletarian revolution, thanks only to the fact 
that the Soviet system replaced the old system, we emerged 
from the imperialist war and our misfortunes. This can 
not be taken away from us this is the undoubted, un 
alterable, inalienable merit, which no efforts or onslaughts 
of our enemies can take away from us, but which if it per 
sists where it is no longer needed, becomes the most dan 
gerous shortcoming. 

The enthusiastic upsurge of the workers and peasants 
at their present level of class-consciousness was sufficient 
to solve political and military problems. They all understood 
that the imperialist war was strangling them. There was 
no need for a higher level of consciousness, for a new level 
of organisation in order to understand this. Enthusiasm, 
drive, heroism, which have remained and will remain for 
ever as a monument of what a revolution does and what it 
can do, helped to solve these problems. That is how we 
achieved our political and military successes, and this 
merit now becomes our most dangerous shortcoming. We 
look back and think that economic problems can be solved 
in the same manner. But there is the mistake; when the sit 
uation has changed and different problems have to be 
solved, we cannot look back and attempt to solve them by 



260 v - L LENIN 



yesterday s methods. Don t try you won t succeed! We 
must realise this mistaken attitude. There are Communist 
Party and trade union workers who very often turn their 
backs on and wave aside the humble, difficult work of many 
years in economic management, which demands forbear 
ance, bitter experiences, long effort, punctuality and persev 
erance, whether as government workers, or as yesterday s 
fighters, and excuse themselves with recollections of the 
great things they did yesterday these people remind me 
of the fable of the geese who boasted that they had "saved 
Rome", but to whom the peasant replied using a long 
switch, "Leave your ancestors in peace, and what good have 
you done, geese?" No one will deny that in 1917-18-1 9-20 we 
solved our political and military problems with the heroism 
and success that opened a new epoch in world history. 
This belongs to us, and there is no one, either in the Party 
or in the trade unions, who is attempting to take this away 
from us but an entirely different task now faces gov 
ernment and trade union workers. 

At the present moment you are surrounded by capital 
ist powers who will not help you, but will hamper you; at 
the present moment you work in conditions of poverty, 
ruin, famine and calamity. You must either learn to work 
at a different rate, calculating the work to be done in de 
cades and not months, making use of the worn-out mass 
of the people who cannot keep pace with the revolution 
ary-heroic momentum in their daily work; either you learn 
to do this, or you will deserve to be called geese. When a 
trade union or a political worker makes the general state 
ment: we, the trade unions, the Communist Party, run things 
that is good. In the political and military sphere we did 
this splendidly, but in the economic field we do it very 
badly. We must realise this and do better. "Stop wagging 
your tongue" is what I will say to any trade union worker 
who puts the general question whether the trade unions 
should take part in production. (Applause.) Far better reply 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 261 

to the question in a practical way and tell me (if you hold a 
responsible position, are a man in authority, a Communist 
Party or a trade union worker) where you have organ 
ised production well, how many years it took you to 
organise it, how many people are under you a thousand 
or ten thousand. Give me a list of those whom you have 
assigned to the work of economic management, which you 
have completed, instead of starting twenty different jobs 
without completing a single one because you had no time." 
It happens that we in Soviet Russia lack the habit of com 
pleting economic tasks, so as to be able to boast of success a 
few years later, and not to be afraid to learn from the mer 
chant who will make one hundred per cent profit and a bit 
more; instead we write a wonderful resolution about raw 
materials and say that we are representatives of the Com 
munist Party, the trade union, the proletariat. Forgive me, 
but what is the proletariat? It is the class which is work 
ing in large-scale industry. Where is your large-scale in 
dustry? What kind of proletariat is it? Where is your in 
dustry? Why is it at a standstill? Because there is no raw 
material? But did you succeed in collecting it? No. Write 
a resolution that it should be collected, and you will find 
yourself in a mess. And people will say, how stupid, and 
so you resemble the geese whose ancestors saved Rome. 

History has given us the task of completing the great 
political revolution by slow, hard and laborious economic 
work, covering a very long period of time. Great political 
changes in history have always demanded a long period of 
assimilation. All great political changes have come about 
through the enthusiasm of the vanguard, whom the people 
followed spontaneously, not quite consciously. This devel 
opment could not be otherwise in a society that was op 
pressed by tsars, landlords and capitalists. And we ful 
filled this part of the work, i.e., the political revolution, in a 
manner that makes its world-historical significance indis 
putable. Subsequently, following the great political revolu- 



262 V. I. LENIN 



tion, however, another task arises which must be under 
stood: this revolution has to be assimilated, has to be put 
into effect, and we must not plead that the Soviet system 
is bad, and that it must be rebuilt. We have a tre 
mendous number of enthusiasts who want to rebuild in 
any kind of way, and these reconstructions lead to calam 
ities of a kind which I have never known in all my life. I 
am very well aware of the shortcomings of our government 
machinery so far as mass organisational work is concerned, 
and for every ten shortcomings that any of you can point 
out to me, I can immediately cite you a hundred more. The 
point, however, is not that it should be improved by rapid 
reorganisation, but that this political transformation has 
to be assimilated to arrive at a different level of economic 
efficiency. That is the whole point. It is not necessary to 
rebuild, but, on the contrary, it is necessary to help 
correct the many shortcomings present in the Soviet 
system and in the whole system of management, so as to 
help tens of millions of people. We need the aid of all the 
peasants to assimilate our great political victory. We need 
to look at things soberly and realise that victory hias been 
won, but it has not yet become part of the economy of 
everyday life and the living conditions of the people. This 
work will take many decades and will require colossal 
efforts. It cannot be carried out at the same rate, speed, 
and under the same conditions which existed during the 
war. 

Before concluding I want to apply this lesson that 
shortcomings are sometimes the extension of our merits 
to one of our institutions, namely, to the Cheka. You all 
know, comrades, the violent hatred towards this institu 
tion on the part of the Russian emigrants and those nu 
merous representatives of the ruling classes of the impe 
rialist countries, who live alongside these Russian emi 
grants. And no wonder! It was our effective weapon 
against the numerous plots and numerous attacks on Soviet 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 263 

power made by people who were infinitely stronger than 
we. The capitalists and landlords retained all their interna- 
national ties and all the support; they were supported by 
states incomparably more powerful than our state. You 
know from the history of these conspiracies how these peo 
ple acted. You know that the only way in which we could 
reply to these people was by repression, merciless, swift and 
instant with the support land sympathy of the workers and 
peasants. That is the merit of our Cheka. We shall always 
emphasise this whenever we hear, directly or indirectly, as 
we often do from abroad, the howls of those Russians, 
who can say the word "Cheka" in all languages, and re 
gard it as an example of Russian barbarism. 

Gentlemen, Russian and foreign capitalists! We know 
that you will never come to love this institution. No 
wonder! It was able to repulse your intrigues and plots 
better than anyone else, at a time when you throttled us, 
invaded us from all sides, when you organised internal 
plots and committed every possible crime in order to frus 
trate our peaceful work. Our only response is through an 
institution aware of the plotters every move and able to 
mete out immediate retaliation instead of engaging in per 
suasion. As long as there are exploiters in the world who 
have no desire to hand over their landlord and capitalist 
rights to the workers on a plate, the power of the work 
ing people cannot survive without such an institution. We 
are keenly aware of this, but we also know that a man s 
merits may become his shortcomings, and we know that 
prevailing conditions insistently demand that the work of 
this organisation be limited to the purely political sphere, 
that it concentrate its efforts on tasks in which it is aided by 
the situation and the circumstances. If the attempts of the 
counter-revolution resemble their previous attempts and 
we have no proof that the mentality of our adversaries 
has altered in this respect, we have no grounds for believing 
this we shall be able to reply in such a way that will 



264 V. I. LENIN 



make it clear that we are in earnest. The Soviet government 
grants admission to foreign representatives who come here 
under the pretext of giving aid, but they turn round and 
help overthrow Soviet power; there have been examples 
of this. Our government will not find itself in this 
position, thanks to the fact that we shall value and make 
use of an institution like the Cheka. This we can guar 
antee to one and all. But at the same time we categorically 
state that it is essential to reform the Cheka, define its 
function and powers, and limit its work to political prob 
lems. The task now confronting us is the development of 
commerce, which is required by the New Economic Policy, 
and this demands greater revolutionary legality. Naturally, 
if we had made this the all-important task when we were 
attacked and Soviet power was taken by the throat, we 
would have been pedants; we would have been playing 
at revolution, but would not be making the revolution. The 
closer we approach conditions of unshakable and lasting 
power, the further commerce develops, the more imper 
ative it is to put forward the firm slogan of greater revolu 
tionary legality, the narrower becomes the sphere of activ 
ity of the institution which matches the plotters blow for 
blow. This conclusion results from the experience, observa 
tion and reflection of the government for the past year. 

In conclusion, I must say, comrades, that we have placed 
on a correct footing the problem which we are solving 
this year and which up to now we have solved so badly 
to bring the workers and peasants into a sound economic 
alliance, even in conditions of extreme poverty and dev 
astation; we have taken the correct line, and there can 
be no doubt about this. And this is not only a Russian 
task, but a world task. 

This task which we are solving now, for the time being 
on our own, seems to be a purely Russian task, but in 
reality it is a task which all socialists will face. Capitalism 
is dying and in its death throes it can still condemn tens 



HOME AND FOREIGN POLICY OF THE REPUBLIC 265 

and hundreds of millions of people to unparalleled torment, 
but there is no power that can prevent its downfall. The 
new society, which will be based on the alliance of the 
workers and peasants, is Inevitable. Sooner or later it will 
come twenty years earlier or twenty years later, and 
when we labour on the solution of our New Economic Pol 
icy, we are helping to work out for this society the forms 
of alliance between the workers and peasants. We shall 
solve this problem and we shall create an alliance of the 
workers and peasants that is so sound that no power on 
earth will break it. (Stormy, prolonged applause.) 

Pravda No. 292, Vol. 33, pp. 117-52 

December 25, 1921 



DRAFT DECISION 

OF THE ALL-RUSSIAN CENTRAL EXECUTIVE 

COMMITTEE ON THE REPORT OF THE DELEGATION 

TO THE GENOA CONFERENCE^ 

The All-Russian Central Executive Committee s draft res 
olution on Joffe s report should be compiled approximately 
as follows: 

1. The delegation of the All-Russian Central Executive 
Committee has carried out its work correctly in taking 
its stand on the full sovereignty of the R.S.F.S.R. oppos 
ing attempts to impose bondage on the country and re 
store private property and in concluding a treaty with 
Germany. 

2. The international political and economic situation 
bears the following features: 

Political the absence of peace and the danger of fresh 
imperialist wars [Ireland; India; China and others; sharpen 
ing of relations between Britain and France, between Japan 
and the United States, etc., etc. (in greater detail)]. 

3. Economic the "victor" countries, exceedingly power 
ful and enriched by the wiar (=by plunder), have not been 
able to re-establish even the former capitalist relations 
three and a half years after the war [currency chaos; non- 
fulfilment of the Treaty of Versailles and the impossibility 



DRAFT DECISION ON THE REPORT OF THE GENOA DELEGATION 267 

of its fulfilment; non-payment of debts to the United 
States, etc., etc. (in greater detail)]. 

4. Therefore, Article One of the Cannes resolutions, by 
recognising the equality of the two property systems (cap 
italist or private property, and communist property, so 
far accepted only in the R.S.F.S.R.), is thus compelled to 
recognise, even if only indirectly, the collapse, the bank 
ruptcy of the first property system and the inevitability 
of an agreement between that system and the second, on 
terms of parity. 

5. The other articles of the Cannes conditions, as well 
as the memoranda, etc., of the powers at Genoa, are in 
contradiction to this and are, therefore, still-born. 

6. True equality of the two property systems if only 
as a temporary state, until such times as the entire world 
abandons private property and the economic chaos and 
wars engendered by it for the higher property system- 
is found only in the Treaty of Rapallo. 56 

The All-Russian Central Executive Committee, there 
fore: 

welcomes the Treaty of Rapallo as the only correct way 
out of the difficulties, chaos and danger of wars (as long 
as there remain two property systems, one of them as 
obsolete as capitalist property); 

recognises only this type of treaty as normal for the 
relations of the R.S.F.S.R. with capitalist countries; 

instructs the Council of People s Commissars and the 
People s Commissariat for Foreign Affairs to pursue a 
policy that is in this spirit; 

instructs the Presidium of the All-Russian Central 
Executive Committee to confirm this agreement with 
all republics that are in federal relations with the 
R.S.F.S.R.; 



268 V. I. LENIN 



instructs the People s Commissariat for Foreign Affairs 
and the Council of People s Commissars to permit devia 
tions from this, i.e., from the Rapallo Treaty, only in ex 
ceptional circumstances that gain very special advantages 
for the working people of the R.S.F.S.R., etc. 

Written May 15 or 16, 1922 Vol. 33, pp. 319-20 

First published in the 4th 

Russian edition of 

V. I. Lenin s Collected Works 



INTERVIEW GIVEN TO MICHAEL FARBMAN, 

OBSERVER AND MANCHESTER GUARDIAN 

CORRESPONDENT 

1. Question. The anti-Russian press describes Herriot s reception 
in Moscow and the Franco-Russian negotiations as a definite change 
in Soviet Russia s foreign policy. 

Is that true? Is it true that Russia regards British Near East 
policy as a challenge and is ready to conclude an agreement with 
France directed against Britain? 

Answer. I consider it absolutely incorrect to describe 
Herriot s reception in Moscow and the Franco-Russian 
negotiations as a change, even a slight one, in Soviet Rus 
sia s policy in general, or as being anti-British in partic 
ular. We undoubtedly value very highly both Herriot s re 
ception in Moscow and the step taken towards a rapproche 
ment with France or towards negotiations with her, which 
have now become possible, probable and, I should like to 
believe, essential. Any rapprochement with France is some 
thing we very much desire, especially in view of the fact 
that Russia s commercial interests imperatively demand 
closer relations with this strong Continental power. But 
we are convinced that this rapprochement does not in the 
least imply that some change must necessarily take place 
in our policy towards Britain. We believe fully friendly re 
lations with both powers to be quite possible, and that is 
our aim. We believe that the development of commercial 
relations will inevitably go a very long way towards the 



270 V. I. LENIN 



achievement of this aim. We believe that the interests of 
Britain and France, rightly understood, will likewise oper 
ate in that direction. We believe that the mutual interests 
of both Britain and France, insofar as they have points of 
contact with Russia, do not under any circumstances con 
tain elements of inevitable hostility between Britain and 
France. On the contrary, we even think that peaceful and 
friendly relations between these powers and Russia con 
tain a guarantee (I am almost prepared to say the strong 
est guarantee) that peace and friendship between Britain 
and France will last a long time, and that all possible, and 
under present circumstances probable, differences between 
France and Britain will most speedily and truly find a 
happy solution. 

2. Question. Is not the virtual termination of the Graeco-Turkish 
War, a war supported by Britain, an opportune moment for the 
conclusion of an Anglo-Russian agreement? 

Answer. Of course, the termination of the Graeco-Turk 
ish War, which had Britain s support, is a factor that, to 
a certain extent, improves the chances of an Anglo-Rus 
sian agreement being concluded. We strove for such an 
agreement even before that war ended and shall now con 
tinue to Strive for it with the utmost energy. True, some 
of the problems connected with the termination of that 
war are objects of our disagreement with Britain. But, 
first of all, the peac e which has followed the Graeco-Turk 
ish War is in our opinion such an advantage to internation 
al politics in general that we hope for an improvement 
in the general conditions under which they are conducted, 
thanks to the Graeco-Turkish peace. Secondly, we do not 
consider the differences between Britain and ourselves to 
be in any way insurmountable. On the contrary, we ex 
pect that, with the Near East problem entering various 
stages, the near future will show us to what extent we are 
right in hoping that the end of the Graeco-Turkish War 



INTERVIEW TO OBSERVER AND MANCHESTER GUARDIAN 271 

will also be the end of the conflicts and differences which 
placed that war in the forefront of international politics. 
We are doing everything in our power to make the end of 
that war also the end of all friction and disagreement with 
Britain, and we hope that the interests of the British Gov 
ernment will rise on this occasion, too, above any prompt 
ings and the frequently insincere utterances of the anti- 
Russian press. 

3. Question. Do you consider Russia s participation in the Eastern 
question a matter of prestige alone, or do you proceed exclusively 
from Russia s real interests? Does the Russian Government agree 
to the French proposal to permit Russia s participation in only that 
part of the Conference that will decide the question of the Straits? 

Answer. I consider Russia s participation in the settle 
ment of the Near East question 57 to have nothing to do 
with prestige. I hope that our international politics as a 
whole over a period of five years have shown completely 
that we ane quite indifferent to questions of prestige and 
that we are incapable of putting forward any demand 
whatsoever or of worsening the real chances of peace be 
tween states solely on account of prestige. I am confident 
that in no other country are the masses so indifferent to 
prestige and even so prepared to treat the question of 
prestige as such with happy ridicule. We are of the opinion 
that modern diplomacy will rapidly come to regard ques 
tions of prestige precisely in this way. 

Our Near East policy is a matter of Russia s most real, 
immediate and vital interests and of the interest of a num 
ber of states federated with her. If all these states did not 
succeed in getting their demand to participate in the Near 
East Conference satisfied, there would remain a huge mass 
of elements of hostility, conflict and discontent; their non- 
participation would involve such difficulties in purely com 
mercial affairs between Eastern Europe on the one hand and 
all other states on the other, that either there would remain 



272 V. I. LENIN 



no grounds whatever for peaceful coexistence or that such 
existence would be extraordinarily difficult. 

The Russian Government, therefore, is not satisfied with 
proposal from Paris to allow Russia to participate only in 
that part of the Conference that will settle the problem of 
the Straits. We are of the opinion that such a limitation 
would inevitably lead to a number of very practical, imme 
diate inconveniences, in particular economic inconven 
iences, from which France and Britain would themselves 
suffer, most probably in the near future. 

4. Question. What is the Russian programme for the solution of 
the Straits problem? 

Answer. Our Straits programme (still only approximate, 
of course) contains, among other things, the following: 

First, the satisfaction of Turkey s national aspirations. 
We consider that this is essential, and not only in the in 
terests of national independence. Our five years experience 
in settling the national question in a country that contains 
a tremendous number of nationalities such as could hardly 
be found in any other country, gives us the full conviction 
that under such circumstances the only correct attitude to 
the interests of nations is to meet those interests in full 
and provide conditions that exclude any possibility of con 
flicts on that score. Our experience has left us with the firm 
conviction that only outstanding attention to the interests 
of various nations can remove grounds for conflicts, can 
remove mutual mistrust, can remove the danger of any 
intrigues and create that confidence, especially on the part 
of workers and peasants speaking different languages, 
without which there absolutely cannot be peaceful relations 
between peoples or anything like a successful development 
of everything that is of value in present-day civilisation. 

Secondly, our programme includes the closing of the 
Straits to all warships in times of peace and of war. This 
is in the direct commercial interests of all powers, not only 



INTERVIEW TO OBSERVER AND MANCHESTER GUARDIAN 273 

of those whose territory is in the immediate vicinity of the 
Straits, but of all others, too. It must be remembered that 
all over the world there has been an inordinate amount of 
pacifist talk, an unusual number of pacifist phrases and 
assurances, and even vows against war and against peace, 
although there is unusually little preparedness on the part 
of the majority of states, especially on the part of the 
modern civilised states, to take any realistic steps, even 
the most simple, to ensure peace. On this, and on similar 
questions, we should like to see a minimum of general as 
surances, solemn promises and wordy formulas, and the 
greatest possible number of the simplest and most obvious 
solutions and measures that would actually lead to peace, 
if we do not speak of the complete elimination of the war 
danger. 

Thirdly, our programme on the Straits includes complete 
freedom of commerce by sea. After what I have said above 
I do not think it at all necessary to explain this point or 
make it more concrete. 

5. Question. Would the Russian Government agree to the League 
of Nations controlling the Straits if the League were to include in its 
composition Russia, Turkey, Germany and the United States? 

Or would Russia insist on the establishment of a special commis 
sion to control the Straits? 

Answer. We are, of course, opposed to the League of 
Nations, and I do not think that it is only our economic and 
political system with its specific features that accounts for 
our negative attitude towards the League; the interests of 
peace, regarded from the point of view of the concrete 
conditions of modern international politics in general, also 
fully justify that negative attitude. The League of Nations 
bears so many marks of its world war origin, it is so intimate 
ly bound up with the Treaty of Versailles and is so marked 
by the absence of anything resembling the establishment 
of the real equality of rights between nations, anything 

182283 



274 V. I. LENIH 



resembling a real chance of their ( peaceful coexistence, that 
I think our negative attitude to the League can be under 
stood and does not stand in need of further comment. 

6. Question. Does the refusal to ratify the agreement with 
Urquhart 58 mean a victory of the "Left Communists"? What are the 
objective conditions which would make possible a resumption of 
negotiations and the ratification of the agreement with Urquhart? 

Answer. The question of concluding an agreement with 
Urquhart was raised by our government when I was ill and 
was unable to take part in affairs of state. Therefore I am 
not yet fully informed of all the details of this matter. 
Nevertheless I can assert quite definitely that there is not, 
nor can there now be, any question of a victory for the 
Left Communists. I know this from my direct observation 
of the course of government affairs. 

The fact of the matter is that Britain s act of injustice, 
expressed in her unwillingness to admit us to the Confer 
ence, was so unexpected, aroused such indignation in Rus 
sia and so firmly united not only the Right with the Left 
Communists but also united the huge mass of the non-Party 
population of Russia, the workers and peasants, that things 
did not and could not reach the point of disagreement 
between the Left and Right Communists. 

The reason given for our rejection of the Urquhart 
agreement was a direct expression, one may say, not only 
of the general Party sentiment but of that of the entire 
people, i.e., the sentiment of the entire mass of the workers 
and peasants. 

The resumption of negotiations and the subsequent ratifi 
cation of an agreement with Urquhart depend primarily on 
the elimination of the flagrant injustices committed against 
Russia by Britain in curtailing her right to participate in 
the Near East Conference. As far as the concrete terms 
submitted to us by Urquhart are concerned, I have not yet 
had time to look into this matter in sufficient detail, and 



INTERVIEW TO OBSERVER AND MANCHESTER GUARDIAN 275 

can only say that the government has decided to let the 
supporters and opponents of this agreement have their say 
in our press as soon as possible, in order to obtain, from 
the objective and motivated discussion, material for the 
overall verification of all the pros and cons and for a deci 
sion on the issue in a manner that best accords with Rus 
sia s interests. 

7. Question. To what extent are the accusations of the anti-Rus 
sian press in Britain justified when they assert that the recent arrests 
of industrialists in Moscow signify the end of the New Economic 
Policy and a reversion to the policy of nationalisation and confisca 
tion? 

Answer. As to your question concerning the accusations 
made against us in the British anti-Russian press that 
Moscow industrialists" were being arrested, I must say 
that I have today just read in our newspaper (Izvestia) an 
item headed "Arrests of Black Marketeers". None other than 
Comrade Z. B. Katsnelson, chief of the Economic Board 
of the State Political Administration, tells us in this article 
that there was no question of arrests of industrialists, and 
that "rumours circulated by enemies of Soviet power, both 
within the R.S.F.S.R. and abroad, that the arrests are in 
fringements on free trade, are actually nothing but non 
sensical inventions that have the definite counter-revolu 
tionary intent of disrupting the economic relations that are 
being established with Western Europe." 

Indeed, those arrested were exclusively speculators on 
the so-called black market, and our authorities are in pos 
session of evidence establishing connection between these 
black-market currency speculators and certain employees 
of foreign missions in Moscow. This evidence shows not 
only the sale of platinum and of gold bars but also the 
organisation of contraband shipments of these valuables 
abroad. 

From this you can see how absolutely unfounded are the 
rumours that we are putting an end to the New Economic 

18* 



276 V. I. LENIN 



Policy and how utterly false are the accusations made by 
the anti-Russian press in Britain, which is trying by the 
most unheard-of distortion -and deception to present our 
policy in a false light. Actually, there has never been any 
mention in any government circles whatsoever of ending 
the New Economic Policy and returning to the old. Inci 
dentally, the whole work of the government during the 
session of the All-Russian Central Executive Committee 
now in progress is aimed at obtaining the widest possible 
legislative sanction for what is known as the New Econom 
ic Policy, so as to eliminate all possibility of any deviation 
from it. 

October 27, 1922 



NOTES 



1 The Second All-Russian Congress of Soviets of Workers and 
Soldiers Deputies opened on October 25 (November 7), 1917. The 
Second Congress of Soviets announced that power in Russia had 
passed to the Soviets, adopted decrees on peace and on the land 
and formed the first Soviet Government the Council of People s 
Commissars. Lenin delivered speeches on peace and land and 
was elected Chairman of the Council of People s Commissars. 

p. 5 

2 That is, during the existence of the counter-revolutionary bour 
geois Provisional Government that came to power after the over 
throw of the autocracy in Russia in February 1917. 

P- 7 

3 Chartist movement a widespread revolutionary movement of the 
English workers in the nineteenth century. It derived its name 
from the word "Charter" which contained the movement s polit 
ical demands. The views of the majority of its participants were 
rather Utopian. This and the lack of a definite programme and 
tactics constituted the movement s weak point. Despite its defeat, 
however, Chartism exercised a strong influence on the develop 
ment of the British and international working-class movement. 

p. 8 

4 The Anti-Socialist Law was promulgated in Germany in 1878. 
Under this law all organisations of the Social-Democratic Party, 
all workers mass organisations, and the working-class press were 
banned, and the banishment of Social-Democrats was begun. The 
law was annulled in 1890 under the pressure of the mass working- 
class movement. 

p. 8 

5 Lenin refers to the Manifesto of the Petrograd Soviet "To the 
Peoples of the Whole World", adopted on March 14 (27), 1917. 
The Mensheviks and Socialist-Revolutionaries, who seized the 

19* 



280 



NOTES 



leadership of the Petrograd Soviet after the February revolu 
tion in 1917, were forced to endorse the Manifesto under the 
pressure of the revolutionary people demanding an end to the war. 
The Manifesto urged the working people of the belligerent 
countries to come out in favour of peace. The Manifesto, how 
ever, did not expose the predatory character of the war, did not 
advance any practical measures to be adopted in the struggle 
for peace, and, in fact, justified the continuation of the imperial 
ist war by the bourgeois Provisional Government. 

p. 10 

6 This refers to the mutiny in the German navy at Wilhelmshaven 
in July-August 1917, the demand being the termination of the 
imperialist war. The government of Wilhelm II savagely put down 

the mutiny. 

p. 10 

7 The Moscow Regional Bureau of the R.S.D.L.P.(B.) united, in 1917 
and at the beginning of 1918, the Party organisations of the Cen 
tral industrial region. During the period when the Party was strug 
gling for peace with Germany, necessary for the young and still 
weak Soviet Republic, the "Left Communists" (who favoured the 
continuation of the war with Germany) had temporarily seized 
control of the Moscow Regional Bureau. 

The schismatic, anti-Soviet resolution Lenin speaks of was 
passed at a meeting of the Bureau attended by only a limited num 
ber of its members and which took place after the Central Com 
mittee of the Party had accepted the new peace terms imposed 
by Germany on Soviet Russia. 

p. 15 

8 The peace treaty with the German bloc (Germany, Austria-Hun 
gary, Turkey and Bulgaria) was signed by Soviet Russia at Brest- 
Litovsk on March 3, 1918. The terms of the Brest peace were ex 
tremely harsh for Soviet Russia. A territory of more than 
58,000 square miles (Poland, Lithuania, part of Latvia and Estonia) 
was to be severed from Russia. Germany occupied a large part 
of Byelorussia and the whole of the Ukraine. Big territories in 
Transcaucasia were also annexed in favour of Turkey. Russia was 
to pay a high indemnity to Germany. Despite its harsh character, 
the Brest peace gave the Soviet Republic the breathing-space it 
needed to gather forces and defeat the counter-revolutionary bour 
geoisie and the interventionist forces in the Civil War that began 
soon afterwards. After the revolution in Germany (November 
1918), the Brest peace was annulled. 

p. 15 



NOTES 281 



9 This refers to the vote on the question of peace with Germany that 
took place at a meeting of the Party Central Committee jointly 
with the Party functionaries on February 3, 1918. 

p. 19 

10 This refers to the first Russian revolution the bourgeois-demo 
cratic revolution of 1905-07. 

p. 25 

11 The Fourth Extraordinary All-Russian Congress of Soviets, held 
in Moscow on March 14-16, 1918, was convened to ratify the Brest 
Peace Treaty. Lenin made a report on the subject. Kamkov, rep 
resentative of the Left Socialist-Revolutionaries, spoke against the 
ratification. By an overwhelming majority the Congress adopted 
Lenin s resolution. In addition, the Congress decided to transfer 
the country s capital from Petrograd to Moscow. 

p. 31 

12 Cadets members of the Constitutional-Democratic Party, the lead 
ing party of the Russian liberal-monarchist bourgeoisie. The Cadet 
Party was founded in October 1905, its membership including re 
presentatives of the bourgeoisie, Zemstvo landlords and bourgeois 
intellectuals. To deceive the working people, the Cadets called 
themselves "the party of people s freedom", but in fact they did 
not go beyond the demand for a constitutional monarchy. The 
Cadets considered their main aim to be the struggle against the 
revolutionary movement and sought to share power with the tsar 
and the feudal landlords. During the First World War the Cadets 
actively supported the tsarist government s foreign policy of con 
quest. During the bourgeois-democratic revolution of February 
1917 they tried to save the monarchy. The Cadets, who occupied a 
leading position in the bourgeois Provisional Government, pursued 
an anti-popular, counter-revolutionary policy, favourable to the 
U.S., British and French imperialists. Following the victory of the 
Great October Socialist Revolution the Cadets became irrecon 
cilable enemies of Soviet power and participated in all the 
armed counter-revolutionary actions and campaigns of the inter 
ventionist forces. When the interventionist forces and whiteguards 
were defeated, the Cadets fled abroad, where they continued their 
anti-Soviet, counter-revolutionary activity. 

p. 35 

13 The February revolution of 1917 in Russia resulted in the estab 
lishment of dual power. Alongside the revolutionary-democratic 
dictatorship of the proletariat in the shape of the Soviets of Work 
ers and Soldiers Deputies, there existed the bourgeois Provisional 



282 NOTES 



Government. In words, the Provisional Government proclaimed a 
policy of peace, but in deeds, it did not even think of Russia with 
drawing from the imperialist war. In an attempt to strengthen 
its positions, the Provisional Government decided in June 1917 
to launch an offensive at the front. In the event of the offensive 
being successful, the bourgeoisie counted on stepping up propa 
ganda in favour of the defence of the country, on putting an end 
to the dual power and on establishing their counter-revolutionary 
dictatorship. At the time, however, the fighting capacity of the 
Russian army was very low owing to the lack of technique, weap 
ons and ammunition. Furthermore and this is the main thing 
the soldiers did not want to fight. Many units refused to obey the 
order to begin an offensive [dated June 18 (July 1), 1917]. Follow 
ing several partial successes, the widely advertised offensive fell 
through, the army having lost 60,000 men. This criminal order was 
given after the Provisional Government received support from the 
First All-Russian Congress of Soviets, June 3 (16), 1917, at which 
the parties of compromise the Mensheviks, Socialist-Revolution 
aries, etc. had a majority. 

p. 42 

14 The Central Rada a bourgeois nationalist organisation founded 
in Kiev in April 1917, at a congress of the Ukrainian bourgeois and 
petty-bourgeois parties and groups. After the Great October Social 
ist Revolution the Rada declared itself to be the supreme organ 
of the "Ukrainian People s Republic" and embarked on the path 
of open struggle against Soviet power. 

In view of the obviously hostile attitude of Central Rada to 
the Soviets, the Council of People s Commissars decided, on De 
cember 3 (16), 1917, to present an ultimatum to the Rada and 
simultaneously to address a manifesto to the Ukrainian people. 
In the course of discussion these two documents were combined 
to form one document entitled "Manifesto to the Ukrainian Peo 
ple with an Ultimatum to the Ukrainian Rada". 

In January 1918, the Kiev workers responded to the Bolshe 
viks call and rose in revolt against the counter-revolutionary Rada. 
Soviet power was proclaimed in Kiev, and the Rada was driven 
out of the city. p. 45 

15 On December 22, 1917 (January 4, 1918) the Soviet Government 
recognised the independence of Finland which had formerly been 
part of the Russian Empire. In mid-February 1918 the revolution 
ary government of the socialist Finnish Republic proposed that 
the Soviet Government should conclude a friendship treaty with 
Finland. A Russian-Finnish agreement committee was set up to 



NOTES 283 



draw up the terms. The draft treaty submitted by the committee 
was discussed at several sessions of the Council of People s Com 
missars. Lenin made several amendments to it. The treaty with 
revolutionary Finland was published on March 10, 1918. 

p. 50 

16 The Sixth Extraordinary All-Russian Congress of Soviets of Work 
ers , Peasants , Cossacks and Red Army Deputies met in Moscow 
from November 6 to November 9, 1918. Lenin was elected its 
honorary chairman. 

Lenin spoke at the first session of the Congress, November 6, 
on the anniversary of the October Socialist Revolution and at the 
second session, November 8, on the international situation. The 
Congress unanimously endorsed the resolution written by Lenin 
and adopted on October 22, 1918, at a Joint Meeting of the All- 
Russian Central Executive Committee, the Moscow Soviet, and 
Moscow Factory Committees and Trade Unions. 

The Congress addressed the governments at war with Soviet 
Russia proposing to start peace negotiations. 

p. 53 

17 Lenin refers to the dispatch of Russian troops by Tsar Nicholas I 
to help the Austrian emperor crush the Hungarian Revolution. 

p. 62 

18 Lenin refers to the suppression by the tsar s troops of the Polish 
insurrection of 1863. 

p. 62 

19 This refers to the counter-revolutionary revolt of the Czecho 
slovak Corps, made up of war prisoners during the First World 
War (Czechoslovakia was then part of Austria-Hungary). The 
Corps was formed by the Provisional Government in 1917 for 
war against Germany. Following the October Socialist Revolution, 
the Russian and foreign counter-revolutionaries used the Corps to 
fight Soviet power. 

p. 64 

20 This refers to the sudden refusal of the Dutch Government to 
allow the entry into Holland of the R.S.F.S.R. plenipotentiary (who 
was already on his way to the country) despite the previous agree 
ment to exchange representation and despite the fact that the 
R.S.F.S.R. representative had a visa from the Dutch consul in 
Moscow, 

p. 64 



284 NOTES 



21 L Echo de Paris an extremely reactionary, bourgeois daily, pub 
lished in Paris between 1884 and 1938. 

p. 66 

22 The Third International (Ill-me Internationale) the weekly organ 
of a group of French Communists; published in Moscow in 1918-19. 

p. 66 

23 Peace negotiations with Bullitt, who came to Moscow on the in 
structions of U.S. President Wilson, were conducted by the Soviet 
Government in March 1919. The Soviet Government introduced a 
number of amendments into the American and British proposals, 
after which the final draft agreement was drawn up. The Soviet 
Government s proposals were not accepted by the governments of 
the U.S.A. and Britain because in the spring Kolchak s army be 
gan an offensive, and they hoped that Kolchak would smash So 
viet Russia, 

p. 71 

24 This draft resolution was drawn up by Lenin at a meeting of the 
Eighth All-Russian Conference of the R.C.P.(B.) on December 2, 
1919. With minor corrections the draft was adopted by the con 
ference and then read by Lenin on December 5 in his report to 
the Seventh All-Russian Congress of Soviets (see pp. 103-04 of 
the present volume). The Congress unanimously adopted it as a 
peace proposal to the Entente countries. The Congress resolution 
was published in the press on December 6, 1919. 

The Congress peace proposal was sent out to the Entente coun 
tries on December 10, 1919, but the British, French, U.S. and Ital 
ian governments refused to consider it. 

p. 73 

25 The Seventh All-Russian Congress of Soviets was held in Moscow 
on December 5-9, 1919 and was attended by 1,366 delegates, of 
whom 1,278 were Communists. The Congress agenda included the 
following items: 1. Report of the All-Russian Central Executive 
Committee and the Council of People s Commissars; 2. The military 
situation; 3. The Communist International; 4. The food situation; 
5. The fuel question; 6. The building of the Soviet system locally 
and in the centre; 7. Elections of an All-Russian Central Executive 
Committee. 

At the opening session Lenin delivered the report of the Cen 
tral Executive Committee and the Council of People s Commis 
sars; next day he made concluding remarks on the report; on 
December 8, Lenin spoke in the Congress organising section, and 
on December 9, he made a concluding speech. 

p. 75 



NOTES 285 



26 The German Government broke off diplomatic relations with the 
R.S.F.S.R. on November 5, 1918 and expelled the Soviet Embassy 
from Berlin under the false pretext that the official Soviet repre 
sentatives conducted propaganda against German government in 
stitutions. Diplomatic relations between Germany and the R.S.F.S.R. 
were not resumed until 1922. 

p. 79 

27 The Dreyfus case a frame-up trial organised in 1894 by the 
reactionary-monarchist circles of the French militarists against an 
officer of the General Staff, Dreyfus, a Jew, on the trumped-up 
charge of espionage and high treason. Dreyfus was court-martialled 
and sentenced to life imprisonment. The public movement in 
France, to force a review of the Dreyfus affair, was developing 
amidst the severe struggle between the republicans and monarch 
ists and led, in the end, to the acquittal of Dreyfus in 1906. Lenin 
called the Dreyfus affair "one of the many thousands of fraud 
ulent tricks of the reactionary military caste". 

p. 89 

28 Lenin read the announcement, published in the central newspapers 
on January 18, 1920, about the decision of the governments of the 
Entente countries to lift the blockade against Soviet Russia and to 
allow these countries to trade with Russia. The announcement 
emphasised that this decision "by no means signifies a change in 
the policy of the Allies as regards the Soviet Government". 

p. 106 

29 The documents referred to by Lenin were furnished by the white- 
guard officer Oleinikov who deserted to the side of the Soviets. He 
carried these documents from Paris, from Sazonov, via Sweden to 
Yudenich. 

The people mentioned in the documents are: Sazonov Minister 
for Foreign Affairs in the tsarist government and representative 
of Kolchak and Denikin in Paris; Gulkevich Kolchak s represen 
tative in Sweden; Bakhmetev Kolchak s ambassador in Washing 
ton; Sukin Kolchak s Minister for Foreign Affairs in Omsk; 
Sablin Kolchak s charge d affaires in London; Knox general, 
representative of the British Government with Kolchak; Guchkov 
former minister in the Provisional Government. 

p. Ill 

30 This refers to the negotiations conducted by the Red Cross on the 
exchange of prisoners-of-war, the return of refugees, etc. 

p. 114 



286 NOTES 



31 Lenin has in mind the appeal of the R.S.F.S.R. Council of 
People s Commissars addressed to the Government and people of 
Poland and published in the central newspapers on January 30, 
1920. In addition, on February 2, the All-Russian Central Exec 
utive Committee adopted an appeal to the Polish people at a meet 
ing of the first session of the C.E.C. (seventh convocation). The 
appeal exposed the slanders spread by the imperialist govern 
ments about the supposedly annexationist intentions of Soviet 
Russia in relation to Poland and emphasised the Soviet Govern 
ment s unswerving desire for peace and for establishing friendly, 
good-neighbour relations with independent Poland. 

p. 115 

32 The Bashkir Autonomous Soviet Republic was formed as a result 
of an agreement between the Soviet Government and the Bashkir 
Government. Under the agreement on the Soviet Autonomous Bash 
kiria, published on March 23, 1919, the Bashkir Republic entered 
the R.S.F.S.R. on a federative basis. 

p. 117 

33 The Tatar Autonomous Soviet Republic was formed on May 27, 
1920. The decree by the All-Russian Central Executive Committee 
and the Council of People s Commissars on the formation of the 
republic was signed by Lenin and Kalinin. 

p. 117 

3/1 The questions were broadcast to Lenin by the Berlin representa 
tive of the American bourgeois newspaper New York Evening 
Journal. Lenin s reply was sent by radio-telegram to Berlin, from 
where it was transmitted to New York on February 21, 1920. The 
same evening it was published in The New York Evening Journal. 
Lenin s radio-telegram was also reprinted in the German com 
munist and socialist press. 

p. 130 

35 The special correspondent of the London conservative newspaper 
Daily Express, who was in Copenhagen, addressed Lenin request 
ing him to answer four questions. Lenin s reply was received in 
Copenhagen on February 22 and the next day it was published in 
Daily Express. 

p. 134 

36 The Joint Meeting of the All-Russian Central Executive Committee, 
the Moscow Soviet and Representatives of Moscow Trade Unions 
and Factory Committees, held on May 5, 1920, was convened in 
connection with the attack of the Polish Whites on Soviet Russia, 



NOTES 287 



The meeting was also attended by 300 Petrograd Communist work 
ers leaving for the Polish front. The one question discussed was 
the situation on the Polish front. The meeting unanimously adopted 
a resolution calling on the workers and peasants to mobilise all 
their efforts to rout bourgeois-landlord Poland. 

p. 136 

37 This refers to the conference of the Entente countries held in San 
Remo (Italy) in April 1920. The conference discussed the draft 
peace treaty with Turkey, the fulfilment of the Treaty of Versailles 
by Germany, etc. 

p. 138 

38 Early in 1920 some Red Army units were made into armies of 
labour to be utilised in economic construction. Because of the 
war against bourgeois-landlord Poland and Wrangel, they were 
again put on a war footing. 

p. 141 

39 Lenin refers to the First Congress of the Peoples of the East held 
in Baku between September 1 and 7, 1920. The Congress was 
attended by 1,891 delegates (including 1,273 Communists) repre 
senting 37 nationalities. On the national and the colonial question 
the Congress expressed its solidarity with the resolution adopted 
by the Second Congress of the Communist International. 

p. 156 

40 See Note 19. 

p. 172 

41 Lenin refers to the counter-revolutionary whiteguard-Socialist-Rev- 
olutionary government formed in June 1918 in Samara, Ufa, Sim 
birsk, Kazan and the Central Volga Area. The government, which 
called itself the Constituent Assembly Committee, lasted until 
December 1918. 

p. 173 

42 Lenin refers to the resolutions of the Ninth All-Russian Confer 
ence of the R.C.P.(B.) (see C.P.S.U in Resolutions and Decisions 
of Congresses, Conferences and Central Committee Plenary Meet 
ings, 7th Russ. ed., Part I, 1954, pp. 506-13). 

p. 178 

43 See Lenin, "Report on the Immediate Tasks of the Soviet Govern 
ment" and "Concluding Remarks on the Report", delivered at a 
meeting of the All-Russian Central Executive Committee on 
April 29, 1918 (CoHected Works, 4th Russ. ed., Vol. 27, pp. 249-81). 

p. 200 



288 NOTES 



4i See Lenin, "On the Trade Unions" (Collected Works, 4th Russ. ed., 
Vol. 32, p. 14). 

p. 201 

45 The twenty-one conditions for admission to the Third Internation 
al were worked out by Lenin and adopted by the Second Congress 
of the Communist International in August 1920. 

p. 210 

46 The trade agreement with Britain was signed on March 16, 1921. 

p. 212 

47 Lenin refers to the counter-revolutionary Kronstadt mutiny which 
began on February 28, 1921. The Tenth Party Congress sent 300 of 
its delegates to help put down the mutiny. On March 18 it was 
completely quelled. 

p. 214 

48 By the Democratic Committee in Samara, Lenin means the Consti 
tuent Assembly Committee (see Note 41). 

p. 216 

49 The Ninth All-Russian Congress of Soviets was held in Moscow 
on December 23-28, 1921 and was attended by 1,991 delegates. 
Lenin delivered the report of the All-Russian Central Executive 
Committee and the Council of People s Commissars on the home 
and foreign policy of the Soviet Republic on the evening of De 
cember 23. The Congress unanimously approved the Soviet Gov 
ernment s activities for the period under review. It adopted a de 
claration on the international position of the R.S.F.S.R. based on 
Lenin s instructions. The Congress also adopted the "Instructions 
on the Questions of Economic Work", drawn up by Lenin, and a 
number of decisions on industry and agriculture. 

p. 225 

50 The Washington Conference was held between November 12, 1921 
and February 6, 1922. The U.S.A., which initiated the Conference, 
managed to strengthen its political, naval and economic positions 
in the Far East. Soviet Russia was not invited to attend the Con 
ference. The Washington Conference aggravated still more the 
contradictions between the imperialist countries. 

p. 239 

51 The building of the Shatura Power Station named after Lenin be 
gan in 1919. The first section with a capacity of 5,000 kw came 
into operation in 1920. 

According to the plan, the construction of the Kashira Power 
Station was to be completed by the end of 1921. On June 4, 1922 



NOTES 289 



the building of the first section (12,000 kw) was finished, and the 
station was put into commission. Lenin attached very great im 
portance to the Kashira Power Station. He gave instructions as to 
its construction, helped provide it with man-power, the necessary 
equipment, fuel, etc. 

p. 255 

52 Ekonomicheskaya Zhizn (Economic Affairs ) a daily newspaper 
published in Moscow from November 1918 to November 1937. 

p. 255 

53 The Krasny Oktyabr (Red October) Power Station (former Utkina 
Zavod) was completed in 1922, the first section (10,000 kw) being 
put into operation on October 8, 1922. 

p. 256 

54 Lenin refers to the trial (Moscow, December 15-18, 1921) of 
35 private businessmen charged with violating the Labour Code, 
exploiting juveniles and women, extending the working day beyond 
the limits stipulated, and breaking other Soviet laws. 

p. 258 

55 The Genoa Conference (the International Economic Conference) 
met at Genoa from April 10 to May 19, 1922, and was attended by 
representatives of Soviet Russia, Britain, France, Italy, Belgium, 
Japan, Germany and 21 other states. The U.S.A. was represented 
by an "observer". 

At the Conference the imperialist powers tried to take advant 
age of Soviet Russia s economic difficulties to impose shackling 
agreements on her. They demanded payment of all tsarist debts, 
including the pre-war debts, restitution of nationalised enterprises 
to foreign owners, etc. 

An emergency session of the All-Russian Central Executive 
Committee on January 27, 1922, appointed Lenin head of the So 
viet delegation. Although Lenin could not go to Genoa himself, 
he directed the entire work of the Soviet delegation, instructing 
it on the questions to be raised at the Conference and on the con 
tents of the memoranda submitted on behalf of the Soviet Gov 
ernment. 

The Soviet delegation rejected the arrogant claims of the im 
perialists and proposed universal disarmament and annulment of 
all war debts. Owing to the hostile attitude of France and Britain 
towards Soviet Russia, the Conference had to abandon its work. 
The questions under discussion were referred to a conference of 
experts, which met at The Hague in June- July 1922. Like the Genoa 
Conference, the Hague talks failed to yield any results. 



290 NOTES 



Lenin set forth the fundamental tasks of the Soviet Govern 
ment in foreign policy, in connection with the Genoa and The Hague 
conferences, in his speeches at a meeting of the Communist group 
of the All-Russian Metal Workers Congress and at the Eleventh 
Party Congress. 

p. 266 

56 The Treaty of Rapalloa Soviet-German treaty signed on April 16 
1922 during the Genoa Conference. It envisaged the establishment 
of diplomatic relations between the countries and their mutual 
refusal to reimburse war expenditure. The German Government 
also relinquished its claims to return to the former German owners 
the enterprises nationalised by the Soviet Government. 

p. 267 

57 This refers to the Lausanne Conference held from November 20 
1922 to July 24, 1923. 

p. 271 

8 This refers to the negotiations with the big British capitalist Leslie 
Urquhart on the concession agreement to mine natural resources 
in the Urals and Siberia. A draft agreement was proposed but on 
October 6, 1922 it was turned down by the Council of People s 
Commissars in view of the British Government s hostile policy to 
wards Soviet Russia and the shackling terms of the agreement. 

p. 274 



TO THE READER 

The Foreign Languages Publishing House 
would be glad to have your opinion of the 
translation and the design of this book. 
Please send them to 21, 
Zubovsky Boulevard, 
Moscow, U.S.S.R. 



B. H. JIE H H H 

O MHPE 



O BHYTPEHHEft 

H BHELUHEtf nOJIHTHKE 

PECnyBJIHKH 

Ha 



Printed in the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics 



PLEASE DO NOT REMOVE 
CARDS OR SLIPS FROM THIS POCKET 

UNIVERSITY OF TORONTO LIBRARY 



DK Lenin, Vladimir IlUch 

266 Report on peace 

.5 
L333 



